In the beginning you have to put together the causes — in other words, you have to make an effort to look and know correctly.
As for the letting go, that comes afterwards.
§ The Buddha compared the training of the mind to holding a bird in your hand.
The mind is like a tiny bird, and the question is how to hold the bird so that it doesn't fly away.
If you hold it too tightly, it will die in your hand.
If you hold it too loosely, the tiny bird will slip out through your fingers.
So how are you going to hold it so that it doesn't die and doesn't get away?
The same holds true with our training of the mind in a way that's not too tense and not too lax but always just right.
There are many things you have to know in training the mind, and you have to look after them correctly.
On the physical side, you have to change postures in a way that's balanced and just right so that the mind can stay at normalcy, so that it can stay at a natural level of stillness or emptiness continuously.
Physical exercise is also necessary.
Even yogis who practice high levels of concentration have to exercise the body by stretching and bending it in various postures.
We don't have to go to extremes like them, but we can exercise enough so that the mind can maintain its stillness naturally in a way that allows it to contemplate physical and mental phenomena to see them as inconstant, stressful, and not-self…
If you force the mind too much, it dies just like the bird held too tightly.
In other words, it grows deadened, insensitive, and will simply stay frozen in stillness without contemplating to see what inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness are like.
Our practice is to make the mind still enough so that it can contemplate inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness.
This is the point for which we train and contemplate, and that makes it easy to train.
As for changing postures or working and getting exercise, we do these things with an empty mind.
When you're practicing in total seclusion, you should get some physical exercise.
If you simply sit and lie down, the flow of blood and breath energy in the body will get abnormal.
§ The fourth tetrad in the instructions for keeping the breath in mind begins with keeping track of inconstancy with every in-and-out breath.
The main obstacle that makes us unable to maintain this kind of awareness for long or for continuous periods of time is the fact that we don't maintain our awareness with every in-and-out breath.
When things grow empty, we just let the mind grow quiet, without focusing, without contemplating, so everything drifts or grows blurry.
Or some sort of fabrication arises easily so that we can't focus on the empty mind.
So when any crude fabrication arises, you have to block it by focusing on the breath.
Use the breath to snuff it out.
Whether the fabrication is a tiny or a strong sensation, catch hold of the breath as your first step in protecting yourself.
The more often you do this, the more it turns into a normal habit — and the more useful it will be.
Simply staying with the breath can help prevent unskillful thinking — in other words, it can keep the mind from fabricating unskillful thoughts.
That way, craving for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations can't take shape.
Whatever you're aware of, quickly focus on the breath, and whatever it is, it will simply stop and disband.
§ When the mind is very refined and very still, if you don't maintain your focus, your still awareness can blur or grow distracted.
So you have to keep your mindfulness in focus.
Breathe deeply and heavily as a way of waking the mind up.
Don't let it grow quiet in an unfocused way.
You have to focus on seeing the condition of emptiness within the mind that's a primal part of its nature.
If you can do this, there's not much else to the practice.
Simply keep the mind under the control of mindfulness and the breath.
In other words, focus on watching it, knowing it.
Even if there's some thinking that helps in your knowing, keep it short.
Don't let it grow long.
Whatever the reflection or the contemplation, keep it short.
Don't let it grow long.
If it's long, it will turn into distraction.
Use the breath as a means of cutting it off.
When your thinking starts getting long, make it stop.
Keep it as short as possible.
Make it stop as short as possible.
Keep your still self-awareness as clear and bright as possible, seeing that it doesn't have any self.
§ The mind that maintains itself in a state of normalcy is like a white cloth or a white sheet of paper.
You have to keep focused on keeping watch over it to see, when there's any sensory contact, how the mind wavers in reaction, how it labels things as “good” or “bad” or “self.” This is something you have to learn how to observe on a refined level.
§ Once the mind is quiet and empty, your awareness really gets sharper.
“Sharp” here means that it clearly sees the actual facts because it focuses its gaze until it sees clearly.
If you're looking at something and don't yet see clearly, don't go looking anywhere else.
Keep looking right there until you know.
What does this knowing know?
It knows arising.
Remaining.
Passing away.
And it doesn't cling.
To know in this way you have to keep abreast of fabrication of every sort, whether it fabricates good or bad or neither good nor bad.
If you're not yet capable of contemplating the mind, then contemplate the body to see how it's composed of the four elements: earth, water, wind, and fire.
You have to keep eating and excreting, adding elements and excreting them all the time.
Even just the affairs of the body — this walking corpse — are already a burden.
When it's hot you have to give it a shower; when it's cold you have to wrap it up in blankets; when it's sick you have to give it medicine; when it's hungry you have to give it food.
You have to look after it in just the right way; otherwise it causes all sorts of problems.
They say that the mind is the master, and the body the servant.
But if craving becomes the mind's master, then the body will have two masters.
Just think of how many conflicts that can cause!
The mind is in bad straits and so is the body.
§ The physical body on its own is already painful and stressful.
If we fasten onto it, that makes it even more painful and stressful.
So contemplate the body carefully to see that there's only the stress of conditions, the stress of the aggregates, but that there's no one to whom the stress belongs — and there's no defilement burning the heart.
§ Give up your fascination with worthless things, with the good and bad things of the past.
Sweep them up and toss them out.
Make the mind free of clutter.
And once it's free of clutter, don't go gathering up things to clutter it up again.
For example, your mind is empty at the moment.
Look at it to see how things take shape and arise; look at how they disappear.
Look at genuine nature right here.
Look at the nature of how the mind receives its objects, or how it receives contact.
If you see correctly in line with the truth, you'll see that these things are all empty.
There's nothing true or lasting about them at all.
Simply look in a way that doesn't apply labels.
When the eye sees sights or the ear hears sounds, look at these things simply as natural events.
As for the mind, let it stay still, free from any tendency to get involved by labeling things as good or bad.
That way desire won't arise to disturb the mind.
Ask yourself: If you fall for these things, and suffering follows as a result, what do you get out of it?
You'll see that you don't get anything at all.
It's all empty.
What you do get is the suffering that keeps the heart flustered.
So whatever you look at, look to see its inconstancy thoroughly, inside and out.
Just that will be enough to keep you from having to cling to anything.
§ When you're aware of sensory contact, you don't want your awareness to stop just at the point where the eye sees a sight or the ear hears a sound.
You have to know deeply into the eye-consciousness that takes note of the sight.
Then focus on the sight to see its changes, its decay and disbanding.
When there's the sensation of a sight, you have to look to see whether the sight changes.
§ If you understand how to look, you can see the changes in physical and mental phenomena of all kinds.
Physical phenomena you can see with your eyes.
For example, a flower that's still fresh contains change and decay there in its freshness.
If you see its decay only when it's withered and brown, your contemplation is still crude, still far from the truth.
Nothing that's fabricated is stable or steady, but we make up our own suppositions about these things.
Things change in the direction of development and in the direction of decay.
We see these as two separate processes, but actually both of them are decay.
§ Whenever there's sensory contact, keep your focus turned inward on the mind continuously.
Keep it still and at normalcy.
As for the contact, simply know it as contact, but keep your awareness of the mind as continuous as possible until your awareness all gathers together.
Let it gather into an awareness pure and simple.
If this awareness pure and simple can maintain its stance continuously, it will become a means of reading and deciphering everything within.
You don't have to pay attention to the sensations of arising and passing away.
Focus instead on the awareness pure and simple — in other words, the awareness right at the mind or at the property of consciousness pure and simple.
Even if you're aware of physical matters, keep your awareness pure and simple.
You have to be observant when the mind has firmly established mindfulness and your awareness gathers so that you're aware of the property of consciousness, pure and simple, without any fabrication at all — an awareness pure and simple right at itself.
Take that as your foundation.
In the beginning we focus on the breath to keep the mind from wandering off.
When you focus on the breath as it grows more and more refined you get to the point where you don't have to focus on the breath any more.
You focus continually right at the mind.
You focus right on the mind pure and simple, without any fabrications, without any labels.
Whatever arises, know it no further than that and keep your mindfulness continuous.
§ When the mind lies under the control of mindfulness, without fabricating thoughts or getting distracted, it will be quiet and awake within.
When you focus directly on the mind, it will stop and grow still naturally.
You'll see that the mind is just an aspect of nature, not your “self” or anything of the sort.
When you see clearly that it's just an aspect of nature, that will destroy any attachment to it as “you” or “yours.
Whether you're aware of form or feeling, simply let them be aspects of nature — all of them.
The mind won't be put to difficulties, won't get stirred up with thoughts and fabrications.
Let it stop and grow still simply by keeping abreast of itself with every moment.
§ To restrain the mind makes the sensations of sensory contact stop in their tracks.
In other words, simply being acquainted with the mind when mindfulness is focused on being aware of the mind allows sensory contacts to pass away naturally right in the present.
This is why people who are careless, who don't develop restraint through mindfulness, fall easily under the power of the defilements.
Restraint through mindfulness is the first step — in other words, the step where you maintain restraint by being mindful.
When your mindfulness becomes continuous to the point where it becomes clear knowing, that's called restraint through knowledge.
Try to maintain this state of clear knowing within.
§ Restraint of the senses is for the purpose of seeing the movements of the mind — to see how the sensation of contact at the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, or mind turns into other sensations.
§ Your study of the Dhamma has to be a study inside, not a study of written words or spoken words.
It has to be a study of the mind pure and simple so that it will know its own features and characteristics while it maintains its normalcy or maintains itself in emptiness, an emptiness that doesn't latch onto anything.
If you look at it again and again with every moment, it will develop into a clear awareness of the characteristics of an aspect of nature fabricated from causes and conditions, simply as its own nature, pure and simple.
Or there may be an awareness of another side of nature — even though the awareness may not be clear — of an aspect of nature free from fabrication.
Here I'm referring to the mind that's empty or quiet on its own, which can serve as a standard for comparison.
The aspect of the mind fabricated by conditions is simply nature.
Don't enter into it to latch onto it.
As for the aspect that's not fabricated, that's simply empty in and of itself: This too shouldn't be latched onto.
So when the mind is embroiled, if you latch onto the idea that “My mind is embroiled”; or if, when the mind is empty, you latch onto the idea that “My mind is empty”: Both of these are equal, in that no matter what you latch onto, you have to suffer.
So no matter how things change, if you correctly know the truth of the Buddha's sabbe dhamma anatta — All phenomena are not-self — you'll simply be able to let go.
§ Stopping to look, stopping to know your own mind is better than straying out to know things outside, for when you stop to look, stop to know, you'll see inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness in a way that doesn't require words.
This will be a knowing that's totally silent and still within.
The kind of insight that uses the words “inconstant,” “stressful,” and “not-self” is imitation knowing, not the real thing.
Genuine knowing sees the change happening with every moment right before your eyes, right here and now.
You actually see whatever arises and how it passes away.
And it's always there for you to see right now.
There's nothing difficult about it at all.
So if you know how to stop to look, stop to know your own mind, you'll become acquainted with the Dhamma in a correct way…
If you look correctly, seeing all the way through, you'll see how change involves arising, remaining, and passing away with every moment.
You'll see how change inherently involves stress.
But you have to see all the way in, in a profound way.
It's not just a matter of repeating to yourself that these things are inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
You really have to look in order to see how change is inherently stressful.
You don't have to call it “stressful” in your mind, but you have to look until you see this truth clearly right in the stress itself.
Once you've seen that inconstancy is stressful, you'll see the non-selfness inherently there in the same place.
§ If you stay focused on disbanding this, that, and the other thing, you've fallen for the deceits of inconstancy.
§ When you look at inconstancy, or arising and passing away, with true mindfulness and discernment, there will have to be a sense of dismay, disenchantment, and dispassion… If you know but are simply indifferent, that's called not knowing.
You've simply fooled yourself into thinking you know when you really haven't.
Genuine knowing, bright and clear to the heart, is something else entirely — not at all the indifferent knowing that counts as delusion.
§ When you really know, there has to be a sense of dismay, a sense of urgency in getting everything out, giving everything back, a sense of urgency in seeing how things are not at all worthy of attachment.
That's the kind of knowing you have to develop.
If you haven't yet developed it, you need to contemplate things over and over again, whether you're sitting, standing, walking, lying down, eating, excreting, whatever.
You need to be absorbed in contemplating these things as much as you can.
When you can do that, you'll enter into the Dhamma.
If the mind is still far away and distracted, if it's still concerned with this, that, and the other thing, it'll keep retreating further and further away until it falls slave to craving and defilement as before.
§ The chant for contemplating the four requisites is something very useful and beneficial.
You have to keep training yourself not to get carried away in your consumption of the requisites.
The mindfulness that arises from this contemplation will then be full of discernment.
Wherever there's mindfulness, there has to be alertness and self-awareness — which are the same thing as discernment.
§ Every aspect of the training that aims at making you contented with what you have helps keep the mind more empty than not.
Once you see the value of these practices, you should practice letting go of your desires.
If you simply follow your desires, then if you get what you desire you're happy.
If you don't, you get all hot and bothered.
So contemplate desire to see if it's stressful — to see how it's both stress and the cause of stress all in one.
§ Training the mind is refined work.
Even when knowledge arises, if you decide on your own that it has to be right for sure, you've failed the test.
No matter what the knowledge: If it can waver, it's fake knowledge, deceptive knowledge, not absolute knowledge.
§ When you latch onto your knowledge as correct, that gives rise to wrong view in that very moment.
So you have to keep stopping to look and to know all along the way until you see how your knowing turns into not-knowing.
This is because right knowing and wrong knowing are inherently intertwined.
It's not the case that true knowing will stay as nothing but true knowing.
You have to find the angle from which you can see how and where wrong knowing and wrong views will spring up.
§ When pride and conceit arise, you have to make them turn around and contemplate themselves, to see that there's no “self” to them — and so when that's the case, what do they get out of bragging?
Exactly where is their self?
When you look into this, you find that you're at a loss as to what to say.
And that in and of itself helps to put an end to your bragging.
When you find the source that gives rise to “I know, I'm right, I'm good,” that's the voice you have to make life difficult for.
If you make life difficult for other voices in the mind, then you've missed the mark, for they're all just its followers.
The voice that says it's good or right: Use that voice to take itself apart.
You don't have to use any other voice.
Make it turn around and dig up its own source.
§ If you don't know how to look for your own faults, you're not practicing the Dhamma.
To focus on your own faults goes against the flow.
The basic principle in contemplation is that you can't put yourself first.
You have to put the Dhamma first.
The more you know, the more modest you become: That's the nature of the Dhamma.
Whoever says you're stupid, let them go ahead and say it, but make sure you stay full of the Dhamma inside.
Maintain the Dhamma at all costs, in the same way that people carefully protect a cabinet in which the Canon is placed.
Focus on gathering the Dhamma into one point: keeping the mind in a proper stance without fastening onto anything.
And as to how you protect it, and how it requires care and circumspection: That's something you have to discover for yourself.
§ Right views and right awareness see everything as Dhamma.
In other words, they see all the events of fabrication in line with the three characteristics.
§ We have to contemplate the genuine essence of the Dhamma so that when we look outward we can see it all as Dhamma, without labeling it as good or bad.
Try using your eyes to look in a way that doesn't involve labeling.
See everything as nature following in line with causes and conditions.
Or see everything as Dhamma pure and simple.
Then see if the mind feels open, empty, and light.
The Dhamma that you can study in books is not the genuine essence of the Dhamma.
To see the genuine essence of the Dhamma you have to strip away all conventional formulations, leaving nature pure and simple, free of any “being” or “having.
Contemplation that uses thoughts is still external, not internal.
Internal contemplation has to be a focused watching that's motionless and still.
It's a contemplation that's composed of focused watching, not something that's thought out.
§ Your contemplation has to go through many layers, not one.
The first layer is to watch on the level of perceptions and labels.
Next you watch thoughts.
And then next you watch awareness.
If you're watching labels, see them simply as labels: the act of recognition, the awareness that you've recognized something, and then the label disbands.
If you're watching thoughts, see how a thought arises, what it's about, and then how it disbands.
Then a new thought arises, and it too disbands.
This is the second level.
Then you watch awareness, the awareness of the mind pure and simple, a sensation that arises right at the mind.
Watch that sensation right at the mind and see how it disbands in just the same way.
§ We have to use mindfulness and discernment, which are like extremely sharp shovels and hoes, to dig down to our sense of self.
Then we can turn it over and look at it from all sides to see exactly where it's our self.
Try contemplating the form, feeling, perception, fabrication, or consciousness that you hold onto so tightly, to see exactly where it's constant, pleasurable, or self.
§ We haven't contemplated the pile of five aggregates — which is changing before our very eyes — in order to see correctly its natural conditions as they appear.
That's why we've fallen for the allure of attachment and clinging that give rise to the sense of self that functions as the “taker,” the “consumer,” the “receiver of results.” And then we have to suffer by entering into the consuming and receiving — all without realizing it.
In fact, we want more.
For instance, when we receive the results of a mind that's quiet and at ease, we want them to stay that way.
When they change, we get all stirred up.
But if we understand the principles of inconstancy, stress, and not-self, we can let go.
We don't have to hold on tight.
Right here is the path to release.
§ You've come here to practice specifically for the sake of putting an end to your sufferings and defilements, so you have to forget everything else.
You don't have to concern yourself with lots of things.
Simply focus your attention on your own body and mind, and everything will grow empty on its own.
You don't have to go desiring the emptiness.
Don't get yourself embroiled because of desire.
§ Instead of letting go of the things you should let go, you feed them more fuel so that they flare up even stronger.
Instead of dealing with the things you should abstain from or give up or weaken or destroy, you don't deal with them at all.
And then you keep looking for new meditation techniques!
Your defilements are arising right in your face, right in the mind, with every moment, and yet you don't deal with them.
All you do is look for things outside to delude yourself.
§ The practice of the Dhamma is a way of curing the illnesses inside the heart and mind, so we have to devote ourselves to the practice to the utmost of our abilities.
We have to practice heedfully so that defilement, craving, and clinging will grow lighter.
We have to focus and contemplate continuously at all times so as to destroy our attachment to self.
This is the most important work in our lives: contemplating physical and mental phenomena to see their inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness.
And we have to keep at this work all throughout life as long as the defilements haven't yet ended.
We keep looking, contemplating, letting go, continually.
§ The hot defilements are easy to see, but the cool, damp defilements — such as love, desire, affection — that burn the mind with a cool, damp fire, as poisonous as acid: Those are hard to see.
You have to examine yourself so that you know them for what they are.
Otherwise you'll keep accumulating the fungus that causes damp rot within you.
§ The more your attention goes leaking outside, the more stupid you become.
The more you focus inside, the sharper you become — and the more you'll be able to disband your sufferings and defilements.
The more you focus outside, the more you pick up the fungus that causes damp rot, and the more you become a garbage pit.
§ When we see defilements showing themselves in other people, we can see how ugly they are by seeing how ugly those people act.
But when they show up in ourselves, we see them as good and right.
This is where we're inconsistent, seeing our own defilements as our close friends — in line with the old saying, “Seeing a bladed discus as a petaled lotus.” Is that the way we are?
This is something really worth looking into.
§ If you know how to focus on the arising of defilement — whether it's greed or anger — even it arises only a little bit, you should focus on staring it down to the point where you can snuff it out.
If you don't make use of this approach, you won't have the strength to fight it off.
If you feed it fuel until it starts fabricating all out of bounds, it will flare up as a huge fire and you won't be able to put it out.
If you want to put it out, you have to snuff it out in the very first stage where it appears as a slight sense of liking or disliking.
You have to keep contemplating to see — when the mind is empty as it is right now — how these feelings arise.
You have to contemplate to see how they disappear and how you can make sure that nothing else will arise to fabricate them any further.
Your awareness of the stem-point of fabrication is a means of snuffing out suffering right from the start — a means that's correct and uses the least strength.
§ Snuffing out blatant greed and anger isn't easy, for their roots are still in place; they're still nourished by fertilizer.
That's why they have to keep flowering and bearing fruit.
So if we really want to take the approach that's quickest and most correct, we have to focus down on destroying delusion — our lack of familiarity with the truth.
§ Focus right on the issue of how defilements, when they arise, make the mind murky, bothered, and hot.
Then contemplate how to disband them.
When they disband, does the mind feel cool?
Keep looking right there.
The coolness here doesn't come from our making it cool.
It's cool in and of itself, without our having to shower it with water.
It's the feeling-tone of the mind when it can let go of something.
It's cool in and of itself.
§ Contemplating yourself repeatedly gives you a sense of the mind's higher nature that can pull you up to release.
It's a means of dispersing the side of the mind that used to fasten onto things so that it grows weaker and weaker with regard to everything of every sort.
You do this through the power of mindfulness and discernment, not through the power of defilement, craving, or clinging.
§ When the mind is struggling to get something, just watch it at first.
Only when it stops struggling should you deal with the issue in line with what's appropriate.
In this way, desire will grow weaker, and your actions will lie under the power of mindfulness and discernment.
§ If we don't experiment with using the power of mindfulness and discernment to win out over defilement, we'll stay ignorant as always.
We'll just keep on eating and living at our own convenience, but when anything strikes we'll start spinning away, grasping after all kinds of things.
This is because we haven't worked at developing endurance and tolerance.
We haven't trained ourselves to endure looking at pain and suffering, to endure focusing on pain and suffering, to see how heavy they are, to see whose pains and suffering they are.
Only if we endure looking at the pain and suffering, endure focusing on the pain and suffering, until the pain and suffering dissipate: That's when we'll gain great benefits from our practice.
§ We have to train ourselves a great deal in contemplating pain, focusing on pain, to the point where we can let go of pain and the mind doesn't fall in line with pain.
The pain then doesn't go any further than the body.
As for pleasure, you don't have to latch onto it.
You don't have to be pleased by pleasure.
You have to see pleasure and pain as equal.
They're equally inconstant and stressful, as they've been from the very beginning.
§ No matter how pain arises while sitting in meditation, you have to endure looking at it until you can let it go.
See it as the stress of physical and mental phenomena, or the stress of the aggregates.
As for the mind, keep it in a state of normalcy, without struggling.
In this way, craving won't arise.
If you let craving arise first, you'll have a hard time letting it go.
It'll thrash all around.
Simply be involved in watching the pain.
When it arises, let it arise.
If it's strong, simply know that it's strong.
Don't let craving arise.
Let there just be the feeling in and of itself.
Notice how it takes shape, how it changes, and simply watch it that way.
Keep any craving at bay.
Or if you want, you can turn and look at the mind pure and simple.
If it's in a turmoil, you can know that craving has already arisen.
If it's at normalcy, watch over it carefully, for it can pick up moods very quickly.
If your attention lapses, it'll go flowing along with a mood.
§ When you go chasing after good and bad, and latch onto your sense of self, you create a huge fuss.
But when you really know clearly, you sort out these problems so that they fade away.
When you really examine all the evidence, you'll see that there's no good or bad arising.
It all disbands.
But then new thought fabrications arise and pass away, arise and pass away.
They keep on flowing, and they seem to involve many, many issues.
But actually there aren't many issues.
There's only arising, remaining, and passing away.
It's because we're not focused on knowing this that the issues come to seem many.
But no matter how many there are, there's just this: arising, remaining, and passing away, one after another, like the rippling of a current of water, where the rippling isn't a thing at all.
If you look into the pattern of the current of your thoughts, fabricating good and bad, you'll find that there's nothing you can latch onto as having any essence, for all these thoughts disband and disappear.
If you learn how to look skillfully in this way, your mind will be empty more than embroiled, for you see the truth that these things all arise, remain, and pass away.
The past has passed away.
The future hasn't yet come.
Look simply at the present arising and passing away right before your eyes — and don't latch on.
When you see arising, remaining, and passing away, pure and simple, right in the present moment and then can let go: Right there is where you gain release.
§ There's an old saying:
In a swift-flowing stream refers to the present, where there's fabrication, change, arising and passing away.
Right there's the Buddha whose Dhamma's supreme means that clear knowing is found right there.
Letting go of attachment occurs right there.
Examine your mind to see what kind of currents it's flowing after.
Then stop to look at them.
Stop to be aware of them.
Ultimately, you'll see that there's actually nothing there, just arising and passing away in emptiness, like a projected image that flashes into being and disappears, empty of any essence.
§ If your looking-inward sees all the way through, you'll see that none of the things of the world have any value at all, for the highest value lies with the mind imbued with clear knowing, bright and clean.
Even if this knowing is only momentary, it means that your practice isn't in vain.
You can take it as your guide to continue following until you disband suffering and defilement without trace.
§ The internal sense of the mind will show itself of its own accord.
Like a diamond embedded in rock: When the rock is cut away, the sparkle and shine of the diamond show themselves of their own accord.
In the same way, when the mind is embedded in defilement, craving, and clinging, it's totally dark, totally in the dark.
There's no light or brightness to it at all.
But when our cutting tools — mindfulness and discernment — bring out its facets, the mind will be bright on its own.
§ The Dhamma covers many topics, but they're all gathered at the mind.
Defilements are a kind of dhamma, as are discernment and the five aggregates.
Everything's dhamma.
Now, what we want is the highest dhamma, the dhamma that's unfabricated.
We want to know what it's like, so where does it lie?
It lies right here in the mind.
The mind that isn't fabricated, that's empty of itself: That's the genuine dhamma.
§ In contemplating the phenomena of the present — the way things arise, remain, and disband — you have to keep looking until you see through to that which doesn't arise or disband.
When you fully comprehend arising, remaining, and disbanding, you'll come face to face with emptiness.
§ Emptiness isn't empty in the way you'd sit and say to yourself, “There's nothing there at all.” There are things there: The eye sees sights, the ear hears sounds, and so on.
They're empty simply in that the mind doesn't enter in to label them, to concoct anything out of them, to cling to them, liking or disliking them, that's all.
They're empty in that the mind is free from attachment.
§ If you don't know how to extinguish things, how to let go, you'll get stuck on every level of the path.
If you get stuck on the delicious flavor of emptiness or stillness, that's delusion's version of nibbana.
§ The practice requires that you pass through a lot of things.
If you gain new knowledge and latch onto it, that will create an obstacle along your way.
It's like taking a journey: If you run across something strange and new, and you're not willing to continue along your way because you get contented with where you already are, you end up setting up house right there.
Your ability to continue on the journey depends on an awareness that sees clearly all the way through.
But here your awareness isn't clear all the way through, and yet you set up house right here, thinking that nibbana lies right here at the emptiness.
That opinion is what blocks your way.
If you take that sense of stillness and emptiness simply as a resting spot, it holds little danger, for you still have the opportunity to continue along your way.
The path that snuffs out defilement has to focus on snuffing out the view that latches onto knowledge and views.
You have to recognize the stages of the path that you need as resting spots, and to realize that you're holding onto them simply as temporary dwellings.
If you grip them tightly, you'll get stuck there and will go no further.
§ If your awareness focuses down like this again and again and again, the mind will ultimately have to surrender.
Its old habit of wandering around to know this and that will gradually calm down and grow still without your having to force it, for it won't be able to withstand your constant gaze.
Every time you look at it, you'll see its deceptiveness.
You'll see that it's not worthy of credence, not worthy of attachment, and so that deceptiveness will have to shrink away.
It's like a person who comes to flatter you.
As soon as you focus your gaze on him and realize what he's up to, he has to shrink away in embarrassment.
To focus on the point where your sense of self arises, your mindfulness and discernment have to develop many approaches from many angles, using tricks that you figure out on your own.
The basic trick is a small thing: Look for the point where the sense of self disbands on its own.
If your awareness doesn't penetrate clearly into the disbanding of the property of consciousness, there's no way you can know how mental states arise and pass away.
There's no way you can know how they wander around to take on objects, how they fall into the swirling currents of good and bad thought-fabrication, or how they get all wound up in a turmoil.
So when you choose your focus, focus directly on the disbanding of mental states.
When they take on an object, do they then disband?
Keep looking until you can see how they disband on their own.
If you can't manage this, focus first on the disbanding of physical and mental phenomena.
When you clearly see the disbanding of physical and mental phenomena, you'll know for yourself how the consciousness which knows that disbanding also disbands on its own, each and every moment it knows those things.
Knowing the disbanding of consciousness is very useful.
No matter how it arises, consciousness always disbands on its own.
That way you won't latch onto the idea that it has a self of any kind.
To know the disbanding of consciousness pure and simple is to know the disbanding of everything.
It's like opening up the entire world, or stripping off the entire world and throwing it away.
When you can strip it away, throw it off, and let it go, there's nothing but emptiness, an emptiness that's bright and clear, with no sense of the world at all.
The words “world” and “five aggregates” are simply conventions to help us see how there's change.
§ To become acquainted with the property of awareness pure and simple, you have to observe the mind's movements in response to contact.
You have to know arising and passing away, and you have to observe the awareness that accompanies the mind, which lies deep within the mind or in the property of consciousness.
If it's not fabricated or labeled, it will stay quiet.
It will maintain its stance.
If you want to see how long it can maintain its stance, you have to observe its movements in response to contact or in response to the internal sensation of labeling.
When these things arise, can that awareness maintain its stance?
If it can't, it will get fabricated into distraction.
And by the time the matter calms down, you'll be worn out.
If you can see into the condition of awareness pure and simple, you'll know your foundation — your inner foundation.
In the beginning, you have to depend on mindfulness as your foundation for focusing on in.
Then you focus on looking to know the condition of change, of arising and passing away.
This is focused looking, not simple looking.
Simple looking doesn't lead to any knowledge.
It's delusion.
Focused looking to the point of giving rise to clear knowing is, in and of itself, a means of destroying delusion.
On whatever level you're free from fabrication, from mental labels, or free from attachment, it's a means of clear knowing within the mind or the property of consciousness.
§ For your awareness to reach into the gathering point of the mind or of the property of consciousness pure and simple, you have to focus on the condition of change within the mind itself.
You do this to destroy the deep seeds of the property of consciousness.
These seeds, which lie continually in the property of consciousness, are very refined.
These are the seeds of sensual craving, craving for becoming, and craving for non-becoming.
Sensual craving is something fairly easy to observe.
The way it moves in to create desire for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations is something fairly easy to see.
As for the more latent seeds of craving for becoming — the craving to be or have a self or things belonging to a self — these lie deep.
So we have to look deeply in if we want to destroy them…
If you can see all the way through to these seeds and can destroy them, that will be your path to release from suffering.
This gathering point of the property of consciousness pure and simple, or of the property of awareness pure and simple, is thus something really worth looking into.
If you don't gather your awareness to look into this point, you'll find it hard to destroy the seeds.
Whatever seeds you do destroy will be external seeds, such as those in sensory pleasures.
But the seeds that are latent tendencies lying within the mind or the property of consciousness have no intentions of their own.
That's why we rarely see all the way into them, why we rarely know them, rarely see them.
This is because we play around with their children, their followers: sensory pleasures.
We don't focus on in to look inside to get any perspective at all.
§ The unintentional tendencies that lie deep your character: You can't intentionally get rid of them at the drop of a hat.
The only way to get rid of them is to contemplate inwardly step by step so that you know them clearly.
You have to reach the basic level of knowing that's unintentional if you want to get rid of the other unintentional things in the mind.
§ The property of consciousness contains within it the sense of being or having a self.
It contains the seeds that give rise to being and having in the same way that a seed contains bark, branches, and leaves.
If you focus in to know the condition of the property of name and form pure and simple, that in and of itself will destroy the seeds for rebirth.
§ We have to contemplate to see natural conditions of both sorts, starting with the changing condition of such things as the aggregates, penetrating through to the unchanging condition which is the total disbanding of suffering…
The sort that changes keeps changing its disguises without respite, deceiving us into latching onto it as genuine and true.
In particular, our fascination with pleasurable feelings: Even when we train the mind to be still, we're hoping for the delicious flavor of the pleasurable feeling.
This is because we haven't contemplated the deceptiveness of feelings of every sort.
Some arahants gain awakening through becoming acquainted with feeling and destroying the obsessions that lie latent in all three kinds of feeling.
Obsession with irritation lies latent in painful feeling.
As soon as pain arises, whether it's mental or physical pain, irritation arises in the mind.
Obsession with passion lies latent in pleasant feeling.
We like pleasure of every kind, wanting it to stay with us for a long time.
When a feeling of equanimity — neither pleasure nor pain — arises, we get absorbed in the equanimity because we don't know that it's just a feeling that has to arise and pass away in line with its conditions.
This is why obsession with ignorance lies latent in equanimous feeling.
How do we let go of these obsessions?
This is something to which we should give a lot of attention, because feeling has a lot of allure that can engender craving.
For example, when the mind is still and empty and then changes so that it's no longer still and empty, we want it to be still and empty again.
The more we want, the more it's not empty.
If we can disband the desire for emptiness, that in and of itself will let the mind will grow empty again.
Desire is what gets the mind embroiled in a turmoil; so desire is what we have to disband.
We practice restraint of the senses so as to disband desire, because the mind is always desiring to see the sights, hear the sounds, smell the aromas, taste the flavors, and touch the tactile sensations surrounding it on all sides.
It's because we don't know how desire is the cause of suffering that we struggle to satisfy our desires — and then all kinds of suffering follow.
§ The word sankhata-dhamma — fabricated phenomena — covers conditions of nature that are marked by the three characteristics.
The things we have to study are summarized in two words: sankhata dhamma and asankhata dhamma.
Both of these terms have a deep and wide range of meaning, especially sankhata dhammas, which are always inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
The conditions of sankhata dhamma follow their own swirling currents without end.
As for asankhata dhamma — the phenomenon that doesn't change, isn't stressful, but is still not-self — that's something hard to know.
But even this refined, subtle condition is something that we shouldn't latch onto.
§ When the mind stops, grows still, and is aware of itself, let it focus even more deeply on itself, for its stopping-state is the mental state that's concentrated or in equanimity: still, neutral, neither pleased nor displeased.
This is a type of fabrication called aneñjabhisankhara — imperturbable fabrication — or if you want, you can call it neutral fabrication.
When you focus on it, see it simply as an aspect of nature.
Don't get sucked into the stillness, the neutrality, or the equanimity.
At the same time, though, you do have to depend on the equanimity to focus in on seeing things as aspects of nature, pure and simple.
This is a way of disbanding any fabrication of liking or disliking, good or bad.
For this reason, we don't stop just at the equanimity.
We have to see all the way through it, that it's an aspect of nature free of self.
§ When the fabricated aspects of nature disband, the mind stays with its awareness of equanimity.
Then you focus on the equanimity to be aware of it as an aspect of nature, without using any labels or words.
Simply focus on in to watch it, to become acquainted with the aspect of nature that lies further in, without labeling anything at all.
As you see into every level of nature pure and simple, things get deeper and more profound.
You know and let go, know and let go, know and let go — empty!
Whatever appears, you let go.
The important principle in your gazing inward is simply to let go.
You look, you see, and you let go.
Incline the mind to letting go.
Look in absolute stillness, with no inner conversation.
Know and let go.
Mindfulness keeps knowing through letting go of everything.
The breath doesn't disappear.
No matter how still or empty the mind, you're aware with every breath.
If you don't know in this way, you'll soon lose focus and get distracted, or a fabrication of some sort will interfere so that you lose your foundation.
§ When the mind fabricates unskillful thoughts — thoughts of sensual passion, thoughts of ill will, thoughts of harmfulness — these are all called demeritorious fabrications.
When the mind gains a sense of the drawbacks of sensual passion and develops a sense of distrust, disgust, and distaste for sensual passion, that's how you cleanse the mind of sensual passion, so that it's not stuck on sensual passion, so that it's stuck instead on disenchantment.
When the mind sees the drawbacks of ill will and thinks instead in terms of good will and forgiveness, that's how you destroy ill will.
When you see the drawbacks of harmfulness, you then think or act in ways that aren't harmful.
All of these things are called meritorious fabrications.
When the mind fabricates these things, whether meritorious or demeritorious, it puts itself into a turmoil.
Skillful thoughts have to keep thinking so as to do away with unskillful thoughts.
If you think too much, it can make you tired, both in body and mind.
When this happens, you have to focus on a single preoccupation to bring the mind to concentration.
When you focus in concentration, throwing away both meritorious and demeritorious fabrications, and instead stay continuously stopped in a single preoccupation, this falls into the characteristics of imperturbable fabrication.
The sense of being snugly still or equanimous for long periods of time, may not fit into the definition of imperturbable fabrications as jhana or the higher absorptions.
It's simply a type of immovability endowed with mindfulness and discernment.
The mind is aware of itself, focuses its gaze right on itself, and knows itself continuously, without fabricating thoughts of good or evil.
But this, too, can be included under imperturbable fabrication.
For that reason we have to find the aspect of the mind that can maintain its stance so as to see further in, so that it's not stuck on imperturbable fabrication.
We have to penetrate to the point where we can see clearly in terms of the arising, remaining, and passing away, the inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness that are gathered in here as well.
§ You have to sharpen this basic principle of knowing so that it's razor sharp — so that you can see the truth that nothing has any true essence, that it's all illusory.
“Knowing” and “not knowing” trade places so that they seem to be different, but if you get stuck on this duality, you're stuck on yourself.
If you're really going to know, you have to know both sides: the side that knows and the side that doesn't know, to see that they're both inconstant in the same way, both deceitful in the same way.
§ Your sense of physical and mental phenomena is all fabrication.
Mindfulness is a fabrication.
Discernment is a fabrication.
Even the still mind is a fabrication.
When it's not still, it's a fabrication.
So look at fabrication deeply, precisely, from all angles, inside and out.
Knowledge — even the observer, the knower — is also fabrication.
They're all fabrication, whether they're right or wrong, good or bad.
So you have to acquaint yourself thoroughly with fabrication.
When you know fabrication thoroughly, in a way that penetrates inwardly, it gives rise to a sense of disenchantment.
If you don't do this, you'll take your pick of the good fabrications to hold onto, and push the bad fabrications away.
§ We can recognize fabrications in that they change and can disband.
And then we realize that we've been playing around with these fake, imitation things all along.
Even clear knowing is a fabrication.
It changes in line with physical and mental conditions.
Mindfulness, discernment, and intuitive knowing-and-seeing are all fabrications — just that they're good fabrications that we have to depend on for the time being.
We have to understand fabrications, understand how to use fabrications in a correct way, and then simply let them go.
We don't have to keep holding onto them.
§ Knowing is a fabrication.
Not-knowing is a fabrication.
When we examine them internally we see that they both arise and pass away.
Even the truths that we know in this way don't stay long.
They have to turn into not-knowing.
From this we can see that fabrications play all sorts of tricks on many, many levels, and we get deluded into playing along with them.
When we can get to know the tricks of fabrication of every sort on every level, that will be really beneficial.
We'll really know in line with what the Buddha said: Sabbe sankhara aniccati — All fabrications are inconstant.
This is an important principle that will enable us to see through to the stressfulness in every sort of fabrication.
Even good fabrications, like mindfulness and discernment, are stressful in and of themselves because that have to keep changing.
They're like tools we use for the time being, but we shouldn't stay fastened onto them.
§ Even though we have to look after the foundation of our knowing, using mindfulness and discernment to supervise the mind, we should understand that the mind is a form of fabrication.
Mindfulness and discernment are fabrications.
If we know only on a superficial level and go around talking about what we've been able to let go on our level of practice, we haven't seen deeply into fabrication.
When this is the case, we still lie in the swirling currents of fabrication.
Correct knowledge, which is fabrication of a good sort, has to be trained to read and decipher things within and without, including itself, on many convoluted levels.
Once you've seen inconstancy and stress, you have to see through to the lack of self in fabrications of every sort.
§ You have to know that fabrication is inconstant, stressful, and has no self to itself.
Keep looking at this point over and over again until it becomes clear to the heart.
Only then will you develop a sense of disenchantment and dispassion.
You won't fasten onto good fabrications or push bad ones away, for you've seen that they have the same price, they're both equally changeable.
Even though we maintain the stance of our knowing in looking over the mind to make sure that it isn't fabricated even more from outside conditions, still we don't stay fastened onto the knowing, for it too has to change.
There come times when we think we know the truth in this matter, but then at later times or later moments even clearer knowing arises.
That enables us to know that what we thought was true knowing actually wasn't.
This knowing can change.
No matter how much higher it goes as it changes, you have to remember that it's still fabrication; it can still change no matter what level it is.
Whether it's crude or refined, you have to know it thoroughly.
Otherwise you'll stay fastened to it.
If you can look in a way that sees all fabrications thoroughly — good, bad, right, wrong, the “knower,” the “not-knower” — simply as the same sort of thing, your knowledge will gradually rise above these things.
But even though it's above, it's still fabrication.
It hasn't yet gained release from fabrication.
Even the path is a form of fabrication.
So when we develop the path, when we develop the factor of right view, we have to see rightly into this matter, seeing clearly into fabrication of every sort, no matter what the characteristics of our knowing.
Whether we look at physical phenomena or mental phenomena arising and passing away, they're all fabrications.
Even the mind firmly established in concentration is a form of fabrication, as are the stages of jhana.
§ If we don't look inward, we make the mind dark and murky.
Then when sensory contact comes, the mind can easily get all stirred up.
So I ask that you make an effort to peer carefully inward to see what's there in the mind, to see how things arise, to see how mental labels and fabrications arise.
That way you'll be able to disband them, destroy them, leaving just the mind pure and simple, with no labels or attachments at all.
It will then be empty of defilement.
You might call it your inner beauty, Miss Emptiness, who doesn't have to age, doesn't have to grow ill, doesn't have to die — a primal nature that doesn't change.
This is something you have to touch right at the mind.
It's not the mind itself, but the mind itself is what makes contact with it.
§ When we practice we're like diamond cutters.
Our diamond — the mind — is embedded in dense, dark defilements.
We have to use mindfulness and discernment — or virtue, concentration, and discernment — as our cutting tools to make the mind pure in all its thoughts, words, and deeds.
Then we train the mind to grow still and to contemplate so as to give rise to clear knowledge all the way to the point where you meet with what's totally pure and free from defilements and mental fermentations: our “Miss Emptiness” who is so extremely beautiful, free from change, whom the King of Death can't see.
And as to whether this is something worth aspiring to, I leave it up to you to decide.
My thanks go to all the nuns, anagarikas, laymen and women who have listened time and again to my expositions of the Buddha's teachings.
Without them, these talks would not have happened and this little booklet would not be possible.
A very special “thank you” to my friends, who have encouraged and supported my work and the publication of this book by their continued understanding and generosity.
Those who have typed the manuscript from tapes made during the talks, have given freely of their time, energy and love to the propagation of the Dhamma.
May everyone connected with this joint undertaking reap the excellent kamma caused by their gift.
This little volume is offered to all people everywhere, who know dukkha which is not only suffering, pain and grief, but all the unsatisfactoriness all of us experience during our lifetime.
It is that unfulfilled striving in heart and mind which keeps pushing us in so many directions to find the ultimate satisfaction.
When we have realized that all the avenues we have tried have brought us to a dead end, then the time has come to turn to Lord Buddha's teachings and see for ourselves whether his promise:
can be experienced within ourselves and whether fulfillment is possible.
As practice progresses, we will find that by letting go of our preconceived ideas on how and where dukkha can be avoided, we come upon uncharted landscapes within ourselves, which provide a totally new concept of life, its purpose, its value and its ultimate reality.
May there be many “with little dust in their eyes” who can turn the tide on dukkha and be liberated.
The following Pali words encompass concepts and levels of ideas for which there are no adequate synonyms in English.
The explanations of these terms have been adapted from the Buddhist Dictionary by Nyanatiloka Mahathera.
Anagami: the “non-returner” is a noble disciple on the rd stage of holiness.
Anatta: “No-self,” non-ego, egolessness, impersonality; “neither within the bodily and mental phenomena of existence nor outside of them can be found anything that in the ultimate sense could be regarded as a self-existing real ego-identity, soul or any other abiding substance.
Anicca: “Impermanence,” a basic feature of all conditional phenomena, be they material or mental, coarse or subtle, one's own or external.
Anusaya: The seven “proclivities,” inclinations or tendencies.
Arahat/arahant: The Holy One.
Through the extinction of all cankers he reaches already in this very life the deliverance of mind, the deliverance through wisdom, which is free from cankers and which he himself has understood and realized.
Ariya: Noble Ones.
Noble Persons.
Avijja: Ignorance, nescience, unknowing, synonymous with delusion, is the primary root of all evil and suffering in the world, veiling man's mental eyes and preventing him from seeing the true nature of things.
Bhavaraga: Craving for continued existence; one of the seven tendencies.
Citta-viveka: Mental detachment, the inner detachment from sensuous things.
Devas: Heavenly Beings, deities, celestials are beings who live in happy worlds, but are not freed from the cycle of existence.
Dhamma: The liberating law discovered and proclaimed by the Buddha, summed up in the Four Noble Truths.
Ditthi: View, belief, speculative opinion.
If not qualified by “right,” it mostly refers to wrong and evil view or opinion.
Dukkha: In common usage: “pain,” painful feeling, which may be bodily or mental.
In Buddhist usage as, e.g., in the Four Noble Truths: suffering, ill, the unsatisfactory nature and general insecurity of all conditioned phenomena.
Jhana: Meditative absorptions.
Tranquillity meditation.
Kalyanamitta: Noble or good friend is called a senior monk who is the mentor and friend of his pupil, wishing for his welfare and concerned with his progress, guiding his meditation; in particular the meditation teacher.
Kamma/Karma: “Action” denotes the wholesome and unwholesome volitions and their concomitant mental factors, causing rebirth and shaping the character of beings and thereby their destiny.
The term does not signify the result of actions and most certainly not the deterministic fate of man.
Kaya-viveka: Bodily detachment, i.e., abiding in solitude free from alluring sensuous objects.
Khandha: The five “groups” are called the five aspects in which the Buddha has summed up all the physical and mental phenomena of existence, and which appear to the ordinary man as his ego or personality, to wit: body, feeling, perception, mental formations and consciousness.
Lokiya: “Mundane,” are all those states of consciousness and mental factors arising in the worldling, as well as in the noble one, which are not associated with the supermundane.
Lokuttara: “Supermundane,” is a term for the four paths and four fruitions.
Magga-phala: Path and fruit.
First arises the path-consciousness, immediately followed by “fruition,” a moment of supermundane awareness.
Mana: Conceit, pride, one of the ten fetters binding to existence, also one of the underlying tendencies.
Mara: The Buddhist “tempter” figure, the personification of evil and passions, of the totality of worldly existence and of death.
Metta: Loving-kindness, one of the four sublime emotions.
Nibbana: lit.
“Extinction,” to cease blowing, to become extinguished.
Nibbana constitutes the highest and ultimate goal of all Buddhist aspirations, i.e., absolute extinction of that life-affirming will manifested as greed, hate and delusion and clinging to existence, thereby the absolute deliverance from all future rebirth.
Nivarana: “Hindrances,” five qualities which are obstacles to the mind and blind our mental vision, and obstruct concentration to wit: sensual desire, ill-will, sloth and torpor, restlessness and worry, and sceptical doubt.
Papañca: “Proliferation,” lit.
expansion, diffuseness, detailed exposition, development, manifoldness, multiplicity, differentiation.
Paticcasamuppada: “Dependent Origination” is the doctrine of the conditionality of all physical and psychical phenomena.
Puthujjana: lit.
“one of the many folk,” worldling, ordinary man, anyone still possessed of all the ten fetters binding to the round of rebirths.
Sacca: Truth, such as the “Four Noble Truths.
Sakadagamami: The once-returner, having shed the lower fetters, reappears in a higher world to reach Nibbana.
Sakkaya-ditthi: Personality-belief is the first of the fetters and is abandoned at stream-entry.
Samatha: Tranquillity, serenity, is a synonym of samadhi.
Samsara: Round of rebirth, lit.
“perpetual wandering,” is a name by which is designated the sea of life ever restlessly heaving up and down.
Sangha: lit.
Congregation, is the name for the community of monks and nuns.
As the third of the Three Gems and the Three Refuges, it applies to the community of the Noble Ones.
Samvega: “The sources of emotion,” or a sense of urgency.
Sankhara: Most general usage: formations.
Mental formations and kamma formations.
Sometimes: bodily functions or mental functions.
Also: anything formed.
Silabbata-paramasa: Attachment to mere rules and rituals is the third fetter and one of the four kinds of clinging.
It disappears on attaining to stream-entry.
Sotapatti: Stream-entry, the first attainment of becoming a noble one.
Vicikiccha: Sceptical doubt is one of the five mental hindrances and one of the three fetters which disappears forever at stream-entry.
Vipassana: Insight into the truth of the impermanence, suffering and impersonality of all corporeal and mental phenomena of existence.
Yatha-bhuta-ñana-dassana: The knowledge and vision according to reality, is one of eighteen chief kinds of insight.
The first line of this chant proclaims real faith in the Dhamma.
Not believing everything without inquiring, but an inner relationship of trust.
When one is faithful to someone, then one also trusts that person, one gives oneself into his or her hands, has a deep connection and an inner opening.
How much more is this true of the faith in the teaching of the Buddha.
Those aspects of the Dhamma which we don't understand yet can be left in abeyance.
Yet that doesn't shake our faith and trust.
If we feel that it is “perfectly expounded,” then we are very fortunate, for we know one thing in this universe which is perfect.
There's nothing else to be found that's without blemish, nor is there anything that is becoming perfect.
If we have that trust, faithfulness and love towards the Dhamma and believe it to be perfectly expounded, then we have found something beyond compare.
We are blessed with an inner wealth.
“To be seen here and now,” is up to each of us.
the Dhamma has been made clear by the Enlightened One who taught it out of compassion, but we have to see it ourselves with an inner vision.
“Here and now,” needs to be stressed, because it means not forgetting but being aware of the Dhamma in each moment.
This awareness helps us to watch our reactions before they result in unskillful words or actions.
Seeing the positive within us and cultivating it, seeing the negative and substituting it.
When we believe all our thoughts and claim justification for them, we're not seeing the Dhamma.
There are no justifications, there are only arising phenomena which cease again.
“Not a matter of time,” means that we are not dependent upon a Buddha being alive in order to practice the Dhamma; though this is a wide-spread belief, it is quite possible to practice now.
Some people think there has to be a perfect situation or a perfect teacher or perfect meditation.
None of that is true.
Mental and physical phenomena are constantly coming and going, changing without pause.
When we hang onto them and consider them ours, then we will believe any story our mind will tell us, without discrimination.
We consist of body, feelings, perceptions, mental formations and consciousness, which we grip tightly and believe them to be “me” and “mine.” We need to take a step back and be a neutral observer of the whole process.
The understanding of the Dhamma leads us into our inner depth.
We are not invited to come and see a meditation hall or a Buddha statue, a dagoba or a shrine.
We are invited to come and see the phenomena arising within us.
The defilements as well as the purifications are to be found inside one's own heart and mind.
Our minds are very busy, always remembering, planning, hoping or judging.
This body could also be very busy picking up little stones and throwing them into the water all day long.
But we would consider that a foolish expenditure of energy, and we direct the body towards something useful.
We need to do the same with the mind.
Instead of thinking about this and that, allowing the defilements to arise, we could also direct the mind towards something beneficial such as investigating our likes and dislikes, our desires and rejections, our ideas and views.
When the mind inquires, it doesn't get involved in its own creations.
It can't do both at the same time.
As it becomes more and more observant, it remains objective for longer periods of time.
That's why the Buddha taught that mindfulness is the one way for the purification of beings.
The clear and lucid observation of all arising phenomena eventually shows that there are only phenomena manifesting as mind and body, which are constantly expanding and contracting in the same way as the universe does.
Unless we become very diligent observers, we will not see that aspect of mind and body and will not know the Dhamma “here and now,” even though we have been “invited to come and see.
No one can know the Dhamma for another.
We can chant, read, discuss and listen, but unless we watch all that arises, we will not know the Dhamma by ourselves.
There's only one place where Dhamma can be known, in one's own heart and mind.
It has to be a personal experience which comes about through constant observation of oneself.
Meditation helps.
Unless one inquires into one's own reactions and knows why one wants one thing and rejects another, one hasn't seen Dhamma.
Then the mind will also get a clear perception of impermanence because our desires and dislikes are constantly changing.
We'll see that the mind which is thinking and the body which is breathing are both painful.
When the mind doesn't operate with an uplifted, transcending awareness, it creates suffering.
Only a measureless, illumined mind is free from that.
The body certainly produces dukkha in many ways through its inability to remain steady.
Seeing this clearly will give us a strong determination to know Dhamma by ourselves.
Wisdom arises within and comes from an understood experience.
Neither knowledge nor listening can bring it about.
Wisdom also means maturity, which has nothing to do with age.
Sometimes aging may help, but it doesn't always do that either.
Wisdom is an inner knowing which creates self-confidence.
We need not look for somebody else's confirmation and good-will, we know with certainty.
When we chant anything at all, it is vital that we know the meaning of the words and inquire whether they have any connection to ourselves.
The Buddha said:
If we can practice one line of Dhamma, it's so much more valuable than knowing the whole chanting book by heart.
The arising and ceasing phenomena, which are our teachers, never take a rest.
Dhamma is being taught to us constantly.
All our waking moments are Dhamma teachers, if we make them so.
The Dhamma is the truth expounded by the Enlightened One, which is the law of nature surrounding us and imbedded within us.
Once the Buddha said: “Ananda, it is owing to my being a good friend to them that living beings subject to birth are freed from birth.”.
Everyone needs a good friend, who has enough selflessness, not only to be helpful, but also to point out when one is slipping.
Treading the Dhamma path is like walking a tightrope.
It leads along one straight line and every time one slips, one hurts.
If we have a painful feeling inside, we're no longer on the tightrope of the Dhamma.
Our good friend might say to us then: “You stepped too far to the right, or to the left,.
You weren't careful, that's why you fell into depression and pain.
I'll point out to you when you're slipping next time.” We can only accept this from someone whom we trust and have confidence in.
One can be fooled by a person's beautiful words or splendid appearance.
The character of a person is shown not only in words, but in the small day-to-day activities.
One of the very important guidelines to a person's character is how they react when things go wrong.
It's easy to be loving, helpful and friendly when everything goes well, but when difficulties arise our endurance and patience are being tested as well as our equanimity and determination.
The less ego-consciousness one has, the easier one can handle all situations.
At first, when one starts to walk on the tightrope of the Dhamma path, it may feel uncomfortable.
One isn't used to balancing oneself, but rather to swaying all over the place, going in all directions, wherever it's most comfortable.
One may feel restricted and coerced, not being allowed to live according to one's natural instincts.
Yet in order to walk on a tightrope, one has to restrict oneself in many ways with mindfulness.
These restrictions may at first feel irksome, like fetters or bonds, later they turn out to be the liberating factors.
To have this perfect jewel of the Dhamma in our hearts, we need to be awake and aware.
Then we can prove by our own watchfulness that “the Dhamma of the Blessed One is perfectly expounded.” There is no worldly jewel that can match the value of the Dhamma.
Each one of us can become the owner of this priceless gem.
We can call ourselves most fortunate to have such an opportunity.
When we wake up in the morning, let that be our first thought: “What good fortune it is for me to practice the Dhamma.
It's a strange phenomenon how difficult people find it to love themselves.
One would think it is the easiest thing in the world, because we're constantly concerned with ourselves.
We're always interested in how much we can get, how well we can perform, how comfortable we can be.
The Buddha mentioned in a discourse that “oneself is dearest to oneself.” So with all that, why is it so difficult to actually love oneself?
Loving oneself certainly doesn't mean indulging oneself.
Really loving is an attitude towards oneself that most people don't have, because they know quite a few things about themselves which are not desirable.
Everybody has innumerable attitudes, reactions, likes and dislikes which they'd be better off without.
Judgment is made and while one likes one's positive attitudes, one dislikes the others.
With that comes suppression of those aspects of oneself that one is not pleased with.
One doesn't want to know about them and doesn't acknowledge them.
That's one way of dealing with oneself, which is detrimental to growth.
Another unskillful way is to dislike that part of oneself which appears negative and every time it arises one blames oneself, which makes matters twice as bad as they were before.
With that comes fear and very often aggression.
If one wants to deal with oneself in a balanced way, it's not useful to pretend that the unpleasant part doesn't exist, those aggressive, irritable, sensual, conceited tendencies.
If we pretend we are far from reality and put a split into ourselves.
Even though such a person may be totally sane, the appearance given is that of not being quite real.
We've all come across people like that, who are too sweet to be true, as a result of pretense and suppression.
Blaming oneself doesn't work either.
In both instances one transfers one's own reactions to other people.
One blames others for their deficiencies, real or imagined, or one doesn't see them as ordinary human beings.
Everyone lives in an unreal world, because it's ego-deluded, but this one is particularly unreal, because everything is considered either as perfectly wonderful or absolutely terrible.
The only thing that is real is that we have six roots within us.
Three roots of good and three roots of evil.
The latter are greed, hate and delusion, but we also have their opposites: generosity, loving-kindness and wisdom.
Take an interest in this matter.
If one investigates this and doesn't get anxious about it, then one can easily accept these six roots in everybody.
No difficulty at all, when one has seen them in oneself.
They are the underlying roots of everyone's behavior.
Then we can look at ourselves a little more realistically, namely not blaming ourselves for the unwholesome roots, not patting ourselves on the back for the wholesome ones, but rather accepting their existence within us.
We can also accept others more clear-sightedly and have a much easier time relating to them.
We will not suffer from disappointments and we won't blame, because we won't live in a world where only black or white exists, either the three roots of unwholesomeness or their opposites.
Such a world doesn't exist anywhere, and the only person to be like that is an arahant.
It's largely a matter of degree in everyone else.
These degrees of good and evil are so finely tuned, there's so little difference within the degrees in each one of us, that it really doesn't matter.
Everybody has the same job to do, to cultivate the wholesome tendencies and uproot the unwholesome ones.
Apparently we're all very different.
That too is an illusion.
We're all having the same problems and also the same faculties to deal with them.
The only difference is the length of training that one has had.
Training which may have been going on for a number of lifetimes has brought about a little more clarity, that's all.
Clarity of thinking comes from purification of one's emotions, which is a difficult job that needs to be done.
But it can only be done successfully when it isn't an emotional upheaval, but clearcut, straightforward work that one does on oneself.
When it is considered to be just that, it takes the sting out of it.
The charge of “I'm so wonderful” or “I'm so terrible” is defused.
We are neither wonderful nor terrible.
Everyone is a human being with all the potential and all the obstructions.
If one can love that human being, the one that is “me” with all its faculties and tendencies, then one can love others realistically, usefully and helpfully.
But if one makes a break in the middle and loves the part which is nice and dislikes the part which isn't nice enough, one's never going to come to grips with reality.
One day we'll have to see it, for what it is.
It's a “working ground,” a kammatthana.
It's a straightforward and interesting affair of one's own heart.
If we look at ourselves in that manner, we will learn to love ourselves in a wholesome way.
“Just as a mother at the risk of life, loves and protects her child…” Become your own mother!
If we want to have a relationship with ourselves that is realistic and conducive to growth, then we need to become our own mother.
A sensible mother can distinguish between that which is useful for her child and that which is detrimental.
But she doesn't stop loving the child when it misbehaves.
This may be the most important aspect to look at in ourselves.
Everyone, at one time or another, misbehaves in thought or speech or action.
Most frequently in thought, fairly frequently in speech and not so often in action.
So what do we do with that?
What does a mother do?
She tells the child not to do it again, loves the child as much as she's always loved it and just gets on with the job of bringing up her child.
Maybe we can start to bring up ourselves.
The whole of this training is a matter of maturing.
Maturity is wisdom, which is unfortunately not connected to age.
If it were, it would be very easy.
One would have a guarantee.
Since it isn't it's hard work, a job to be done.
First comes recognition, then learning not to condemn, but to understand: “This is the way it is.” the third step is change.
Recognition may be the hardest part for most people, it's not easy to see what goes on inside of oneself.
This is the most important and the most interesting aspect of contemplation.
We lead a contemplative life, but that does not mean we sit in meditation all day long.
A contemplative life means that one considers every aspect of what happens as part of a learning experience.
One remains introspective under all circumstances.
When one becomes outgoing, with what the Buddha termed “exuberance of youth,” one goes to the world with one's thoughts, speech and action.
One needs to recollect oneself and return within.
A contemplative life in some orders is a life of prayer.
In our way it's a combination of meditation and life-style.
The contemplative life goes on inside of oneself.
One can do the same thing with or without recollection.
Contemplation is the most important aspect of introspection.
It isn't necessary to sit still all day and watch one's breath.
Every move, every thought, every word can give rise to understanding oneself.
This kind of work on oneself will bring about deep inner security, which is rooted in reality.
Most people are wishing and hoping for this kind of security, but are not even able to voice their longing.
Living in a myth, constantly hoping or being afraid is opposed to having inner strength.
The feeling of security arises when one sees reality inside of oneself and thereby the reality in everyone else and comes to terms with it.
Let us accept the fact that the Buddha knew the truth when he said everybody had seven underlying tendencies: sensual desire, ill-will, speculative views, sceptical doubt, conceit, craving for continued existence, ignorance.
Find them in yourself.
Smile at them, do not burst into tears because of them.
Smile and say: “Well, there you are.
I'll do something about you.
The contemplative life is often lived heavy-handedly.
A certain lack of joy is compensated for by being outgoing.
This doesn't work.
One should cultivate a certain light-heartedness, but stay within oneself.
There's nothing to be worried or fearful about, nothing that is too difficult.
Dhamma means the law of nature and we are manifesting this law of nature all the time.
What can there be to get away from?
We cannot escape the law of nature.
Wherever we are, we are the Dhamma, we are impermanent, unfulfilled, of no core-substance.
It doesn't matter whether we sit here or on the moon.
It's always the same.
So we need a light-hearted approach to our own difficulties and those of everyone else, but not exuberance and outpouring.
Rather a constant inwardness, which contains a bit of amusement.
This works best.
If one has a sense of humor about oneself, it is much easier to love oneself properly.
It's also much easier to love everybody else.
There used to be a television show in America, called “People are Funny.” We do have the oddest reactions.
When they are analyzed and taken apart, they are often found to be absurd.
We have very strange desires and wishes and unrealistic images of ourselves.
It's quite true, “people are funny,” so why not see that side of oneself?
It makes it easier to accept that which we find so unacceptable in ourselves and others.
There is one aspect of human life which we cannot change, namely, that it keeps on happening moment after moment.
We've all been meditating here for some time.
What does the world care?
It just keeps on going.
The only one who cares, who gets perturbed, is our own heart and mind.
When there is perturbance, upheaval, unreality and absurdity, then there is also unhappiness.
This is quite unnecessary.
Everything just is.
If we learn to approach all happenings with more equanimity by being accepting, then the work of purification is much easier.
This is our work, our own purification, and it can only be done by each one for himself.
One of the best aspects about it is that if one remembers what one is doing, keeps at it day after day without forgetting and continues to meditate, not expecting great results, little by little it does happen.
That, too, just is.
As one keeps working at it, there is a constant chipping away at the defilements and at the unreal thinking, because there is no happiness in that and few want to hang on to unhappiness.
Eventually one runs out of things to do outside of oneself.
The books are all saying the same things, the letters have all been written, the flowers have all been watered, there's nothing left except to look inside.
As this happens again and again, a change takes place.
It may be slow, but when we have been here so many lifetimes, what's a day, a month, a year, ten years?
They're all just happening.
There's nothing else to do and there's nowhere else to go.
The earth is moving in a circle, life is moving from birth to death without us having to move at all.
It's all happening without our help.
The only thing we need to do is to get to reality.
Then when we do, we will find that loving ourselves and loving others is a natural outcome of that.
Because we are concerned with reality and that is the heart's real work — to love.
But only if we've also seen the other side of the coin in ourselves and have done the work of purification.
Then it is no longer an effort or a deliberate attempt, but it becomes a natural function of our inner feelings, inward directed but shining outward.
The inward direction is an important aspect of our contemplative life.
Whatever happens inwardly has direct repercussions on what takes place outwardly.
The inner light and purity cannot be hidden, nor can the defilements.
We sometimes think we can portray something we are not.
That is not possible.
The Buddha said that one only knows a person after having heard him speak many times and having lived with him for a long time.
People generally try to show themselves off as something better than they really are.
Then, of course, they become disappointed in themselves when they fail, and equally disappointed in others.
To realistically know oneself makes it possible to truly love.
That kind of feeling gives the light-heartedness to this job in which we're engaged, which is needed.
By accepting ourselves and others as we truly are, our job of purification, chipping away at the defilements, is made much easier.
Our old friend, dukkha, arises in the mind as dissatisfaction caused by all sorts of triggers.
It can be triggered by bodily discomfort, but more often it is caused by the mind's own aberrations and convolutions.
The mind creates dukkha, and that's why we must really watch and guard our minds.
Our own mind can make us happy, our own mind can make us unhappy.
There is no person or thing in the whole world that will do this for us.
All happenings act as triggers for us, which constantly catch us unawares.
Therefore we need to develop strong awareness of our own mind-moments.
We have a good chance to do that in meditation.
There are two directions in meditation, calm and insight.
If we can achieve some calm, that indicates that concentration is improving.
But unless that valuable skill is used for insight, it's a waste of time.
If the mind becomes calm, joy often arises, but we must observe how fleeting and impermanent that joy is, and how even bliss is essentially still only a condition which can be easily lost.
Only insight is irreversible.
The stronger the calm is established, the better it will withstand disturbances.
In the beginning any noise, discomfort or thought will break it up, especially if the mind has not been calm during the day.
Impermanence needs to be seen quite clearly in everything that happens, whether it is in or out of meditation.
The fact of constant change should and must be used for gaining insight into reality.
Mindfulness is the heart of Buddhist meditation and insight is its goal.
We're spending our time in many different ways and some portion of it in meditation, but all our time can be used to gain some insight into our own mind.
That's where the whole world is happening for us.
Nothing, except what we are thinking, exists for us.
The more we watch our mind and see what it does to us and for us, the more we will be inclined to take good care of it and treat it with respect.
One of the biggest mistakes we can make is taking the mind for granted.
The mind has the capacity to create good and also evil for us, and only when we are able to remain happy and even-minded no matter what conditions are arising, only then can we say that we have gained a little control.
Until then we are out of control and our thoughts are our master.
The greatest support we can have is mindfulness, which means being totally present in each moment.
If the mind remains centered then it can't make up stories about the injustice of the world or one's friends, or about one's desires, or one's lamentations.
All these mind-made stories would fill many volumes, but we are mindful such verbalizations stop.
“Mindful” is being fully absorbed in the moment, leaving no room for anything else.
We are filled with the momentary happening, whether that may be standing or sitting or lying down, being comfortable or uncomfortable, feeling pleasant or unpleasant.
Whichever it may be, it is a non-judgmental awareness, “knowing only,” without evaluation.
Clear comprehension brings evaluation.
We comprehend the purpose of our thought, speech or action, whether we are using skillful means or not and whether we have actually achieved the required results.
One needs some distance to oneself in order to be able to evaluate dispassionately.
If one is right in the middle, it's very difficult to get an objective view.
Mindfulness coupled with clear comprehension provides one with the necessary distance, the objectivity, the dispassion.
Any dukkha that one has, small, medium or large, continuous or intermittent, is all created by one's mind.
We are the creators of all that happens to us, forming our own destiny, nobody else is involved.
Everybody else is playing his own role, we just happen to be near some people and farther away at other times.
But whatever we are doing, all is done to our own mind-moments.
The more we watch our thoughts in meditation, the more insight can arise, if there is an objective viewing of what is happening.
When we watch mind-moments arising, staying and ceasing, detachment from our thinking process will result, which brings dispassion.
Thoughts are coming and going all the time, just like the breath.
If we hang on to them, try to keep them, that's when all the trouble starts.
We want to own them and really do something with them, especially of they are negative, which is bound to create dukkha.
The Buddha's formula for the highest effort is worth remembering: “Not to let an unwholesome thought arise, which has not yet arisen.
Not to sustain an unwholesome thought which has already arisen.
To arouse a wholesome thought which has not yet arisen.
To sustain a wholesome thought which has already arisen.
The quicker we can become a master of this effort, the better.
This is part of the training we undergo in meditation.
When we have learned to quickly drop whatever is arising in meditation, then we can do the same with unwholesome thoughts in daily living.
When we are alert to an unwholesome thought in meditation, we can use the same skill to protect our mind at all times.
The more we learn to shut our mind-door to all negativities which disturb our inner peace, the easier our life becomes.
Peace of mind is not indifference.
A peaceful mind is a compassionate mind.
Recognizing and letting go is not suppression.
Dukkha is self-made and self-perpetuated.
If we are sincere in wanting to get rid of it, we have to watch the mind carefully, to get an insight into what's really happening within.
What is triggering us?
There are innumerable triggers, but there are only two reactions.
One is equanimity and one is craving.
We can learn from everything.
Today some anagarikas had to wait quite a long time in the bank, which was an exercise in patience.
Whether the exercise was successful or not, doesn't matter as much as that it was a learning experience.
Everything we do is an exercise, this is our purpose as human beings.
It's the only reason for being here, namely to use the time on our little planet for learning and growing.
It can be called an adult education class.
Everything else we can think of as the purpose of life, is a mistaken view.
We're guests here, giving a limited guest performance.
If we use our time to gain insight into ourselves utilizing our likes and dislikes, our resistances, our rejections, our worries, our fears, then we're spending this lifetime to the best advantage.
It's a great skill to live in such a way.
The Buddha called it “urgency', a sense of having to work on ourselves now and not leave it for some future unspecified date, when one may have more time.
Everything can be a learning experience and the only time is now.
When we meet our old friend dukkha, we would ask: “Where did you come from?” When we get an answer, we should inquire again, getting deeper into the subject.
There's only one true answer, but we won't get it immediately.
We have to go through several answers until we get to the bottom line, which is “ego.” When we've come to that one, we know we have come to the end of the questioning and to the beginning of insight.
We can then try to see how the ego has produced dukkha again.
What did it do, how did it react?
When we see the cause, it may be possible to let go of that particular wrong view.
Having seen cause and effect by ourselves, we'll never forget it again.
Single drops fill a bucket, little by little we purify.
Every moment is worthwhile.
The more we experience every moment as worthwhile, the more energy there is.
There are no useless moments, every single one is important, if we use it skillfully.
Enormous energy arises from that, because all of it adds up to a life which is lived in the best possible way.
Being happy also means being peaceful, but quite often people don't really want to direct their attention to that.
There is the connotation of “not interesting” about it, or “not enough happening.” Obviously there would be no proliferations or excitement.
Peace is thought of as an absolute in this world, from a political, social and personal angle.
Yet peace is very hard to find anywhere.
One of the reasons must be, not only that it's difficult to attain, but also that very few people work for such an achievement.
It seems as if it were a negation of life, of one's own supremacy.
Only those who practice a spiritual discipline would care to direct their minds towards peace.
A natural tendency is to cultivate one's own superiority which also often falls into the other extreme, one's own inferiority.
When one has one's own superiority in mind, it's impossible to find peace.
The only thing that one can find is a power game, “Anything you can do, I can do better.” Or, at times, when it's quite obvious that this isn't so then “anything you can do I can't do as well.” There are moments of truth in everyone's life, when one sees quite clearly that one can't do everything as well as the next person, whether it's sweeping a path or writing a book.
This kind of stance, which is very common, is the opposite of peacefulness.
A display of either one's own abilities or the lack of them, will produce restlessness rather than peace.
There's always the reaching out, the craving for a result in the form of other people's admittance of one's own superiority or their denial of it.
When they deny it, there is warfare.
When they admit it, there is victory.
Victory over other people has as its underlying cause a battle.
In war there is never a winner, there are only losers.
No matter who signs the peace-treaty first, both sides lose.
The same applies to this kind of attitude.
There are only losers, even though one may have a momentary victory, having been accepted as the one who knows better, or is stronger or cleverer.
Battle and peace do not go well together.
One wonders in the end, does anybody really want peace?
Nobody seems to have it.
Is anybody really trying to get it?
One does get in life what one strongly determines.
It is important to inquire into our innermost heart whether peace is really what we want.
The inquiry into one's heart is a difficult thing to do.
Most people have a steel door of thick dimensions which is covering the opening of their heart.
They can't get in to find out what's going on inside.
But everyone needs to try to get in as far as possible and check one's priorities.
In moments of turmoil, when one is either not getting the supremacy one wants or one feels really inferior, then all one desires is peace.
Let it all subside again and neither the superiority nor the inferiority is very distinct, then what happens?
Is it really peace one wants?
Or does one want to be somebody special, somebody important or lovable?
A “somebody” never has peace.
There is an interesting simile about a mango tree: a king went riding in the forest and encountered a mango tree laden with fruit.
He said to his servants: “Go back in the evening and collect the mangoes,” because he wanted them for the royal dinner table.
The servants went back to the forest and returned to the palace empty-handed and told the king: “Sorry, sir, the mangoes were all gone, there wasn't a single mango left on the tree.” the king thought the servants had been too lazy to go back to the forest, so he rode out himself.
What he saw instead of the beautiful mango tree laden with fruit, was a pitiful, bedraggled tree, that had been beaten and robbed of its fruit and leaves.
Someone, unable to reach all the branches, had broken them and had taken all the fruit.
As the king rode a little farther, he came upon another mango tree, beautiful in all its green splendor, but not a single fruit on it.
Nobody had wanted to go near it, since there were no fruits, and so it was left in peace.
The king went back to his palace, gave his royal crown and scepter to his ministers and said: “You may now have the kingdom, I am going to live in a hut in the forest.
When one is nobody and has nothing, then there is no danger of warfare or attack, then there's peace.
The mango tree laden with fruit didn't have a moment's peace: everybody wanted its fruit.
If we really want peace, we have to be nobody.
Neither important, nor clever, nor beautiful, nor famous, nor right, nor in charge of anything.
We need to be unobtrusive and with as few attributes as possible.
The mango tree which didn't have any fruit was standing peacefully in all its splendor giving shade.
To be nobody doesn't mean never to do anything again.
It just means to act without self-display and without craving for results.
The mango tree had shade to give, but it didn't display its wares or fret whether anyone wanted its shade.
This kind of ability allows for inner peace.
It is a rare ability, because most people vacillate from one extreme to another, either doing nothing and thinking “let them see how they get along without me” or being in charge and projecting their views and ideas.
It seems to be so much more ingrained in us and so much more important to be “somebody,” than to have peace.
So we need to inquire with great care what we are truly looking for.
What is it that we want out of life?
If we want to be important, appreciated, loved, then we have to take their opposites in stride also.
Every positive brings with it a negative, just as the sun throws shadows.
If we want one, we must accept the other, without moaning about it.
But if we really want a peaceful heart and mind, inner security and solidity, then we have to give up wanting to be somebody, anybody at all.
Body and mind will not disappear because of that, what disappears is the urge and the reaching out and the affirmation of the importance and supremacy of this particular person, called “me.
Every human being considers himself or herself important.
There are billions of people on this globe, how many will mourn us?
Count them for a moment.
Six, or eight, or twelve or fifteen out of all these billions?
This consideration may show us that we have a vastly exaggerated idea of our own importance.
The more we can get that into the proper perspective, the easier life is.
Wanting to be somebody is dangerous.
It's like playing with a burning fire into which one puts one's hands all the time and it hurts constantly.
Nobody will play that game according to our own rules.
People who really manage to be somebody, like heads of state, invariably need a solid bodyguard around them because they are in danger of their lives.
Nobody likes to admit that someone else is more important.
One of the major deterrents to peace of mind is the “somebody” of our own creation.
In the world we live in, we can find people, animals, nature and man-made things.
Within all that, if we want to be in charge of anything, the only thing we have any jurisdiction over, is our own heart and mind.
If we really want to be somebody, we could try to be that rare person, the one who is in charge of his own heart and mind.
To be somebody like that is not only very rare, but also brings with it the most beneficial results.
Such a person does not fall into the trap of the defilements.
Although the defilements may not be uprooted yet, he won't commit the error of displaying them and getting involved with them.
There is a story about Tan Achaan Cha, a famous meditation master in North-East Thailand.
He was accused by someone of having a lot of hatred.
Tan Achaan Cha replied: “That may be so but I don't make any use of it.” An answer like this comes from a deep understanding of one's own nature, that's why we are impressed with such a reply.
It's a rare person who will not allow himself to be defiled by thought, speech or action.
That one is really somebody, and doesn't have to prove it to anyone else, mainly because it is quite obvious.
In any case, such a person has no desire to prove anything.
There's only one abiding interest and that's one's own peace of mind.
When we have peace of mind as our priority, everything that is in the mind and comes out in speech or action is directed towards it.
Anything that does not create peace of mind is discarded, yet we must not confuse this with being right or having the last word.
Others need not agree.
Peace of mind is one's own, everyone has to find his through his own efforts.
War and peace are the epic saga of humanity.
They are all that our history books contain because they are what our hearts contain.
If you have ever read Don Quixote, you'll remember that he was fighting windmills.
Everybody is doing just that, fighting windmills.
Don Quixote was the figment of a writer's imagination, a man who believed himself to be a great warrior.
He thought that every windmill he met was an enemy and started battling with it.
That's exactly what we are doing within our own hearts and that's why this story has such an everlasting appeal.
It tells us about ourselves.
Writers and poets who have survived their own lifetimes have always told human beings about themselves.
Mostly people don't listen, because it doesn't help when somebody else tells us what's wrong with us and few care to hear it.
One has to find out for oneself and most people don't want to do that either.
What does it really mean to fight windmills?
It means fighting nothing important or real, just imaginary enemies and battles.
All quite trifling matters, which we build into something solid and formidable in our minds.
We say: “I can't stand that,” so we start fighting, and “I don't like him,” and a battle ensues, and “I feel so unhappy,” and the inner war is raging.
We hardly ever know what we're so unhappy about.
The weather, the food, the people, the work, the leisure, the country, anything at all will usually do.
Why does this happen to us?
Because of the resistance to actually letting go and becoming what we really are, namely nothing.
Nobody cares to be that.
Everybody wants to be something or somebody even if it's only Don Quixote fighting windmills.
Somebody who knows and acts and will become something else, someone who has certain attributes, views, opinions and ideas.
Even patently wrong views are held onto tightly, because it makes the “me” more solid.
It seems negative and depressing to be nobody and have nothing.
We have to find out for ourselves that it is the most exhilarating and liberating feeling we can ever have.
But because we fear that windmills might attach, we don't want to let go.
Why can't we have peace in the world?
Because nobody wants to disarm.
Not a single country is ready to sign a disarmament pact, which all of us bemoan.
But have we ever looked to see whether we, ourselves, have actually disarmed?
When we haven't done so, why wonder that nobody else is ready for it either?
Nobody wants to be the first one without weapons; others might win.
Does it really matter?
If there is nobody there, who can be conquered?
How can there be a victory over nobody?
Let those who fight win every war, all that matters is to have peace in one's own heart.
As long as we are resisting and rejecting and continue to find all sorts of rational excuses to keep on doing that there has to be warfare.
War manifests externally in violence, aggression and killing.
But how does it reveal itself internally?
We have an arsenal within us, not of guns and atomic bombs, but having the same effect.
And the one who gets hurt is always the one who is shooting, namely oneself.
Sometimes another person comes within firing range and if he or she isn't careful enough, he or she is wounded.
That's a regrettable accident.
The main blasts are the bombs which go off in one's own heart.
Where they are detonated, that's the disaster area.
The arsenal which we carry around within ourselves consists of our ill will and anger, our desires and cravings.
The only criterion is that we don't feel peaceful inside.
We need not believe in anything, we can just find out whether there is peace and joy in our heart.
If they are lacking, most people try to find them outside of themselves.
That's how all wars start.
It is always the other country's fault and if one can't find anyone to blame then one needs more “Lebensraum,” more room for expansion, more territorial sovereignty.
In personal terms, one needs more entertainment, more pleasure, more comfort, more distractions for the mind.
If one can't find anyone else to blame for one's lack of peace, then one believes it to be an unfulfilled need.
Who is that person, who needs more?
A figment of our own imagination, fighting windmills.
That “more” is never ending.
One can go from country to country, from person to person.
There are billions of people on this globe; it's hardly likely that we will want to see every one of them, or even one-hundredth, a lifetime wouldn't be enough to do so.
We may choose twenty or thirty people and then go from one to the next and back again, moving from one activity to another, from one idea to another.
We are fighting against our own dukkha and don't want to admit that the windmills in our heart are self-generated.
We believe somebody put them up against us, and by moving we can escape from them.
Few people come to the final conclusion that these windmills are imaginary, that one can remove them by not endowing them with strength and importance.
That we can open our hearts without fear and gently, gradually let go of our preconceived notions and opinions, views and ideas, suppressions and conditioned responses.
When all that is removed, what does one have left?
A large, open space, which one can fill with whatever one likes.
If one has good sense, one will fill it with love, compassion and equanimity.
Then there is nothing left to fight.
Only joy and peacefulness remain, which cannot be found outside of oneself.
It is quite impossible to take anything from outside and put it into oneself.
There is no opening in us through which peace can enter.
We have to start within and work outward.
Unless that becomes clear to us, we will always find another crusade.
Imagine what it was like in the days of the crusades!
There were those noble knights who spent all their wealth on equipping themselves with the most modern and advanced weapons, outfitting horses and followers, and then setting off to bring religion to the infidels.
They died on the way because of hardships and battles and those who reached the end of the journey, the Holy Land, still did not get any results, only more warfare.
When we look at this today, it seems utterly foolish, to the extent of being ridiculous.
Yet we do the same in our own lives.
If, for instance, we wrote something in our diary that upset us three or four years ago and were to read it now, it would seem quite absurd.
We wouldn't be able to remember for what reason it could possibly have been important.
We are constantly engaged in such foolishness with minor and unimportant trifles, and spend our energies trying to work them out to our ego-satisfaction.
Wouldn't it be much better to forget such mental formations and attend to what's really important?
There is only one thing that's important to every being and that is a peaceful and happy heart.
It cannot be bought, nor is it given away.
Nobody can hand it to someone else and it cannot be found.
Ramana Maharshi, a sage in southern India, said: “Peace and happiness are not our birthright.
Whoever has attained them, has done so by continual effort.
Some people have an idea that peace and happiness are synonymous with doing nothing, having no duties or responsibilities, being looked after by others.
That's rather a result of laziness.
To gain peace and happiness one has to make unrelenting effort in one's own heart.
One can't achieve it through proliferation, by trying to get more, only by wanting less.
Becoming emptier and emptier, until there is just open space to be filled with peace and happiness.
As long as our hearts are full of likes and dislikes, how can peace and happiness find any room?
One can find peace within oneself in any situation, any place, any circumstance, but only through effort, not through distraction.
The world offers distractions and sense contacts, and they are often quite tempting.
The more action there is, the more distracted the mind can be and the less one has to look at one's own dukkha.
When one has the time and opportunity to introspect, one finds one's inner reality different from what one imagined.
Many people quickly look away again, they don't want to know about that.
It's nobody's fault that there is dukkha.
The only cure is letting go.
It's really quite simple, but few people believe this to the point of trying it out.
There is a well-known simile about a monkey trap.
The kind used in Asia is a wooden funnel with a small opening.
At the bigger end lies a sweet.
The monkey, attracted by the sweet, puts his paw into the narrow opening and gets hold of the sweet.
When he wants to draw his paw out again, he can't get his fist with the sweet through the narrow opening.
He is trapped and the hunter will come and capture him.
He doesn't realize that all he has to do to be free is to let go of the sweet.
That's what our life is all about.
A trap, because we want it nice and sweet.
Not being able to let go, we're caught in the ever recurring happiness-unhappiness, up-down, hoping-despairing cycle.
Instead of trying it out for ourselves, whether we could let go and be free, we resist and reject such a notion.
Yet we all agree that all that matters are peace and happiness, which can only exist in a free mind and heart.
There is a lovely story from Nazrudin, a Sufi Master, who was gifted in telling absurd tales.
One day, the story goes, he sent one of his disciples to the market and asked him to buy him a bag of chilies.
The disciple did as requested and brought the bag to Nazrudin, who began to eat the chilies, one after another.
Soon his face turned red, his nose started running, his eyes began to water and he was choking.
The disciple observed this for a while with awe and then said: “Sir, your face is turning red, your eyes are watering and you are choking.
Why don't you stop eating these chilies?” Nazrudin replied: “I am waiting for a sweet one.
The teaching aid of chilies!
We, too, are waiting for something, somewhere that will create peace and happiness for us.
Meanwhile there is nothing but dukkha, the eyes are watering, the nose is running, but we won't stop our own creations.
There must be a sweet one at the bottom of the bag!
It's no use thinking, hearing or reading about it, the only effective way is to look inside one's own heart and see with understanding.
The more the heart is full of wanting and desiring, the harder and more difficult life becomes.
Why fight all these windmills?
They are self-built and can also be self-removed.
It's a very rewarding experience to check what's cluttering up one's own heart and mind.
As one finds emotion after emotion, not to create allowances and justifications for them, but to realize that they constitute the world's battle-grounds and start dismantling the weapons so that disarmament becomes a reality.
Truth occupies a very important position in the Buddha's teaching.
The Four Noble Truths are the hub of the wheel of the Dhamma.
Truth is one of the ten perfections to be cultivated in order to purify oneself.
Truth can have different aspects.
If we want to find an end to suffering, we have to find truth at its deepest level.
The moral precepts which include “not lying” are a basic training without which one can't lead a spiritual life.
To get to the bottom of truth, one has to get to the bottom of oneself, and that is not an easy thing to do, aggravated by the problem of not loving oneself.
It naturally follows that if one wants to learn to love oneself, there must be hate present, and we are caught in the world of duality.
While we are floating around in the world of duality, we can't get to the bottom of truth, because we are suspended in a wave motion going back and forth.
There is an interesting admonition in the Sutta Nipata, mentioning that one should not have associates, which prevents attachments.
This would result in neither love nor hate, so that only equanimity remains, even-mindedness towards all that exists.
With equanimity one is no longer suspended between good and bad, love and hate, friend and enemy, but has been able to let go, to get to the bottom where truth can be found.
If we want to find the basic, underlying truth of all existence, we must practice “letting go.” This includes our weakest and our strongest attachments, many of which aren't even recognized as clinging.
To return to the simile of the truth to be found at the bottom, we can see that if we are clinging to anything, we can't get down to it.
We're attached to the things, people, ideas and views, which we consider ours and believe to be right and useful.
These attachments will keep us from getting in touch with absolute truth.
Our reactions, the likes and dislikes, hold us in suspense.
While it is more pleasant to like something or someone, yet both are due to attachments.
This difficulty is closely associated with distraction in meditation.
Just as we are attached to the food that we get for the body, we are equally attached to food for the mind, so the thoughts go here and there, picking up tidbits.
As we do that, we are again held in suspense, moving from thought to breath and back again, being in the world of duality.
When our mind acts in this way, it cannot get to rock bottom.
Depth of understanding enables release from suffering.
When one goes deeper and deeper into oneself, one finds no core, and learns to let go of attachments.
Whether we find anything within us which is pure, desirable, commendable or whether it's impure and unpleasant, makes no difference.
All mental states owned and cherished keep us in duality, where we are hanging in mid-air, feeling very insecure.
They cannot bring an end to suffering.
One moment all might be well in our world and we love everyone, but five minutes later we might react with hate and rejection.
We might be able to agree with the Buddha's words or regard them as a plausible explanation, but without the certainty of personal experience, this is of limited assistance to us.
In order to have direct knowledge, it's as if we were a weight and must not be tied to anything, so that we can sink down to the bottom of all the obstructions, to see the truth shining through.
The tool for that is a powerful mind, a weighty mind.
As long as the mind is interested in petty concerns, it doesn't have the weightiness that can bring it to the depth of understanding.
For most of us, our mind is not in the heavy-weight class, but more akin to bantam weight.
The punch of a heavy-weight really accomplishes something, that of a bantam weight is not too meaningful.
The light-weight mind is attached here and there to people and their opinions, to one's own opinions, to the whole duality of pure and impure, right and wrong.
Why do we take it so personal, when it's truly universal?
That seems to be the biggest difference between living at ease and being able to let the mind delve into the deepest layer of truth, or living at loggerheads with oneself and others.
Neither hate nor greed are a personal manifestation, nobody has a singular claim on them, they belong to humanity.
We can learn to let go of that personalized idea about our mind states, which would rid us of a serious impediment.
Greed, hate and impurities exist, by the same token non-greed and non-hate also exist.
Can we own the whole lot?
Or do we own them in succession or five minutes at a time for each?
Why own any of them, they just exist and seeing that, it becomes possible to let oneself sink into the depth of the Buddha's vision.
The deepest truth that the Buddha taught was that there is no individual person.
This has to be accepted and experienced at a feeling level.
As long as one hasn't let go of owning body and mind, one cannot accept that one isn't really this person.
This is a gradual process.
In meditation one learns to let go of ideas and stories and attend to the meditation subject.
If we don't let go, we cannot sink into the meditation.
The mind has to be a heavy-weight for that too.
We can compare the ordinary mind to bobbing around on the waves of thoughts and feelings.
The same happens in meditation, therefore we need to prepare ourselves for becoming concentrated.
We can look at all mind states arising during the day and learn to let go of them.
The ease and buoyancy which arises from this process is due to being unattached.
If we don't practice throughout the day, our meditation suffers because we have not come to the meditation cushion in a suitable frame of mind.
If one has been letting go all day, the mind is ready and can now let go in meditation too.
Then it can experience its own happiness and purity.
Sometimes people think of the teaching as a sort of therapy, which it undoubtedly is, but that's not its ultimate aim, only one of its secondary aspects.
The Buddha's teaching takes us to the end of suffering, once and for all, not just momentarily when things go wrong.
Having had an experience of letting go, even just once, proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that it means getting rid of a great burden.
Carrying one's hate and greed around is a heavy load, which, when abandoned, gets us out of the duality of judgment.
It's pleasant to be without thinking; mental formations are troublesome.
If we succeed even once or twice during a day to let go of our reactions, we have taken a great step and can more easily do it again.
We have realized that a feeling which has arisen can be stopped, it need not be carried around all day.
The relief from this will be the proof that a great inner discovery has been made and that the simplicity of non-duality shows us the way towards truth.
In order to embrace the spiritual path fully, be able to grow on it and walk along it with a feeling of security, one has to renounce.
Renunciation doesn't necessarily mean cutting off one's hair or wearing robes.
Renunciation means letting go of all ideas and hopes that the mind would like to grasp and retain, be interested in and wants to investigate.
The mind wants to have more of whatever is available.
If it can't get more, then it makes up fantasies and imaginings and projects them upon the world.
That will never bring true satisfaction, inner peace, which can only be won by renunciation.
“Letting go” is the key word of the Buddhist path, the fading away of desire.
One must realize once and for all that “more” is not “better.” It is impossible to come to an end of “more,” there is always something beyond it.
But it is certainly possible to come to the end of “less,” which is a much more sensible approach.
Why sit in seclusion in meditation and spoil one's chances at all the opportunities the world offers for enjoyment?
One could go on trips, work at a challenging job, meet interesting people, write letters or read books, have a pleasant time somewhere else and really feel at ease — one could even find a different spiritual path.
When the meditation does not succeed, the thought may arise: “What am I really doing, why am I doing it, what for, what's the good of it?” Then the idea comes: “I can't really do this very well, maybe I should try something else.
The world glitters and promises so much, but never, never keeps its promises.
Everyone has tried a number of its temptations and not one of them has really been fulfilling.
The real fulfillment, the completeness of peace, lacking nothing, the totality of being at ease and not wanting anything, cannot be fulfilled in the world.
There's nothing that can fill one's wants utterly and completely.
Money, material possessions, another person, some of these can do so.
And yet there's that niggling doubt: “Maybe I'll find something else, more comfortable, easier, not so demanding and above all something new.” Always that which is new promises fulfillment.
The mind has to be understood for what it is, just another sense, that has as its base the brain, just as seeing has as its base the eye.
As the mind-moments arise and contact is made with them, we start believing what we are thinking and even owning it: “It's mine.” Because of that, we're really interested in our thoughts and want to look after them.
It's a foregone conclusion that people look after their own belongings much better than they look after other people's things, so that one follows one's own mind-moments and believes them all.
Yet they will never bring happiness.
What they bring is hope and worry and doubt.
Sometimes they supply entertainment and at other times depression.
When doubts arise and one follows through on them, goes along with them, they can lead us to the point at which there is no practice left at all.
Yet the only way to prove that the spiritual life brings fulfillment is to practice.
The proof of the pudding lies in the eating.
Nobody else can prove it to us; wanting outside proof, so that all one has to do is grab a hold of it and nourish oneself is a wrong approach.
The fulfillment we are looking for is not what we can get and stuff into this mind and body.
The gaping hole is much too large to fill.
The only way we can find fulfillment is to let go of expectations and wanting, of everything that goes on in the mind, so that there is nothing lacking.
Then there's nothing left to fill.
The misunderstanding, which recurs over and over again is this typical attitude of: “I want to be given.
I want to get knowledge, understanding, loving-kindness, consideration.
I want to receive a spiritual awakening.” There is nothing that one can be given, except instructions and methods.
One needs to do the daily work of practice, so that purification will result.
The lack of fulfillment cannot be remedied by wanting to be given something new.
We're not even clear about where this is to come from.
Maybe from the Buddha, or from the Dhamma, or we might want it from our teacher.
Possibly we would like to get it from our meditation, or from a book.
The answer is not in getting something from outside of ourselves, but rather lies in discarding everything.
What do we need to get rid of first?
Preferably the convolutions of the mind that constantly tell us stories which are fantastic and unbelievable.
Yet when we hear them, we ourselves believe them.
One way to look at them and disbelieve them, is to write them down.
They sound absurd when they're written down on paper.
The mind can always think up new stories, there's no end to them.
Renunciation is the key.
Giving up, letting go.
Giving up also means giving in to that underlying, subconscious knowing that the worldly way doesn't work, that there is a different way.
We cannot try to remain in the world and add something to our life, but rather give our ambitions up completely.
To stay the way one is and then add something to that — how can it possibly work?
If one has a non-functioning machine and adds another part to it, it's not going to make it function.
One has to overhaul the whole machine.
That means accepting our underlying understanding that the old ways of thinking aren't useful.
There's always dukkha again and again.
It keeps coming, doesn't it?
Sometimes we think: “It must be due to a particular person, or maybe it's due to the weather.” Then the weather changes or that person leaves, but dukkha is still present.
So it wasn't that and we have to try to find something else.
Instead we need to become pliable and soft and attend to that which is truly arising without all the convolutions, conglomerations, proliferations of the mind.
That which arises may be either pure or impure and we need to know how to handle each one.
Once we start explaining and rationalizing, the whole process breaks down again.
We mustn't think that we can add anything to ourselves in order to make us whole.
All has to be taken away, the whole identifiable lot, then we become a whole person.
Renunciation is letting go of ideation, of the mind-stuff that claims to be the person who knows.
Who knows that person who knows?
These are only ideas churning around, arising and ceasing.
Renunciation is not an outward manifestation, that's only its result.
The cause is an inward one, which is the one we need to practice.
If we think of a nunnery as a place for meditation, we will find that meditation cannot happen without renunciation.
In the Sutta Nipata we find a discourse by the Buddha entitled “The Rhinoceros Horn” in which he compares the one horn of the rhinoceros with the sage's solitude.
The Buddha praises being alone and the refrain to every stanza of the sutta is: “One should wander solitary as a rhinoceros horn.” 
There are two kinds of solitude, that of the mind and that of the body.
Everyone is familiar with solitude of the body.
We go away and sit by ourselves in a room or cave or tell the people we are living with, that we want to be left alone.
People usually like that sort of solitude for short periods.
If this aloneness is maintained, it is often due to people not being able to get along with others or being afraid of them because there isn't enough love in their own hearts.
Often there may be a feeling of loneliness, which is detrimental to solitude.
Loneliness is a negative state of mind in which one feels bereft of companionship.
When one lives in a family or community, it is sometimes difficult to find physical solitude, it's not even very practical.
But physical solitude is not the only kind of aloneness there is.
Mental solitude is an important factor for practice.
Unless one is able to arouse mental solitude in oneself, one will not be able to be introspective, to find out what changes in oneself are necessary.
Mental solitude means first and foremost not to be dependent on others for approval, for companionable talk, for a relationship.
It doesn't mean that one becomes unfriendly towards others, just that one is mentally independent.
If another person is kind to us, well and good.
If that isn't the case, that's fine too, and makes no difference.
The horn of a rhinoceros is straight and solid and so strong that we can't bend it.
Can our minds be like that?
Mental solitude cuts out idle chatter, which is detrimental to spiritual growth.
Talking about nothing at all, just letting off steam.
When we let the steam go from a pot, we can't cook the food.
Our practice can be likened to putting the heat on oneself.
If we let off steam again and again, that inner process is stopped.
It's much better to let the steam accumulate and find out what is cooking.
That is the most important work we can do.
Everybody should have occasion each day to be on her own physically for some time, so that we can really feel alone, totally by ourselves.
Sometimes we may think: “People are talking about me.” That doesn't matter, we are the owners of our own kamma.
If somebody talks about us, it's their kamma.
If we get upset, that's our kamma.
Getting interested in what is being said is enough to show that we are dependent on people's approval.
Who's approving of whom?
Maybe the five khandha are approving.
Or possibly the hair of the head, the hair of the body, nails, teeth and skin?
Which “self” is approving, the good one, the bad one, the mediocre one, or maybe the non-self?
Unless one can find a feeling of solidity in oneself, from the center, where there is no movement, one is always going to feel insecure.
Nobody can be liked by everyone, not even the Buddha.
Because we have defilements, we are always on the lookout for everybody else's pollutions.
None of that matters, it's all totally unimportant.
The only thing that is significant is to be mindful; totally attentive to each step on the way, to what one is doing, feeling, thinking.
It's so easy to forget this.
There's always somebody with whom to talk or another cup of tea to be had.
That's how the world lives and the inhabitants are mostly unhappy.
But the Buddha's path leads out of the world to independent happiness.
Letting off steam, idle chatter and looking for companionship are the wrong things to do.
Trying to find out what people are thinking about one, is immaterial and irrelevant and has nothing to do with the spiritual path.
Solitude in the mind means that one can be alone in the midst of the crowd.
Even in a large and agitated crowd of people, one would still be able to operate from one's own center, giving out love and compassion, and not being influenced by what is happening around one.
That can be called ideal solitude and means one has removed oneself from the future and past, which is necessary in order to stand straight and alone.
If one is attached to the future, then there is worry, and if one is hankering for the past, there is either desire or rejection.
That is the constant chatter of the mind, not conducive to mental solitude.
Solitude can only be fully experienced when there is inner peace.
Otherwise loneliness pushes one to try and remedy a feeling of emptiness and loss.
“Where is everybody?
What can I do without some companionship?
I must discuss my problems.” Mindfulness is able to take care of all that because it has to arise in the present moment and has nothing to do with future and past.
It keeps one totally occupied and saves one from making mistakes, which are natural to human beings.
But the greater the mindfulness, the fewer mistakes.
Errors on the mundane level also have repercussions on the supermundane path, because they are due to a lack of mindfulness, which will not allow us to get past our self-inflicted dukkha.
We will try again and again to find someone who is to blame or someone who can distract us.
Ideal solitude arises when a person can be alone or with others and remain of one piece, not getting caught in someone else's difficulties.
We may respond in an appropriate manner, but we are not affected.
We all have our own inner life and we only get to know it well when the mind stops chattering and we can attend to our inner feelings.
Once we have seen what is happening inside of us, we will want to change it.
Only the fully Enlightened One has an inner life which needs no changing.
Our inner stress and lack of peace push us outward to find someone who will remove a moment of dukkha, but only we, ourselves, can do it.
Solitude may be physical, but that's not its main function.
The solitary mind is one which can have profound and original thoughts.
A dependent mind thinks in cliches, the way everybody else does, because it wants approval.
Such a mind understands on a surface level, just like the world does, and cannot grasp the profundity and depth of the Buddha's teaching.
The solitary mind is at ease because it is unaffected.
It's interesting that a mind at ease, which can stand on its own, also can memorize.
Because such a mind is not filled with the desire to remove dukkha, it can remember without much trouble.
This is one of its side benefits.
The main value of a solitary mind is its imperturbability.
It can't be shaken and will stand without support, just as a strong tree doesn't need a prop.
Because it's powerful in its own right.
If the mind doesn't have enough vigour to stand on its own, it won't have the strength and determination to fulfill the Dhamma.
Our practice includes being on our own some time each day to introspect and contemplate.
Reading, talking and listening are all communication with others, which are necessary at times.
But it is essential to have time for self-inquiry: “What is happening within me?
What am I feeling?
Is it wholesome or not?
Am I perfectly contented on my own?
How much self-concern is there?
Is the Dhamma my guide or am I bewildered?” If there's a fog in one's mind, all we need is a searchlight to penetrate it.
The searchlight is concentration.
Health, wealth and youth do not mean no dukkha.
They are a cover-up.
Ill-health, poverty and old age make it easier to realize the unsatisfactoriness of our existence.
When we are alone, that is the time to get to know ourselves.
We can investigate the meaning of the Dhamma we've heard and whether we can actualize it in our own lives.
We can use those aspects of the Dhamma which are most meaningful for us.
The solitary mind is a strong mind, because it knows how to stand still.
That doesn't mean not associating with people at all, that would lack loving-kindness.
A solitary mind is able to be alone and introspect and also be loving towards others.
Living in a Dhamma community is an ideal place to practice this.
Meditation is the means for concentration, which is the tool to break through the fog enveloping everyone who is not an arahant.
At times, in communal living, there is togetherness and lovingness and service.
These should be the results of metta not of trying to get away from dukkha.
Next time we start a conversation, let's first investigate: “Why am I having this discussion?
Is it necessary, or am I bored and want to get away from my problems.
Clear comprehension is the mental factor which joins with mindfulness to give purpose and direction.
We examine whether our speech and actions are having the right purpose, whether we are using skillful means and whether the initial purpose has been accomplished.
If we have no clear-cut direction, idle chatter results.
Even in meditation the mind does it, which is due to lack of training.
When we practice clear comprehension, we need to stop a moment and examine the whole situation before plunging in.
This may become one of our skillful habits, not often found in the world.
An important aspect of the Buddha's teaching is the combination of clear comprehension with mindfulness.
The Buddha often recommends them as the way out of all sorrow, and we need to practice them in our small every-day efforts.
These may consist of learning something new, a Dhamma sentence remembered, one line of chanting memorized, one new insight about oneself, one aspect of reality realized.
Such a mind gains strength and self-confidence.
Renunciation is the greatest help in gaining self-confidence.
One knows one can get along without practically everything, for instance food, for quite some time.
Once the Buddha went to a village where nobody had any faith in him.
He received no alms-food at all, nobody in the village paid any attention to him.
He went to the outskirts and sat down on a bit of straw and meditated.
Another ascetic came by who had seen that the Buddha had not received any food and commiserated with him: “You must be feeling very badly not having anything to eat.
I'm very sorry.
You don't even have a nice place to sleep, just straw.” The Buddha replied: “Feeders on joy we are.
Inner joy can feed us for many days.
One can get along without many things when they are voluntarily given up.
If someone takes our belongings, we resist, which is dukkha.
But when we practice self-denial, we gain strength and enable the mind to stand on its own.
Self-confidence arises and creates a really strong back-bone.
Renunciation of companionship shows us whether we are self-sufficient.
The Buddha did not advocate exaggerated and harmful ascetic practices.
but we could give up — for instance — afternoon conversations and contemplate instead.
Afterwards the mind feels contented with its own efforts.
The more effort one can make, the more satisfaction arises.
We need a solitary mind in meditation, so we need to practice it some time during each day.
The secluded mind has two attributes; one is mindfulness, full attention and clear comprehension and the other is introspection and contemplation.
Both of them bring the mind to unification.
Only in togetherness lies strength; unification brings power.
The “twelve-point-dependent-origination” starts with ignorance and goes through kamma formations, rebirth consciousness, mind and matter, sense contacts, feeling, craving, clinging, becoming, birth, and ends with death.
Getting born means dying.
During that sequence there is one point of escape — from feeling to craving.
While this is called the mundane dependent-origination, the Buddha also taught a supermundane, transcendental series of cause and effect.
That one starts with unsatisfactoriness.
Dukkha needs to be seen for what it really is, namely the best starting point for our spiritual journey.
Unless we know and see dukkha, we would have little reason to practice.
If we haven't acknowledged the over-all existence of dukkha, we wouldn't be interested in getting out of its clutches.
The transcendental-dependent-origination starts out with the awareness and inner knowledge of the inescapable suffering in the human realm.
When we reflect upon this, we will no longer try to find a way out through human endeavor, nor through becoming more informed or knowledgeable, or richer, or owning more or having more friends.
Seeing dukkha as an inescapable condition, bound up with existence, we no longer feel oppressed by it.
It's inescapable that there is thunder and lightning, so we don't try to reject the weather.
There have to be thunder, lightning and rain, so we can grow food.
Dukkha is equally inescapable.
Without it, the human condition would not exist.
There wouldn't be rebirth, decay and death.
Having seen it like that, one loses one's resistance to it.
The moment one is no longer repelled by dukkha, suffering is greatly diminished.
It's our resistance which creates the craving to get rid of it, which makes it so much worse.
Having understood dukkha in this way, one may be fortunate enough to make contact with the true Dhamma, the Buddha's teaching.
This is due to one's own good kamma.
There are innumerable people who never get in touch with Dhamma.
They might even be born in a place where the Dhamma is being preached, but they will have no opportunity to hear it.
There are many more people who will not be searching for the Dhamma, because they're still searching for the escape route in the human endeavor, looking in the wrong direction.
Having come to the conclusion that the world will not provide real happiness, then one also has to have the good kamma to be able to listen to true Dhamma.
If these conditions arise, then faith results.
Faith has to be based on trust and confidence.
If these are lacking, the path will not open.
One becomes trusting like a child holding the hand of a grown-up when crossing the street.
The child believes that the grown-up will be watching out for traffic so that no accident will happen.
The small child doesn't have the capacity to gauge when it's safe to cross, but it trusts someone with greater experience.
We are like children compared to the Buddha.
If we can have a child-like innocence, then it will be possible for us to give ourselves unstintingly to the teaching and the practice, holding onto the hand of the true Dhamma that will guide us.
Life and practice will be simplified when the judging and weighing of choice is removed.
No longer: “I should do it another way, or go somewhere else, or find out how it is done by others.” These are possibilities, but they are not conducive to good practice or to getting out of dukkha.
Trust in the Dhamma helps to keep the mind steady.
One has to find out for oneself if this is the correct escape route, but if we don't try, we won't know.
If dukkha is still regarded as a calamity, we will not have enough space in the mind to have trust.
The mind will be full of grief, pain, lamentation, forgetting that all of us are experiencing our kamma resultants and nothing else.
This is part of being a human being, subject to one's own kamma.
Resistance to dukkha saps our energy and the mind cannot stretch to its full capacity.
If dukkha is seen as the necessary ingredient to spur one on to leave samsara behind, then one's positive attitude will point in the right direction.
Dukkha is not a tragedy, but rather a basic ingredient for insight.
This must not only be a thinking process, but felt with one's heart.
It's too easy to think like that and not to do anything about it.
But when our heart is truly touched, trust and confidence in the Dhamma arise as the way out of all suffering.
The Dhamma is totally opposed to worldly thinking, where suffering is considered to be a great misfortune.
In the Dhamma suffering is seen as the first step to transcend the human condition.
The understanding of dukkha has to be firm, in order to arouse trust in that part of the teaching which one hasn't experienced oneself yet.
If one has already tried many other escape routes and none of them actually worked, then one will find it easier to become that trusting, child-like person, walking along this difficult path without turning right or left, knowing that the teaching is true, and letting it be one's guide.
Such faith brings joy, without which the path is a heavy burden and will not flourish.
Joy is a necessary and essential ingredient of the spiritual life.
Joy is not to be mistaken for pleasure, exhilaration or exuberance.
Joy is a feeling of ease and gladness, knowing one has found that which transcends all suffering.
People sometimes have the mistaken idea that to be holy or pious means having a sad face and walking around in a mournful way.
Yet the Buddha is said never to have cried and is usually depicted with a half-smile on his face.
Holiness does not stand for sadness, it means wholeness.
Without joy there is no wholeness.
This inner joy carries with it the certainty that the path is blameless, the practice is fruitful and the conduct is appropriate.
We need to sit down for meditation with a joyous feeling and the whole experience of meditation will culminate in happiness.
This brings us tranquillity, as we no longer look around for outside satisfaction.
We know only to look into ourselves.
There's nowhere to go and nothing to do, it's all happening within.
Such tranquillity is helpful to concentrated meditation and creates the feeling of being in the right spot at the right time.
It creates ease of mind, which facilitates meditation and is conducive to eliminating sceptical doubt.
Sceptical doubt is the harbinger of restlessness, joy begets calm.
We need not worry about our own or the world's future, it's just a matter of time until we fathom absolute reality.
When the path, the practice and effort mesh together, results are bound to come.
It is essential to have complete confidence in everything the Buddha said.
We can't pick out the ideas we want to believe because they happen to be in accordance with what we like anyway and discard others.
There are no choices to be made, it's all or nothing.
Tranquillity helps concentration to arise.
Dukkha itself can lead us to proper concentration if we handle it properly.
But we mustn't reject it, thinking that it is a quirk of fate that has brought all this grief to us, or think that other people are causing it.
If we use dukkha to push us onto the path, then proper concentration can result.
Right concentration makes it possible for the mind to stretch.
The mind that is limited, obstructed and defiled cannot grasp the profundity of the teaching.
It may get an inkling that there is something extraordinary available, but it cannot go into the depth of it.
Only the concentrated mind can extend its limitations.
When it does that, it may experience the knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-really-are.
The Buddha often used this phrase “the-knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-really-are”.
This is distinct from the way we think they are or might be, or as we'd like them to be, hopefully comfortable and pleasant.
But rather birth, decay, disease and death, not getting what one wants, or getting what one doesn't want, a constant perception of what we dislike, because it fails to support our ego-belief.
In knowing and seeing things as they really are, we will lose that distaste.
We will come to see that within this realm of impermanence, unsatisfactoriness and corelessness, there is nothing that can be grasped and found to be solid and satisfying.
No person, no possession, no thought, no feeling.
Nothing can be clung to and found to be steady and supportive.
This is right view, beyond our ordinary every-day perception.
It results from right concentration and comes from dealing with dukkha in a positive, welcoming way.
When we try to escape from dukkha by either forgetting about it, running away from it, blaming someone else, becoming depressed by it or feeling sorry for ourselves, we are creating more dukkha.
All these methods are based on self-delusion.
The knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-really-are is the first step on the noble path, everything else has been the preliminary work.
Sometimes our understanding may feel like one of those mystery pictures that children play with.
Now you see it, now you don't.
When any aspect of Dhamma is clearly visible to us, we must keep on resurrecting that vision.
If it is correct, dukkha has no sting, it just is.
Decay, disease and death do not appear fearful.
There is nothing to fear, because everything falls apart continually.
This body disintegrates and the mind changes every moment.
Without knowledge and vision of reality, the practice is difficult.
After having this clear perception, the practice is the only possible thing to do.
Everything else is only a side-issue and a distraction.
From the knowledge-and-vision arises disenchantment with what the world has to offer.
All the glitter that seems to be gold turns out to be fool's gold, which cannot satisfy.
It gives us pleasure for one moment and displeasure the next and has to be searched for again and again.
The world of the senses has fooled us so often that we're still enmeshed in it and still experiencing dukkha, unless the true vision arises.
There's a poster available in Australia which reads: “Life, be in it.” Wouldn't it be better if it said, “Life, be out of it?” Life and existence is bound up with the constant renewal of our sense contacts, seeing, hearing, tasting, touching, smelling and thinking.
Only when we have clear perception, will disenchantment set in and then the most wonderful sense contact will no longer entice us to react.
It just exists, but doesn't touch our heart.
Mara, the tempter, has lost his grip and has been shown the door.
He's waiting at the doorstep to slip in again, at the first possible opportunity, but he isn't so comfortably ensconced inside any more.
This brings a great deal of security and satisfaction to the heart.
One won't be swayed to leave this path of practice.
When Mara is still calling, there's no peace in the heart.
One can't be at ease and satisfied, because there's always something new to tempt us.
With knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-really-are and subsequent disenchantment, we realize that the Buddha's path leads us to tranquillity, peace and the end of dukkha.
Dukkha is really our staunchest friend, our most faithful supporter.
We'll never find another friend or helpmate like it, if it is seen in the right way, without resistance or rejection.
When we use dukkha as our incentive for practice, gratitude and appreciation for it will arise.
This takes the sting out of our pain and transforms it into our most valuable experience.
Most people are inclined to blame either themselves or others for whatever they consider wrong.
Some people like to blame mostly others, some prefer to blame themselves.
Neither way is profitable, or will bring peace of mind.
It may help to really get a grip on the facts that prevail within each human being by knowing the underlying tendencies within us.
If we understand that every human being has these tendencies, then we may be less inclined to blame or be upset or take offence and more inclined to accept with equanimity.
We may be more prone to work on these negatives when we become aware of them in ourselves.
The underlying tendencies are more subtle than the five hindrances: the hindrances are gross and exhibit themselves in that way.
Sensual desire: wanting that which is pleasing to the senses.
Ill-will: getting angry, upset.
Sloth and torpor: having no energy whatsoever.
Sloth refers to the body, torpor to the mind.
Restlessness and worry: being ill-at-ease, no peacefulness.
Sceptical doubt: not knowing which way to turn.
These five are easily discernible in oneself and others.
But the underlying tendencies are more difficult to pinpoint.
They are the hidden sources for the hindrances to arise, and in order to get rid of them, one needs keen mindfulness and a great deal of discernment.
Having worked with the five hindrances in oneself and to a certain degree having let go of their grossest aspects, one can begin work on the underlying tendencies.
The word itself suggests their characteristic, namely, that their roots are deeply imbedded and therefore hard to see and eliminate.
The first two tendencies are similar to the hindrances sensuality and irritation, being the underlying bases for sensual desire and anger.
Even when sensual desire has been largely abandoned and anger no longer arises, the disposition to sensuality and irritation remain.
Sensuality is part and parcel of a human being and shows itself in becoming attached and reacting to what one sees, hears, smells, tastes, touches and thinks.
One is concerned with what one feels and has not yet come to the understanding that the sense objects are only impermanent phenomena arising and passing away.
When this lack of profound insight is still prevalent, one ascribes importance to the impressions which come in through the senses.
One is drawn to them and seeks pleasure in them.
When the senses are still playing an important part in a person, there is sensuality.
Man is a sensuous being.
There is a verse which describes the noble Sangha as having “pacified senses.” The Loving-Kindness Sutta describes the ideal monk as “with senses calmed.” In many a sutta the Buddha said that getting rid of sense desire is the way to Nibbana.
Sensuality as an ingrained part of being human has to be transcended with great effort and cannot be done without insight.
It's impossible to succeed just by avowing: “sensuality isn't useful, I'll let go of it.” One has to gain the insight that these sense contacts have no intrinsic value in themselves.
There is a coming together of the sense base with the sense object and the sense consciousness to form an impingement.
That's all that's happening.
As long as one reacts to these contacts as if they had importance, there is sensuality.
Where there is sensuality, there is also irritation, the two go hand in hand.
Sensuality is satisfied when the sense contact impingement was pleasant.
Irritation arises when the sense contact was unpleasant.
It doesn't have to issue as anger, shouting, fury, hate or even resistance.
It's just irritation, which results in being displeased, feeling ill-at-ease and restless.
It goes together with being a sensuous human being.
Sensuality and irritation only disappear for the non-returner.
The last stage before full Enlightenment: one who does not return to this realm, but attains Nibbana in the “Pure Abodes.” Even the stream-enterer and the once-returner, the first and second stage of noble attainment, are still beset by the dukkha of sensuality and irritation.
If one imagines that the impulse creating sensuality or irritation is outside of oneself, one hasn't seen the beginning of the path yet.
It is necessary to realize that the reaction is our own, so that we may start work on ourselves.
If we don't even notice it happening, how can we do anything about it?
It's occurring constantly, without let-up, so that we have innumerable occasions to become aware of our inner world.
Becoming aware doesn't mean yet that we can get rid of our reactions.
There also has to be an understanding of the futility of an unwholesome response and an effort to investigate the causes.
It's easy to see that sensuality and irritation are the underlying tendencies which creates sensual desire and ill-will.
This insight should arouse a little acceptance and tolerance towards one's own difficulties and those of other people.
If this is happening to everyone constantly, then what is there to get upset about?
The only thing to do is to work with it, to use it as one's subject for contemplation and introspection.
It's well worthwhile to use one's difficulties as one's method for the task of purification.
Our tendencies and hindrances are all interconnected.
If one is able to diminish one, the others also become a little less obstructive, lose their heaviness and cease to be so frightening.
People generally fear their own reactions.
That is why they often feel threatened by others; they're not so much afraid of the other person's reaction, but far more so of their own.
They're unsure of themselves, fearing to become aggressive, angry and then losing some of their own self-image.
Having a self-image is very detrimental, because it is based on the illusion of permanence.
Everything constantly changes, including ourselves, while a self-image presupposes stability.
One moment we may be a sensual being, the next moment an irritable one.
Sometimes we are at ease, at other times we are restless.
Which one are we?
To have an image of oneself creates a concept of permanence which can never have any basis in fact.
It blocks one's insight into the underlying tendencies because one will be blind to those which do not fit one's image.
The third underlying tendency is doubt or hesitation.
If one has doubts, one hesitates: “What am I going to do next?” One doubts one's own path and abilities, and how to proceed.
Due to hesitation, one doesn't use one's time wisely.
At times one may waste it or overindulge in activities which are not beneficial.
Doubt means that one doesn't have an inner vision to guide one, but is obsessed by uncertainty.
Doubts and hesitation lie in our hearts because of a feeling of insecurity.
We are afraid of not being safe.
But there's no safety anywhere, the only one that can be found is Nibbana.
This fear and insecurity in the heart cause doubt and hesitation to arise.
If we were to leave them behind and not pay any attention to them, we could step ahead so much more easily and could accomplish many times more.
Doubt and hesitation are abandoned with stream-entry.
The one who has attained the first Path and Fruit no longer doubts, because that person has had a personal experience of an unconditioned reality, totally different from the relative reality in which we live.
He can now forge ahead without worry or fear.
There can be no doubt about a direct experience.
If we tell a small child: “Please don't touch the stove, you might get burned,” it's quite likely that the child will nevertheless touch the stove.
Having once touched it and experienced the painful feeling of being burned, he will surely never touch it again.
The experience removes doubt and hesitation.
The next underlying tendency is the wrong view of relating all that happens to a “self.” This goes on constantly and we can verify that easily, as it happens to everybody.
Very few people realize: “This is just mental phenomena.” They believe: “I think.” When there is pain in the body, few will say: “It's just an unpleasant feeling.” They'll say: “I'm feeling very badly,” or “I have a terrible pain.” This reaction to whatever happens as “self” is due to an underlying tendency so deeply imbedded that it takes great effort to loosen its hold.
To lose the wrong view of self does not simply mean to intellectually understand that there is no real “self.” What is required is an inner view of this whole conglomeration of mind and body as nothing but mere phenomena without ownership.
The first step is taken at stream-entry, when right view of “self” arises, though all clinging to self-concepts is abandoned only at arahant level.
Next comes pride and conceit, which here means having a certain concept of ourselves, such as being a man or a woman, young or old, beautiful or ugly.
We conceive of what we want, feel, think, know, own and what we can do.
All this conceptualizing creates ownership and we become proud of possessions, knowledge, skills, feelings, being someone special.
This pride may be deeply hidden in ourselves and hard to find and may need some introspective digging.
This is due to the fact that so much of our whole being is involved.
When we say: “Now find that concept about being a woman,” the answer often is: “Of course, I am a woman, what else am I?” But as long as “I am” anything, woman, man, child, stupid or intelligent, “I am” far from Nibbana.
Whatever I conceptualize myself to be stops me in my tracks.
The underlying tendency of pride and conceit is only uprooted for the arahant.
There's no directly discernible relationship to any of the hindrances there, but the conceiving of “self” and the wrong view of “self” are the chief manifestations of delusion, the root cause for all our defilements.
Next we come to clinging to existence.
That's our survival syndrome, clinging to being here, not willing to give up, not ready to die today.
We must learn to be ready to die now, not wishing to die, but to be ready for it.
Wishing to die is the other side of the same coin of clinging to existence.
It's trying to get rid of existence because life is too difficult.
But being ready to die now means that the clinging to being someone and being here to prove it, has been abandoned, for it has been seen to be a fallacy.
At that time wrong view of “self” has been eliminated.
Clinging to existence brings us into a dependency syndrome.
We want everything to work out well for us and resent it if that doesn't happen.
This creates irritation and sensuality.
We often forget that we are only guests here on this planet and our visit is limited and can be over at any time.
This clinging to being alive brings much difficulty to all of us because it projects us into the future so that we can't attend to the present.
If we don't live in the present, we're missing out on being alive at all.
There's no life in the future, it's all ideation, conjecture, a hope and a prayer.
If we really want to be alive and experience things as they are, we've got to be here now, attending to each moment.
This entails letting go of clinging to what will happen to us in the future, particularly whether we are going to continue to exist.
Existing in this moment is enough.
To be able to let go of that clinging means to let go of the future, only then will there be strong mindfulness, real attention and clear knowing.
Clinging to existence will always give us the idea that something better will come along if we just wait long enough and that denies effort.
Effort can only be made now, who knows what tomorrow will bring?
The last of the seven tendencies is ignorance.
Ignoring the Four Noble Truths.
Ignorance is the so-called starting point in the chain of cause and effect which brings us back to birth and death again and again.
Ignorance opposes wisdom, and here it concerns the fact that we disregard reality by not realizing that all our dukkha comes from wanting, even if our desire may be a wholesome one.
If we continue to ignore the first two noble truths, not to speak of the third truth, which is Nibbana, we are enmeshed in dukkha.
Our underlying tendency of ignorance eventuates in the wrong view of “self” — the conceiving of a “self” — showing us the interconnection of all the underlying tendencies.
Without ignorance there wouldn't be any sensuality and irritation, nor any hesitation or doubt, no wrong view, nor pride and conceit, or clinging to existence.
It's very useful to pick the characteristic that creates difficulties for us over and over again and make it one's focus of attention.
Since they are all interconnected, minimizing one will help to reduce the others to more manageable proportions.
To see these underlying tendencies in oneself takes a great deal of proper attention towards oneself, which needs time and solitude.
One can't do it while talking with others.
If the mind is clear one can do it during meditation sessions or through contemplation.
Contemplation is a valid adjunct to meditation, an important helpmate and is always directed towards insight, while meditation may at times be geared towards serenity.
Contemplation means looking inward and trying to see what arises: “What makes me tick?” With utter truthfulness, remembering the underlying tendencies, knowing that everybody has them, one can ask: “How are they manifesting in me?” Once that has been seen, there is further validity in contemplating: “What can I do about getting rid of this particular tendency, or at least minimizing it?” One should allot some time during each day for contemplation.
If one has spent a whole day without introspection, one can't hope to go inward at meditation time.
Meditation and contemplation complement and need each other.
Sorrowless, stainless and secure are three attributes of an Enlightened One.
Sorrowless: no dukkha; Stainless: no defilements; and Secure: no fear.
Obviously these three are extremely desirable, as they make for happiness.
When we think that they are characteristics of an arahant, we might wonder: “This is so far removed from me, how can I even aspire to that?” The conviction might arise that it's too immense to consider for one's own achievement.
We all know what it means to have sorrow.
We are familiar with our defilements, when we get upset, worried, anxious, envious or jealous.
We have all experienced fear.
It can be fear of death of oneself or of loved ones, or fear of not being liked, praised, accepted, or fear of not reaching one's goals, or of making a fool of oneself.
We can also experience the opposites of those three states.
The seeds are within us, otherwise Enlightenment would be a myth.
It is possible to have moments of being sorrowless, stainless and secure.
If one has a really concentrated meditation, momentarily dukkha doesn't arise.
Only one-pointedness.
No defilements can enter because the mind is otherwise occupied.
It can either have defilements or be concentrated, which is wonderful, though may last only one single moment.
There can be no fear because all is well at such a time.
The more often one regenerates these moments of being sorrowless, stainless and secure, the more they become part of oneself and we can revert to them again.
Even just remembering that it is possible and trying to bring up a little of these feelings, enters into a person as part of his or her makeup.
Just as a person with fear of not being accepted, or worried about achievements, experiencing a lack of self-confidence, will always act accordingly.
He or she doesn't even have to make an effort, but remembers his or her fears and re-enacts them.
The same goes for the liberated mind-states.
Every moment of concentration during meditation is a moment of no defilements, no sorrow and no fear.
That sort of experience must be duplicated over and over again.
Thereby we reinforce our liberated mind-states and as we remember them we can retain them and act in accordance with them even under ordinary or trying circumstances.
Defilements need not arise constantly, there are pauses when there is no ill-will, only loving-kindness, no sensual desire, only generosity and renunciation.
Sensual desire means wanting, renunciation means giving up.
When one gives, one isn't desiring, unless one is wishing for applause or gratitude.
If one gives for giving's sake, then there is a moment of no defilement.
The same holds true for loving-kindness, compassion and helpfulness, which are all opposed to greed.
When we have no doubt, being absolutely sure of what we're doing — and these moments do arise — that too is an instant of being stainless.
No worries, no restlessness also add to our freedom.
Not wanting to go anywhere or do anything; not worrying about what was done or left undone in the past, which is absurd anyway, when one realizes that nobody cares a year or even a month from now, least of all oneself.
We all know moments without all this dukkha.
When those moments arise, we are “stainless,” without any blemishes, sorrowless and fearless.
We feel at ease and secure at such a time, which is difficult to find in the world.
There are so many dangers threatening our desire for survival, and they are constantly with us.
But when heart and mind are fully occupied with purified states, fear does not have a chance to arise.
On our way to the “deathless,” we need to regenerate these liberated moments and bring them up over and over again.
We can relish these mind states, enjoying the knowledge that they are possible.
It is a natural tendency to resurrect our moments of freedom again and again, so that we stay on the path to liberation.
Concentration in meditation brings a quiet and joy with it which prove with absolute certainty that they have nothing to do with outer conditions.
They are strictly factors of the mind, which are our doorway to freedom.
We cannot cultivate them successfully if we neglect them during those hours when we're not meditating.
We need to guard and protect the mind from evil thoughts at all times.
When we do experience liberated mind-moments, we must not think they have come to us from outside.
Just as we cannot blame the external trigger for what goes wrong in the mind, so we cannot praise it for the opposite.
Outside occurrences are quite unreliable and beyond our control.
To depend on anything so unreliable is foolishness.
Our practice is to generate the undefiled states in our mind, which opens the way to successful meditation and is the pathway to liberation.
When the mind is without defilements, clear and at ease, without the convolutions of discursive thinking, simply aware, happiness and peace arise.
These moments, though short-lived, are like a light at the end of a tunnel, which appears dark and suffocating.
It seems never ending, because for the lack of light, one cannot see its length.
If we cultivate and make much of these single moments, then there is an illumination and we can see that the tunnel does have an end.
Because of that, joy is generated in one's heart, which is an important adjunct to practice.
The Buddha taught a balanced path, namely to see reality for what it is, to know that dukkha is inescapable, but to have the counterbalance of joy from knowing that there is a way out.
If we are too imbued with sorrow and are feeling weighed down under that, believing only that to be the path, then our actions and reactions will have to be based on our suffering.
Being oppressed with dukkha doesn't make for successful meditation, nor for harmonious living.
If we try to negate dukkha, and suppress it, then we are not facing reality.
But if we see dukkha as an universal characteristic, knowing we can do something about its abandonment then we are keeping in balance.
We need equipoise in order to practice successfully.
To have an ambition seems to be a natural phenomenon in the human make-up.
Some people want to be rich, powerful or famous.
Some want to be very knowledgeable, to get degrees.
Some just want to find a little niche for themselves where they can look out of the window and see the same scenery every day.
Some want to find a perfect partner, or as near perfect as possible.
Even when we are not living in the world, but in a nunnery, we have ambitions: to become excellent meditators, to be perfectly peaceful, that this life-style should yield results.
There's always something to hope for.
Why is that?
Because it's in the future, never in the present.
Instead of being attentive to what is now, we are hoping for something better to come, maybe tomorrow.
Then, when tomorrow arrives, it has to be the next day again, because it still wasn't perfect enough.
If we were to change this pattern in our thinking habits and rather become attentive to what is, then we would find something to satisfy us.
But when we are looking at that which doesn't exist yet, more perfect, more wonderful, more satisfying, then we can't find anything at all, because we are looking for that which isn't there.
The Buddha spoke about two kinds of people, the ordinary worldling and the noble person.
Obviously it is a worthwhile ambition to become a noble person, but if we keep looking for it at some future time, then it will escape us.
The difference between a noble one and a worldling is the experience of “path and fruit”.
The first moment of this supermundane consciousness is termed stream-entry and the person who experiences it is a stream-winner.
If we put that into our mind as a goal in the future, it will not come about, because we are not using all our energy and strength to recognize each moment.
Only in the recognition of each moment can a path moment occur.
The distinguishing factor between a worldling and a noble one is the elimination of the first three fetters binding us to continuous existence.
These three, obstructing the worldling, are: wrong view of self, sceptical doubt and belief in rites and rituals,.
Anyone who is not a stream-winner is chained to these three wrong beliefs and reactions that lead away from freedom into bondage.
Let's take a look at sceptical doubt first.
It's that niggling thought in the back of the mind: “There must be an easier way,” or “I'm sure I can find happiness somewhere in this wide world.” As long as there's doubt that the path of liberation leads out of the world, and the belief is there that satisfaction can be found within the world, there is no chance of noble attainment, because one is looking in the wrong direction.
Within this world with its people and things, animals and possessions, scenery and sense contacts, there is nothing to be found other than that which we already know.
If there were more, why isn't it easily discernible, why haven't we found it?
It should be quite plain to see.
What are we looking for then?
Obviously we are looking for happiness and peace, just like everyone else is doing.
Sceptical doubt, that alarmist, says: “I'm sure if I just handled it a little cleverer than I did last time I'll be happy.
There are a few things I haven't tried yet.” Maybe we haven't flown our own plane yet, or lived in a cave in the Himalayas or sailed around the world, or written that best-selling novel.
All of these are splendid things to do in the world except they are a waste of time and energy.
Sceptical doubt makes itself felt when one isn't quite sure what one's next move should be.
“Where am I going, what am I to do?” One hasn't found a direction yet.
Sceptical doubt is the fetter in the mind when the clarity which comes from a path moment is absent.
The consciousness arising at that time removes all doubt, because one has experienced the proof oneself.
When we bite into the mango, we know its taste.
The wrong view of self is the most damaging fetter that besets the ordinary person.
It contains the deeply imbedded “this is me” notion.
Maybe it's not even “my” body, but there is “someone” who is meditating.
This “someone” wants to get enlightened, wants to become a stream-winner, wants to be happy.
This wrong view of self is the cause of all problems that could possibly arise.
As long as there's “somebody” there, that person can have problems.
When there's nobody there, who could have difficulties?
Wrong view of self is the root which generates all subsequent pain, grief and lamentation.
With it also come the fears and worries: “Am I going to be alright, happy, peaceful, find what I am looking for, get what I want, be healthy, wealthy and wise?” These worries and fears are well substantiated from one's own past.
One hasn't always been healthy, wealthy and wise, nor gotten what one wanted, nor felt wonderful.
So there's very good reason to be worried and fearful as long as wrong view of self prevails.
Rites and rituals in themselves are not harmful, only believing them to be part of the path to Nibbana is detrimental.
They need not even be religious, although we usually think of them like that.
Such as offering flowers and incense on a shrine, prostrating or celebrating certain festivals and believing that this will accumulate enough merit to go to the Deva realms.
It's devotion, respect and gratitude to the Triple Gem, which count.
But this belief is not only confined to religious activities.
Everybody lives with rites and rituals, even though we may not be aware of them.
In human relationships there are certain prescribed ways of acting in respect to one's parents, one's children, one's partners.
How one relates in one's job, to friends and strangers, how one wants to be confirmed by others, all is connected to preconceived ideas of what is right and proper in a certain culture and tradition.
None of it has any basic truth in it, all is mind-made.
The more ideas one has, the less one can see reality.
The more one believes in them the harder it is to abandon them.
As one imagines oneself to be a certain kind of person, one relates in that way in all situations.
It doesn't have to be how we put flowers on a shrine, it can also be how we greet people, if we do it according to a certain stereotyped ritual and not the way an open heart and mind may dictate.
These three obstructions fall away when a path and fruit moment has been experienced.
There's a marked change in such a person, which is — of course — not externally visible.
It would be nice to wear a halo and look blissful.
But the inner change is firstly that the experience leaves absolutely no doubt what has to be done in this life.
The event is totally different from anything previously known, so much so, that it makes one's former life, up to that point, immaterial.
Nothing can be found in the past which has fundamental importance.
The only significance lies in going ahead with the practice so that this minimal experience of the first path moment can be fortified, resurrected and firmly established in oneself.
The path and fruit moments recur for the once-returner, the non-returner and the Enlightened One.
Each time they are not only deepened, but can be lengthened.
One could compare this to having examinations at the university.
If one is going through four years of university study to get a certain degree, one has to pass examinations at the end of each year.
One has to answer questions each time, based on one's previously absorbed knowledge.
But the questions become deeper, more profound and more difficult with each subsequent examination.
While they are always concerned with the same subject, they require more depth and profundity of understanding each time.
Until one finally graduates and doesn't have to return to university.
It's the same with our spiritual development.
Each path moment is based on the previous one and is concerned with the same subject, yet it goes deeper and further.
Until one passes one's final test and need not return again.
The path moment doesn't have any thinking or feeling in it.
It is not comparable to the meditative absorptions.
Although it is based upon them because only the concentrated mind can enter into a path moment, it does not have the same qualities.
the meditative absorptions have — in their initial stages — the ingredients of rapture, happiness and peacefulness.
Later on, the mind experiences expansion, nothingness and a change of perception.
The path moment does not contain any of these states of mind.
It has a quality of non-being.
This is such a relief and changes one's world view so totally that it is quite understandable that the Buddha made such a distinction between a worldling and a Noble One.
While the meditative absorptions bring with them a feeling of oneness, of unity, the path moment does not even contain that.
The moment of fruition, subsequent to the path moment, is the understood experience and results in a turned-around vision of existence.
The new understanding recognizes every thought, every feeling as stress.
The most elevated thought, the most sublime feeling still has this quality.
Only when there is nothing, is there no stress.
There is nothing internal or external that contains the quality of total satisfactoriness.
Because of such an inner vision, the passion for wanting anything is discarded.
All has been seen for what it really is and nothing can give the happiness that arises through the practice of the path and its results.
The Nibbanic element cannot be truly described as bliss, because bliss has a connotation of exhilaration.
We use the word “bliss” for the meditative absorption, where it includes a sense of excitement.
The Nibbanic element does not recognize bliss because all that arises is seen as stress.
“The bliss of Nibbana” may give one the impression that one may find perfect happiness, but the opposite is true.
One finds that there is nothing and therefore no more unhappiness, only peace.
To look for path and fruit will not bring them about, because only moment to moment awareness can do so.
This awareness will eventually culminate in real concentration where one can let go of thinking and be totally absorbed.
We can drop the meditation subject at that time.
We need not push it aside, it falls away of its own accord, and absorption in awareness occurs.
If there has to be an ambition in one's life, this is the only worthwhile one.
All others will not bring fulfillment.
One doesn't have to force oneself to give up sceptical doubt.
What is there to doubt when one has experienced the truth?
If one hits oneself with a hammer, one feels pain and cannot doubt it.
One knows from one's own experience.
Rites and rituals are brought to an interesting end because the person who has experienced a path moment will under no circumstance indulge in any role-playing.
All roles are the ingredients of unreality.
One may continue religious rites, because they contain aspects of respect, gratitude and devotion.
But there will not be any rituals in how to relate to people or to situations or how to invent stories about oneself because the response is with a spontaneous open heart.
Letting go of the wrong view of self is — of course — the most profound change, causing all other changes.
For the stream-winner the wrong view of self can never intellectually arise again, but feeling-wise it can, because the path moment has been so fleeting.
It hasn't made the complete impact yet.
If it had done so, it would have resulted in Enlightenment.
This is possible and is mentioned in the Buddha's discourses as having happened during his lifetime.
All four stages of holiness were realized while listening to the Dhamma.
The initial fruit moment needs to be re-lived, one has to resurrect it over and over again, until the second path moment can arise.
It's like repeating what one knows and not forgetting so that one can build upon it.
It is very useful to remind oneself in all waking moments that body, feeling, perception, mental formations and consciousness are all impermanent and have no core substance, changing from moment to moment.
Whether one has had a direct vision of non-self or just an understanding of it, either way one has to bring it back into one's mind and re-live it as often as possible.
As we continue to do this, ordinary problems arise less and less.
If we remain aware of the impermanence of all that exists, our difficulties seem far less important and the view of self subtly changes.
The view we have of ourselves is our worst enemy.
Everyone has made up a persona, a mask that one wears and we don't want to see what's behind it.
We don't allow anyone else to look either.
After having had a path moment, that is no longer possible.
But the mask, fear and rejection come to the fore.
The best antidote is to remember again and again, that there's really nobody there, only phenomena, nothing more.
Even though the inner vision may not be concrete enough to substantiate such a claim, the affirmation helps to loosen the grasping and clinging and to hang on a little less tightly.
The direction of the practice is certainly towards stream-entry.
However, there is nothing to get, there's everything to give up.
Unless that is done, the moment cannot happen, and we will continue to live in the same way we always have.
Beset by dukkha obstructed by dukkha, subject to praise and blame, loss and gain, fame and ill-fame, happiness and unhappiness.
The usual problems — all caused by “self” — will arise again and again.
The real change comes when there is a decisive alteration in the way we view ourselves, otherwise the difficulties remain the same because the same identical person is generating them.
Being mindfully aware in and out of meditation is the practice which will bring results.
It means doing one thing at a time, attentive to mind and body.
When listening to Dhamma, only listen.
When sitting in meditation, only attending to the meditation subject.
When planting a tree, only planting.
No frills, no judgments.
That habituates the mind to be in each moment.
Only in such a way can a path moment occur.
It's not in the distant future, it's possible here and now.
There's no reason why an intelligent, healthy, committed person should not be able to attain it with patience and perseverance.
We have heard about disenchantment and dispassion as steps on the path to liberation and freedom.
They cannot have meaning and impact unless there is a vision of a totally different reality, one which does not contain the world's manifoldness.
When one sits in meditation and starts thinking, that's the temptation of diversification and expansion.
The Nibbana element is one, not manifold.
One could say that it's empty of all that we know.
Until that is seen, the world will keep calling, but we need not believe it all.
It is a difficult task.
So one has to remind oneself often, otherwise one gets caught by temptation.
One should not be surprised when one doesn't find happiness; manifoldness, diversification cannot create happiness, only distraction.
Certainly one can experience pleasure from the senses.
If one has good karma there will be many occasions.
Good food, beautiful scenery, pleasant people, good music, interesting books, a comfortable home, not too much physical discomfort.
But do these bring fulfillment?
Since it didn't happen in the past, why should it occur in the future?
Path and fruit bring fulfillment because they are empty of phenomena.
Emptiness does not change nor does it become unpleasant and it cannot lack peace, since there is nothing to disturb it.
When people hear or read about Nibbana, they are apt to say: “How can I want nothing?” When one has seen that everything one can possibly want is meant to fill an inner void and dissatisfaction, then the time has come to want nothing.
This goes beyond “not wanting” because one now accepts the reality that there is nothing worthwhile to be had.
Not wanting anything will make it possible to experience that there is actually nothing — only peace and quiet.
Discussing the practice is more useful than discussing anything else because it gives rise to insight.
If we follow the practice step by step we can read ourselves, continually deciphering things within us.
As you read yourself through probing and investigating the harm and suffering caused by defilement, craving, and attachment, there will be times when you come to true knowledge, enabling you to grow dispassionate and let go.
The mind will then immediately grow still, with none of the mental concoctions that used to have the run of the place through your lack of self-investigation.
The principles of self-investigation are our most important tools.
We have to make a concerted effort to master them at all times, with special emphasis on using mindfulness to focus on the mind and bring it to centered concentration.
If we don't focus on keeping the mind centered or neutral as its basic stance, it will wander off in various ways in pursuit of preoccupations or sensory contacts, giving rise to turmoil and restlessness.
But when we practice restraint over the sensory doors by maintaining continuous mindfulness in the heart, it's like driving in the pilings for a dam.
If you've ever seen the pilings for a dam, you'll know that they're driven deep, deep into the ground so that they're absolutely firm and immovable.
But if you drive them into mud, they're easily swayed by the slightest contact.
This should give us an idea of how firm our mindfulness should be in supervising the mind to make it stable, able to withstand sensory contact without liking or disliking its objects.
The firmness of your mindfulness is something you have to maintain continuously in your every activity, with every in-and-out breath.
The mind will stop being scattered in search for preoccupations.
If you don't manage this, then the mind will get stirred up whenever there's sensory contact, like a rudderless ship going wherever the wind and waves will take it.
This is why you need mindfulness to guard the mind at every moment.
If you can make mindfulness constant, in every activity, the mind will be continuously neutral, ready to probe and investigate for insight.
As a first step in driving in the pilings for our dam — in other words, in making mindfulness firm — we have to focus on neutrality as our basic stance.
There's nothing you have to think about.
Simply make the mind solid in its neutrality.
If you can do this continuously, that's when you'll have a true standard for your investigation, because the mind will have gathered into concentration.
But this concentration is something you have to watch over carefully to make sure it's not just oblivious indifference.
Make the mind firmly established and centered so that it doesn't get absentminded or distracted as you sit in meditation.
Sit straight, maintain steady mindfulness, and there's nothing else you have to do.
Keep the mind firm and neutral, not thinking of anything at all.
Make sure this stability stays continuous.
When anything pops up, no matter how, keep the mind neutral.
For example, if there's a feeling of pleasure or pain, don't focus on the feeling.
Simply focus on the stability of the mind — and there will be a sense of neutrality in that stability.
If you're careful not to let the mind get absentminded or distracted, its concentration will become continuous.
For example, if you're going to sit for an hour of meditation, focus on centering the mind like this for the first half hour and then make sure it doesn't wander off anywhere until the hour is up.
If you change positions, it's simply an outer change in the body, while the mind is still firmly centered and neutral each moment you're standing, sitting, lying down, or whatever.
Mindfulness is the key factor in all of this, keeping the mind from concocting thoughts or labeling things.
Everything has to stop.
Keep this foundation snug and stable with every in-and-out breath.
Then you can relax your focus on the breath while keeping the mind in the same state of neutrality.
Relax your heavy focus so that it feels just right with the breath.
The mind will be able to stay in this state for the entire hour, free from any thoughts that might wander off the path.
Then keep an eye out to see that no matter what you do or say, the mind stays solidly in its normal state of inward knowing.
If the mind is stable within itself, you're protected on all sides.
When sensory contacts come, you stay focused on being aware of your mental stability.
Even if there are any momentary slips in your mindfulness, you get right back to the stability of the mind.
Other than that, there's nothing you have to do.
The mind will let go without your having to do anything else.
The way you used to like this, hate that, turn left here, turn right there, won't be able to happen.
The mind will stay neutral, equanimous, just right.
If mindfulness lapses, you get right back to your focus, recognizing when the mind is centered and neutral toward its objects and then keeping it that way.
The pilings for the dam of mindfulness have to be driven in so that they're solid and secure with your every activity.
Keep working at this no matter what you're doing.
If you can train the mind so that stability is its basic stance, it won't get into mischief.
It won't cause you any trouble.
It won't concoct thoughts.
It will be quiet.
Once it's quiet and centered, it'll grow more refined and probe in to penetrate within itself, to know its own state of concentration from within.
As for sensory contacts, those are things outside — appearing only to disappear — so it's not interested.
This can make cravings disband.
Even when we change positions as pains arise in the body, the mind in that moment is stable, focused not on the pains but on its own stability.
When you change positions, there will be physical and mental reactions as the circulation improves and pleasant feelings arise in place of the pains, but the mind won't get snagged on either the pleasure or the pain.
It will simply stay stable: centered and firm in its neutrality.
This stability can easily help you abandon the cravings that lie latent in connection with all feelings.
But if you don't keep the mind centered in advance like this, craving will create issues, provoking the mind into a turmoil, wanting to change things so as to get this or that kind of happiness.
If we practice in this way repeatedly, hammering at this point over and over again, it's like driving pilings into the ground.
The deeper we can drive them, the more immovable they'll be.
That's when you'll be able to withstand sensory contacts.
Otherwise, the mind will start boiling over with its thought concoctions in pursuit of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations.
Sometimes it keeps concocting the same old senseless issues over and over again.
This is because the pilings of mindfulness aren't yet firmly in place.
The way we've been stumbling through life is due to the fact that we haven't really practiced to the point where mindfulness is continuous enough to make the mind firmly centered and neutral.
So we have to make our dam of mindfulness solid and secure.
This centeredness of mind is something we should develop with every activity, with every in-and-out breath.
This way we'll be able to see through our illusions, all the way into the truths of inconstancy and not-self.
Otherwise, the mind will go straying off here and there like a mischievous monkey — yet even monkeys can be caught and trained to perform tricks.
In the same way, the mind is something that can be trained, but if you don't tie it to the post of mindfulness and give it a taste of the stick, it'll be very hard to tame.
When training the mind, you shouldn't force it too much, nor can you simply let it go its habitual ways.
You have to test yourself to see what gets results.
If you don't get your mindfulness focused, it'll quickly go running out after preoccupations or easily waver under the impact of its objects.
When people let their minds simply drift along with the flow of things, it's because they haven't established mindfulness as a solid stance.
When this is the case, they can't stop.
They can't grow still.
They can't be free.
This is why we have to start out by driving in the pilings for our dam so that they're good and solid, keeping the mind stable and centered whether we're sitting, standing, walking, or lying down.
This stability will then be able to withstand everything.
Your mindfulness will stay with its foundation, just like a monkey tied to a post: It can't run off or get into mischief.
It can only circle the post to which its leash is tied.
Keep training the mind until it's tame enough to settle down and investigate things, for if it's still scattered about, it's of no use at all.
You have to train it until it's familiar with what inner stability is like, for your own instability and lack of commitment in training it is what allows it to get all entangled with thought-concoctions, with things that arise and then pass away.
You have to get it to stop.
Why is it so mischievous?
Why is it so scattered?
Why does it keep wandering off?
Get in under control!
Get it to stop, to settle down and grow centered!
At this stage you all have practiced enough to gain at least a taste of centered concentration.
The next step is to use mindfulness to maintain it in your every activity, so that even if there are any distractions, they last only for a moment and don't turn into long issues.
Keep driving in the pilings until they're solid every time there's an impact from external objects, or so that the mental concoctions that go straying out from within are all brought to stillness in every way.
This training isn't really all that hard.
The important point is that, whichever of the many meditation subjects you choose, you stay mindful and aware of the mind state that's centered and neutral.
If, when the mind goes straying out after objects, you keep bringing it back to its centeredness over and over again, the mind will eventually be able to stay firmly in its stance.
In other words, its mindfulness will become constant, ready to probe and investigate, because when the mind really settles down, it gains the power to read the facts within itself clearly.
If it's not centered, it can jumble everything up to fool you, switching from this issue to that, from this role to that; but if it's centered, it can disband everything — all defilements, cravings, and attachments — on every side.
So what this practice comes down to is how much effort and persistence you put into getting the mind firmly centered.
Once it's firm, then when there arise all the sufferings and defilements that would otherwise get it soiled and worked up, it can withstand them just as the pilings of a dam can withstand windstorms without budging.
You have to be clearly aware of this state of mind so that you won't go out liking this or hating that.
This state will then become your point of departure for probing and investigating so as to gain the insight that sees clearly all the way through — but you have to make sure that this centeredness is continuous.
Then you won't have to think about anything.
Simply look right in, deeply and subtly.
The important point is that you get rid of absentmindedness and distractions.
This in itself gets rid of a lot of delusion and ignorance, and leaves no opening for craving to create any issues that will stir up the mind and set it wandering.
This is because we've established our stance in advance.
Even if we lose our normal balance a little bit, we get right back to focusing on the stability of our concentration.
If we keep at this over and over again, the stability of the mind with its continuous mindfulness will enable us to probe into the truths of inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
In the beginning, though, you don't have to do any probing.
It's better simply to focus on the stability of your stance, for if you start probing when the mind isn't really centered and stable, you'll end up scattered.
So focus on making centeredness the basic level of the mind and then start probing in deeper and deeper.
This will lead to insights that grow more and more telling and profound, bringing the mind to a state of freedom within itself, or to a state where it is no longer hassled by defilement.
This in itself will bring about true mastery over the sense doors.
At first, when we started out, we weren't able to exercise any real restraint over the eyes and ears, but once the mind becomes firmly centered, then the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and body are automatically brought under control.
If there's no mindfulness and concentration, you can't keep your eyes under control, because the mind will want to use them to look and to see, it will want to use the ears to listen to all kinds of things.
So instead of exercising restraint outside, at the senses, we exercise it inside, right at the mind, making the mind firmly centered and neutral at all times.
Regardless of whether you're talking or whatever, the mind's focus stays in place.
Once you can do this, you'll regard the objects of the senses as meaningless.
You won't have to take issue with things, thinking, “This is good, I like it.
This is bad, I don't like it.
This is pretty; that's ugly.” The same holds true with the sounds you hear.
You won't take issue with them.
You focus instead on the neutral, uninvolved centeredness of the mind.
This is the basic foundation for neutrality.
When you can do this, everything becomes neutral.
When the eye sees a form, it's neutral.
When the ear hears a sound, it's neutral — the mind is neutral, the sound is neutral, everything is all neutral — because we've closed five of the six sense doors and then settled ourselves in neutrality right at the mind.
This takes care of everything.
Whatever the eye may see, the ear may hear, the nose may smell, the tongue may taste, or the body may touch, the mind doesn't take issue with anything at all.
It stays centered, neutral, and impartial.
Take just this much and give it a try.
For the next seven days I want you to make a special point of focusing mindfulness right at the mind, for this is the end of the rainy season, the period when the lotus and water lily bloom after the end of the Rains Retreat.
In the Buddha's time he would have the senior monks train the new monks throughout the Rains Retreat and then meet with him when the lotuses bloom.
I've mentioned this before and I want to mention it again as a way of encouraging you to develop a stable foundation for the mind.
If its stability is continuous, then it too will have to bloom — to bloom because it's not burned, disturbed, or provoked by the defilements.
So make a special effort during the next seven days to see how you can manage to observe and investigate the centered, neutral state of mind continuously at all times.
Of course, if you fall asleep, you fall asleep; but even then, when you lie down to sleep, try to observe how you can keep the mind centered and neutral at all times until you doze off.
When you wake up, the movements of the mind will still remain in that centered, neutral state.
Give it a try, so that your mind will be able to grow calm and peaceful, disbanding its defilements, cravings, sufferings — everything.
Then notice to see whether or not it's beginning to bloom.
The sense of refreshment bathing the mind that comes as part of the peace of mind undisturbed by defilement will arise of its own accord without your having to do anything aside from keeping the mind stable and centered.
This is your guarantee: If the mind is really stable in its concentration, the defilements won't be able to burn it or mess with it.
In other words, desire won't be able to provoke it.
When concentration is stable, the fires of passion, aversion, and delusion won't be able to burn it.
Try to see within yourself how the stability of the mind can withstand these things, disbanding the stress, putting out the flames.
But you'll have to be earnest in practicing, in making an effort to keep mindfulness truly continuous.
This isn't something to play at.
You can't let yourself be weak, for if you're weak you won't be able to withstand anything.
You'll simply follow the provocations of defilement and craving.
The practice is a matter of stopping so that the mind can settle down and stand fast.
It's not a matter of getting into mischief, wandering around to look and listen and get involved in issues.
Try to keep the mind stable; in all your activities — eating, defecating, whatever — keep the mind centered within.
If you know the state of the mind when it's centered, immovable, no longer wavering, no longer weak, then the basic level of the mind will be free and empty — empty of the things that would burn it, empty because there's no attachment.
This is what enables you to ferret out the stability of the mind at every moment.
It protects you from all sorts of things.
All attachment to self, “me,” and “them” is totally wiped out, cut away.
The mind is entirely centered.
If you can keep this state stable for the entire seven days, it will enable you to reach insight all on your own.
So I ask each of you to see whether or not you'll be able to make it all the way.
Check to see how you're doing each day.
And make sure you check things carefully.
Don't let yourself be lax, sometimes stable, sometimes not.
Get so that the mind is absolutely solid.
Don't let yourself be weak.
You have to be genuine in what you do if you want to reach the genuine extinguishing of suffering and stress.
If you're not genuine, you'll end up letting yourself weaken in the face of the provocation of wanting this or wanting that, doing this or doing that, whatever, in the same way that you've been enslaved to desire, agitated by desire for who knows how long.
Your everyday life is where you can test yourself — so get back to the battlefield!
Take a firm stance in neutrality.
Then the objects that come into contact with the mind will be neutral; the mind itself will feel centered in neutrality.
There will be nothing to take issue with in terms of good or bad or whatever.
Everything will come to a halt in neutrality — because things in themselves aren't good or bad or self or whatever, simply that the mind has gone and made issues out of them.
So keep looking inward until you see the mind's neutrality and freedom from “self” continuously, and then you'll see how the lotus comes to bloom.
If it hasn't bloomed yet, that's because it's withering and dry in the heat of the defilements, cravings, and attachments smoldering in the mind — things we'll have to learn to ferret out until we can disband them.
If we don't, the lotus will wither away, its petals falling to the ground and simply rotting there.
So make an effort to keep the lotus of the mind stable until it blooms.
Don't wonder about what will happen as it blooms.
Just keep it stable and make sure it isn't burned by the defilements.
Today we are meeting as usual.
From what I've seen of your reports on your special development of mindfulness to read the facts within yourselves, some of you have really benefited in terms of penetrating in to read what's going on inside, and you've come out with correct understanding.
So now I'd like to give you a further piece of advice: In developing mindfulness as a foundation for probing in to know the truth within yourself, you have to apply a level of effort and persistence appropriate to the task.
This is because, as we all know, the mind is cloaked in defilements and mental effluents.
If we don't train it and force it, it'll turn weak and lax.
It won't have any strength.
You have to make your persistence more and more constant so that your probing and investigating will be able to see all the way through to clear insight.
Clear insight doesn't come from thinking and speculating.
It comes from investigating the mind while it's gathered into an adequate level of calm and stability.
You look deeply into every aspect of the mind when it's neutral and calm, free from thought-formations or likes and dislikes for its preoccupations.
You have to work at maintaining this state and at the same time probe deeply into it, because superficial knowledge isn't true knowledge.
As long as you haven't probed deeply into the mind, you don't really know anything.
The mind is simply calm on an external level, and your reading of the aspects of the wanderings of the mind under the influence of defilement, craving, and attachment isn't yet clear.
So you have to try to peer into yourself until you reach a level of awareness that can maintain its balance and let you contemplate your way to sharper understanding.
If you don't contemplate so as to give rise to true knowledge, your mindfulness will stay just on the surface.
The same principle holds with contemplating the body.
You have to probe deeply into the ways in which the body is repulsive and composed of physical elements.
This is what it means to read the body so as to understand it, so that you can explore yourself in all your activities.
This way you prevent your mind from straying off the path and keep it focused on seeing how it can burn away the defilements as they arise — which is very delicate work.
Being uncomplacent, not letting yourself get distracted by outside things, is what will make the practice go smoothly.
It will enable you to examine the germs in the mind in a skillful way so that you can eliminate the subtlest ones: ignorance and delusion.
Normally, we aren't fully aware of even the blatant germs, but now that the blatant ones are inactivated because of the mind's solid focus, we can look into the more profound areas to catch sight of the deceits of craving and defilements in whatever way they move into action.
We watch them, know them, and are in a position to abandon them as soon as they wander off in search of sights, sounds, smells, and delicious flavors.
Whether they're looking for good physical flavors — bodily pleasure — or good mental flavors, we have to know them from all sides, even though they're not easy to know because of all the many desires we feel for physical pleasure.
And on top of that, there are the desires for happiness imbued with pleasurable feelings, perceptions that carry pleasurable feelings, thought-formations that carry pleasurable feelings, and consciousness that carries pleasurable feelings.
All of these are nothing but desires for illusions, for things that deceive us into getting engrossed and distracted.
As a result, it isn't easy for us to understand much of anything at all.
These are subtle matters and they all come under the term, “sensual craving” — the desire, lust, and love that provoke the mind into wandering out in search of the enjoyment it remembers from past sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations.
Even though these things may have happened long ago, our perceptions bring them back to deceive us with ideas of their being good or bad.
Once we latch onto them, they make the mind unsettled and defiled.
So it isn't easy to examine and understand all the various germs within the mind.
The external things we're able to know and let go of are only the minor players.
The important ones have gathered together to take charge in the mind and won't budge no matter how you try to chase them out.
They're stubborn and determined to stay in charge.
If you take them on when your mindfulness and discernment aren't equal to the fight, you'll end up losing your inner calm.
So you have to make sure that you don't push the practice too much, without at the same time letting it grow too slack.
Find the Middle Way that's just right.
While you're practicing in this way, you'll be able to observe what the mind is like when it has mindfulness and discernment in charge, and then you make the effort to maintain that state and keep it constant.
That's when the mind will have the opportunity to stop and be still, stable and centered for long periods of time until it's used to being that way.
Now, there are some areas where we have to force the mind and be strict with it.
If we're weak and lax, there's no way we can succeed, for we've given in to our own wants for so long already.
If we keep giving in to them, it will become even more of a habit.
So you have to use force — the force of your will and the force of your mindfulness and discernment.
Even if you get to the point where you have to put your life on the line, you've got to be willing.
When the time comes for you really to be serious, you've got to hold out until you come out winning.
If you don't win, you don't give up.
Sometimes you have to make a vow as a way of forcing yourself to overcome your stubborn desires for physical pleasure that tempt you and lead you astray.
If you're weak and settle for whatever pleasure comes in the immediate present, then when desire comes in the immediate present you fall right for it.
If you give in to your wants often in this way, it'll become habitual, for defilement is always looking for the chance to tempt you, to incite you.
As when we try to give up an addiction to betel, cigarettes, or meat: It's hard to do because craving is always tempting us.
“Take just a little,” it says.
“Just a taste.
It doesn't matter.” Craving knows how to fool us, the way a fish is fooled into getting caught on a hook by the bait surrounding the hook, screwing up its courage enough to take just a little, and then a little more, and then a little more until it's sure to get snagged.
The demons of defilement have us surrounded on all sides.
Once we fall for their delicious flavors, we're sure to get snagged on the hook.
No matter how much we struggle and squirm, we can't get free.
You have to realize that gaining victory over your enemies — the cravings and defilements in the heart — is no small matter, no casual affair.
You can't let yourself be weak or lax, but you also have to gauge your strength, for you have to figure out how to apply your efforts at abandoning and destroying to weaken the defilements and cravings that have had the power of demons overwhelming the mind for so long.
It's not the case that you have to battle to the brink of death in every area.
With some things — such as giving up addictions — you can mount a full-scale campaign and come out winning without killing yourself in the process.
But with other things, more subtle and deep, you have to be more perceptive so as to figure out how to overcome them over the long haul, digging up their roots so that they gradually weaken to the point where your mindfulness and discernment can rise above them.
If there are any areas where you're still losing out, you have to take stock of your sensitivities to figure out why.
Otherwise, you'll keep losing out, for when the defilements really want something, they trample all over your mindfulness and discernment in their determination to get what they're after: “That's what I want.
I don't care what anyone says.” They really are that stubborn!
So it's no small matter, figuring out how to bring them under control.
It's like running into an enemy or a wild beast rushing in to devour you.
What are you going to do?
When the defilements arise right before your eyes, you have to be wary.
Suppose you're perfectly aware, and all of a sudden they spring up and confront you: What kind of mindfulness and discernment are you going to use to disband them, to realize that, “These are the hordes of Mara, come to burn and eat me.
How am I going to get rid of them?” In other words, how are you going to find a skillful way of contemplating them so as to destroy them right then and there?
We have to do this regardless of whether we're being confronted with physical and mental pain or physical and mental pleasure.
Actually, pleasure is more treacherous than pain because it's hard to fathom and easy to fall for.
As for pain, no one falls for it because it's so uncomfortable.
So how are we going to contemplate so as to let go of both the pleasure and the pain?
This is the problem we're faced with at every moment.
It's not the case that when we practice we accept only the pleasure and stop when we run into pain.
That's not the case at all.
We have to learn how to read both sides, to see that the pain is inconstant and stressful, and that the pleasure is inconstant and stressful, too.
We have to penetrate clear through these things.
Otherwise, we'll be deluded by the deceits of the cravings that want pleasure, whether it's physical pleasure or whatever.
Our every activity — sitting, standing, walking, lying down — is really for the sake of pleasure, isn't it?
This is why there are so many, many ways in which we're deluded with pleasure.
Whatever we do, we do for the sake of pleasure without realizing how deeply we've mired ourselves in suffering and stress.
When we contemplate inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness, we don't get anywhere in our contemplation because we haven't seen through pleasure.
We still think that it's a good thing.
We have to probe into the fact that there's no real ease to physical or mental pleasure.
It's all stress.
When you can see it from this angle, that's when you'll come to understand inconstancy.
Then once the mind isn't focused on wanting pleasure all the time, its stresses and pains will lighten.
It will be able to see them as something common and normal, to see that if you try to change the pains to find ease, there's no ease to be found.
In this way, you won't be overly concerned with trying to change the pains, for you'll see that there's no pleasure or ease to the aggregates, that they give nothing but stress and pain.
As in the Buddha's teachings we chant every day: “Form is stressful, feeling, perception, thought-formations, and consciousness are all stressful.” The problem is that we haven't investigated into the truth of our own form, feelings, perceptions, thought-formations, and consciousness.
Our insight isn't yet penetrating because we haven't looked from the angle of true knowing.
And so we get deluded here and lost there in our search for pleasure, finding nothing but pain and yet mistaking it for pleasure.
This shows that we still haven't opened our ears and eyes; we still don't know the truth.
Once we do know the truth, though, the mind will be more inclined to grow still and calm than to go wandering off.
The reason it goes wandering off is because it's looking for pleasure, but once it realizes there's no real pleasure to be found in that way, it settles down and grows still.
All the cravings that provoke and unsettle the mind come down to nothing but the desire for pleasure.
So we have to contemplate so as to see that the aggregates have no pleasure to offer, that they're stressful by their very nature.
They're not us or ours.
Take them apart and have a good look at them, starting with the body.
Analyze the body down to its elements so that the mind won't keep latching onto it as “me” or “mine.” You have to do this over and over again until you really understand.
It's the same as when we chant the passage for Recollection while Using the Requisites — food, clothing, shelter, and medicine — every day.
We do this so as to gain real understanding.
If we don't do this every day, we forget and get deluded into loving and worrying about the body as “my body,” “my self.” No matter how much we keep latching onto it over and over again, it's not easy for us to realize what we're doing, even though we have the Buddha's teachings available, explaining these things in every way.
Or we may have contemplated to some extent, but we haven't seen things clearly.
We've seen only in a vague and blurry way and then flitted off oblivious without having probed in to see all the way through.
This is because the mind isn't firmly centered.
It isn't still.
It keeps wandering off to find things to think about and get itself all agitated.
This way it can't really get to know anything at all.
All it knows are a few little perceptions.
This is the way it has been for who knows how many years now.
It's as if our vision has been clouded by spots that we haven't yet removed from our eyes.
Those who aren't interested in exploring, who don't make an effort to get to the facts, don't wonder about anything at all.
They're free from doubt, all right, but it's because their doubts have been smothered by delusion.
If we start exploring and contemplating, we'll have to wonder about the things we don't yet know: “What's this?
What does it mean?
How should I deal with it?” These are questions that lead us to explore.
If we don't explore, it's because we don't have any intelligence.
Or we may gain a few little insights, but we let them pass so that we never explore deeply into the basic principles of the practice.
What little we do know doesn't go anywhere, doesn't penetrate into the Noble Truths, because our mindfulness and discernment run out of strength.
Our persistence isn't resilient enough, isn't brave enough.
We don't dare look deeply inside ourselves.
To go by our own estimates of how far is enough in the practice is to lie to ourselves.
It keeps us from gaining release from suffering and stress.
If you happen to come up with a few insights, don't go bragging about them, or else you'll end up deceiving yourself in countless ways.
Those who really know, even when they have attained the various stages of insight, are heedful to keep on exploring.
They don't get stuck on this stage or that.
Even when their insights are correct they don't stop right there and start bragging, for that's the way of a fool.
Intelligent people, even though they see things clearly, always keep an eye out for the enemies lying in wait for them on the deeper, more subtle levels ahead.
They have to keep penetrating further and further in.
They have no sense that this or that level is plenty enough — for how can it be enough?
The defilements are still burning away, so how can you brag?
Even though your knowledge may be true, how can you be complacent when your mind has yet to establish a foundation for itself?
As you investigate with mindfulness and discernment, complacency is the major problem.
You have to be uncomplacent in the practice if you want to keep up with the fact that life is ebbing away, ebbing with every moment.
And how should you live so that you can be said to be uncomplacent?
This is an extremely important question, for if you're not alive to it, then no matter how many days or months you practice meditation or restraint of the senses, it's simply a temporary exercise.
When you're done, you get back to your same old turmoil as before.
And watch out for your mouth.
You'll have trouble not bragging, for the defilements will provoke you into speaking.
They want to speak, they want to brag, they won't let you stay silent.
If you force yourself in the practice without understanding its true aims, you end up deceiving yourself and go around telling people, “I practiced in silence for so many days, so many months.” This is deceiving yourself and others as well.
The truth of the matter is that you're still a slave to stupidity, obeying the many levels of defilement and craving within yourself without realizing the fact.
If someone praises you, you really prick up your ears, wag your tail and, instead of explaining the harm of the defilements and craving you were able to find within yourself, you simply want to brag.
So the practice of the Dhamma isn't something that you can just muddle your way through.
It's something you have to do with your intelligence fully alert — for when you contemplate in a circumspect way, you'll see that there's nothing worth getting engrossed in, that everything — both inside and out — is nothing but an illusion.
It's like being adrift, alone in the middle of the ocean with no island or shore in sight.
Can you afford just to sit back and relax, to make a temporary effort and then brag about it?
Of course not!
As your investigation penetrates inwardly to ever more subtle levels of the mind, you'll have to become more and more calm and reserved, in the same way that people become more and more circumspect as they grow from children to teenagers and into adults.
Your mindfulness and discernment have to keep growing more and more mature in order to understand the right and wrong, the true and false, in whatever arises: That's what will enable you to let go and gain release.
And that's what will make your life in the true practice of the Dhamma go smoothly.
Otherwise, you'll fool yourself into boasting of how many years you practiced meditation and will eventually find yourself worse off than before, with defilement flaring up in a big way.
If this is the way you go, you'll end up tumbling head over heels into fire — for when you raise your head in pride, you run into the flames already burning within yourself.
To practice means to use the fire of mindfulness and discernment as a counter-fire to put out the blaze of the defilements, because the heart and mind are burning with defilement, and when we use the fire of mindfulness and discernment to put out the fire of defilement, the mind can cool down.
Do this by being increasingly honest with yourself, without leaving an opening for defilement and craving to insinuate their way into control.
You have to be alert.
Circumspect.
Wise to them.
Don't fall for them!
If you fall for whatever rationale they come up with, it means that your mindfulness and discernment are still weak.
They lead you away by the nose, burning you with their fire right before your very eyes, and yet you're still able to open your mouth to brag!
So turn around and take stock of everything within yourself.
Take stock of every aspect, because right and wrong, true and false, are all within you.
You can't go finding them outside.
The damaging things people say about you are nothing compared to the damage caused inside you when defilement burns you, when your feeling of “me” and “mine” raises its head.
If you don't honestly come to your senses, there's no way your practice of the Dhamma can gain you release from the great mass of suffering and stress.
You may be able to gain a little knowledge and let go of a few things, but the roots of the problem will still lie buried deep down.
So you have to dig them out.
You can't relax after little bouts of emptiness and equanimity.
That won't accomplish anything.
The defilements and mental effluents lie deep in the personality, so you have to use mindfulness and discernment to penetrate deep down to make a precise and thorough examination.
Only then will you get results.
Otherwise, if you stay only on the surface level, you can practice until your body lies rotting in its coffin but you won't have changed any of your basic habits.
Those who are scrupulous by nature, who know how to contemplate their own flaws, will keep on the alert for any signs of pride within themselves.
They'll try to control and destroy conceit on every side and won't allow it to swell.
The methods we need to use in the practice for examining and destroying the germs within the mind aren't easy to master.
For those who don't contemplate themselves thoroughly, the practice may actually only increase their pride, their bragging, their desire to go teaching others.
But if we turn within and discern the deceits and conceits of self, a profound feeling of disenchantment and dismay arises, causing us to pity ourselves for our own stupidity, for the amount to which we've deluded ourselves all along, and for how much effort we'll still need to put into the practice.
So however great the pain and anguish, however many tears bathe your cheeks, persevere!
The practice isn't simply a matter of looking for mental and physical pleasure.
“Let tears bathe my cheeks, but I'll keep on with my striving at the holy life as long as I live!” That's the way it has to be!
Don't quit at the first small difficulty with the thought, “It's a waste of time.
I'd do better to follow my cravings and defilements.” You can't think like that!
You have to take the exact opposite stance: “When they tempt me to grab this, take a lot of that — I won't!
However fantastic the object may be, I won't take the bait.” Make a firm declaration!
This is the only way to get results.
Otherwise, you'll never work yourself free, for the defilements have all sorts of tricks up their sleeves.
If you get wise to one trick, they simply change to another, and then another.
If we're not observant to see how much we've been deceived by the defilements in all sorts of ways, we won't come to know the truth within ourselves.
Other people may fool us now and then, but the defilements fool us all of the time.
We fall for them and follow them hook, line, and sinker.
Our trust in the Lord Buddha is nothing compared to our trust in them.
We're disciples of the demons of craving, letting them lead us ever deeper into their jungle.
If we don't contemplate to see this for ourselves, we're lost in that jungle charnel ground where the demons keep roasting us to make us squirm with desires and every form of distress.
Even though you have come to stay in a place with few disturbances, these demons still manage to tempt and draw you away.
Just notice how the saliva flows when you come across anything delicious!
So you have to decide to be either a warrior or a loser.
The practice requires that you do battle with defilements and cravings.
Always be on your guard, whatever the approach they take to seduce and deceive you.
Other people can't come in to lead you away, but these demons of your own defilements can, because you're willing to trust them, to be their slave.
You have to contemplate yourself carefully so that you're no longer enslaved to them and can reach total freedom within yourself.
Make an effort to develop your mindfulness and discernment so as to gain clear insight and then let go until suffering and stress disband in every way!
Today's our day to discuss the practice.
It's very beneficial that we have practiced the Dhamma by contemplating ourselves step by step and have — to some extent — come to know the truth.
This is because each person has to find the truth within: the truths of stress, its cause, and the path leading to its disbanding.
If we don't know these things, we fall into the same sufferings as the rest of the world.
We may have come to live in a Dhamma center, yet if we don't know these truths we don't benefit from staying here.
The only way we differ from living at home is that we're observing the precepts.
If we don't want to be deluded in our practice, these truths are things we have to know.
Otherwise, we get deluded into looking for our fun in the stresses and sufferings offered by the world.
Our practice is to contemplate until we understand stress and its cause, in other words, the defilements that have power and authority in the heart and mind.
It's only because we have this practice that we can disband these defilements, that we can disband stress every day and at all times.
This is something really marvelous.
Those who don't practice don't have a clue, even though they live enveloped by defilements and stress.
They simply get led around by the nose into more and more suffering, and yet none of them realize what's going on.
If we don't make contact with the Dhamma, if we don't practice, we go through birth and death simply to create kamma with one another and to keep whirling around in suffering and stress.
We have to contemplate until we really see stress: That's when we'll become uncomplacent and try to disband it or to gain release from it.
The practice is thus a matter of struggling to gain victory over stress and suffering with better and better results each time.
Whatever mistakes we make in whatever way, we have to try not to make them again.
And we have to contemplate the harm and suffering caused by the more subtle defilements, cravings, and attachments within us.
This is why we have to probe into the deeper, more profound parts of the heart — for if we stay only on the superficial levels of emptiness in the mind, we won't gain any profound knowledge at all.
So we train the mind to be mindful and firmly centered, and to fix its focus on looking within, knowing within.
Don't let it get distracted outside.
When it focuses within, it will come to know the truth: the truth of stress and of the causes of stress — defilement, craving, and attachment — as they arise.
It will see what they're like and how to probe inward to disband them
When all is said and done, the practice comes down to one issue, because it focuses exclusively on one thing: stress together with its cause.
This is the central issue in human life — even animals are in the same predicament — but our ignorance deludes us into latching onto all kinds of things.
This is because of our misunderstandings or wrong views.
If we gain Right View, we see things correctly.
Whenever we see stress, we see its truth.
When we see the cause of stress, we see its truth.
We both know and see because we've focused on it.
If you don't focus on stress, you won't know it; but as soon as you focus on it, you will.
It's because the mind hasn't focused here that it wanders out oblivious, chasing after its preoccupations.
When we try to focus it down, it struggles and resists because it's used to wandering.
But if we keep focusing it again and again, more and more frequently until we get a sense of how to bring it under control, then the task ultimately becomes easier because the mind no longer struggles to chase after its preoccupations as it did before.
No matter how much it resists when we start training it, eventually we're sure to bring it under our control, getting it to settle down and be still.
If it doesn't settle down, you have to contemplate it.
You have to show it that you mean business.
This is because defilement and craving are very strong.
You can't be weak when dealing with them.
You have to be brave, to have a fight-to-the-death attitude, and to keep sustaining your efforts.
If you're concerned only with finding comfort and pleasure, the day will never come when you'll gain release.
You'll have to continue staying under their power.
Their power envelops everything in our character, making it very difficult for us to find out the truth about ourselves.
What we do know is just a smattering, and so we play truant, abandoning the task, and end up seeing that the practice of the Dhamma isn't really important.
Thus we don't bother to be strict with ourselves, and instead involve ourselves in all kinds of things, for that's the path the defilements keep pointing out to us.
We grope along weakly, making it harder and harder to see stress clearly because we keep giving in to the defilements and taking their bait.
When they complain about the slightest discomfort, we quickly pander to them and take the bait again.
It's because we're so addicted to the bait that we don't appreciate either the power of craving — as it wanders out after sights, sounds, smells, tastes, etc.
— or the harm it causes in making us scattered and restless, unable to stay still and contemplate ourselves.
It's always finding things for us to do, to think about, making ourselves suffer, and yet we remain blind to the fact.
Now that we've come to practice the Dhamma, we begin to have a sense of what's going on.
For this reason, whoever practices without being complacent will find that defilement and stress will have to grow lighter and lighter, step by step.
The areas where we used to be defeated, we now come out victorious.
Where we used to be burned by the defilements, we now have the mindfulness and discernment to burn them instead.
Only when we stop groping around and really come to our senses will we realize the benefits of the Dhamma, the importance of the practice.
Then there is no way that we can abandon the practice, for something inside us keeps forcing us to stay with it.
We've seen that if we don't practice to disband defilement and stress, the stress of the defilements will keep piling up.
This is why we have to stay with the practice to our last breath.
You have to be firm in not letting yourself be weak and easily led astray.
Those who are mindful and discerning will naturally act it this way; those who aren't will keep on following their defilements, ending up back where they were when they hadn't yet started practicing to gain release from stress.
They may keep on practicing, but it's hard to tell what they're practicing for — mostly for more stress.
This shows that they're still groping around — and when they grope around in this way, they start criticizing the practice as useless and bad.
When a person submits readily to defilement and craving, there's no way she can practice, for if you're going to practice, there are a lot of things you have to struggle with and endure.
It's like paddling a boat against the stream — you have to use strength if you want to make any headway.
It's not easy to go against the stream of the defilements, because they are always ready to pull you down to a lower level.
If you aren't mindful and discerning, if you don't use the Lord Buddha's Dhamma to examine yourself, your strength will fail you, for if you have only a little mindfulness and discernment in the face of a lot of defilements, they'll make you vacillate.
And if you're living with sweet-talking sycophants, you'll go even further off the path, involved with all sorts of things and oblivious to the practice.
To practice the Dhamma, then, is to go against the flow, to go upstream against suffering and stress, because suffering and stress are the main problems.
If you don't really contemplate stress, your practice will go nowhere.
Stress is where you start, and then you try to trace out its root cause.
You have to use your discernment to track down exactly where stress originates, for stress is a result.
Once you see the result, you have to track down the cause.
Those who are mindful and discerning are never complacent.
Whenever stress arises they're sure to search out its causes so that they can eliminate them.
This sort of investigation can proceed on many levels, from the coarse to the refined, and requires that you seek advice so that you don't stumble.
Otherwise, you may think you can figure it all out in your head — which won't work at all!
The basic Dhamma principles that the Lord Buddha proclaimed for us to use in our contemplation are many, but there's no need to learn them all.
Just focusing on some of the more important ones, such as the five aggregates or name and form, will be very useful.
But you need to keep making a thorough, all-round examination, not just an occasional probe, so that a feeling of dispassion and disengagement arises and loosens the grip of desire.
Use mindfulness to keep constant and close supervision over the senses, and that mindfulness will come to be more present than your tendency to drift off elsewhere.
Regardless of what you're doing, saying, or thinking, be on the lookout for whatever will make you slip, for if you're tenacious in sustaining mindfulness, that's how all your stresses and sufferings can be disbanded.
So keep at this.
If you fall down times, get back up times and resume your stance.
The reason mindfulness and discernment are slow to develop is because you're not really sensitive to yourself.
The greater your sensitivity, the stronger your mindfulness and discernment will become.
As the Lord Buddha said, “Bhavita bahulikata” — which means, “Develop and maximize” — i.e., make the most of your mindfulness.
The way your practice has developed through contemplating and supervising the mind throughout your daily life has already shown its rewards to some extent, so keep stepping up your efforts.
Don't let yourself grow weak or lax.
You've finally got this opportunity: Can you afford to be complacent?
Your life is steadily ebbing away, so you have to compensate by building up more and more mindfulness and discernment until you become mature in the Dhamma.
Otherwise, your defilements will remain many and your discernment crude.
The older you grow, the more you have to watch out — for we know what happens to old people everywhere.
So seize the moment to develop the faculties of conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, and discernment in a balanced way.
Keep contemplating and probing, and you'll protect yourself from wandering out after the world.
No matter who tempts you to go with them, you can be sure within yourself that you won't go following them because you no longer have to go believing anyone else or hoping for the baits of the world — because the baits of the world are poison.
The Dhamma has to be the refuge and light of your life.
Once you have this degree of conviction in yourself, you can't help but stride forward without slipping back; but if you waver and wander, unsure of whether or not to keep practicing the Dhamma, watch out: You're sure to get pulled over the cliff and into the pit of fire.
If you aren't free within yourself, you get pulled at from all sides because the world is full of things that keep pulling at you.
But those who have the intelligence not to be gullible will see the stress and harm of those things distinctly for themselves.
For this reason they're not headed for anything low; they won't have to keep suffering in the world.
They feel dispassion.
They lose their taste for all the various baits and lures the world has to offer.
The practice of the Dhamma is what allows us to shake off whatever attractive things used to delude us into holding on.
Realize that it won't be long before we die — we won't be here much longer!
— so even if anyone offers us incredible wealth, why should we want it?
Who could really own it?
Who could really control it?
If you can read yourself in this matter, you come to a feeling of dispassion.
Disenchantment.
You lose your taste for all the lures of the world.
You no longer hold them in esteem.
If you make use of them, it's for the sake of the benefits they give in terms of the Dhamma, but your disenchantment stays continuous.
Even the name and form you've been regarding as “me” and “mine” have been wearing down and falling apart continually.
As for the defilements, they're still lying in wait to burn you.
So how can you afford to be oblivious?
First there's the suffering and stress of the five aggregates, and on top of that there's the suffering and stress caused by defilement, craving, and attachment, stabbing you, slapping you, beating you.
The more you practice and contemplate, the more you become sensitive to this on deeper and deeper levels.
Your interest in blatant things outside — good and bad people, good and bad things — gets swept away.
You don't have to concern yourself with them, for you're concerned solely with penetrating yourself within, destroying your pride and conceit.
Outside affairs aren't important.
What's important is how clearly you can see the truth inside until the brightness appears.
The brightness that comes from seeing the truth isn't at all like the light we see outside.
Once you really know it, you see that it's indescribable, for it's something entirely personal.
It cleans everything out of the heart and mind in line with the strength of our mindfulness and discernment.
It's what sweeps and cleans and clears and lets go and disbands things inside.
But if we don't have mindfulness and discernment as our means of knowing, contemplating, and letting go, then everything inside is dark on all sides.
And not only dark, but also full of fire whose poisonous fuel keeps burning away.
What could be more terrifying than the fuel burning inside us?
Even though it's invisible, it flares up every time there's sensory contact.
The bombs they drop on people to wipe them out aren't really all that dangerous, for you can die only once per lifetime.
But the three bombs of passion, aversion, and delusion keep ripping the heart apart countless times.
Normally we don't realize how serious the damage is, but when we come to practice the Dhamma we can take stock of the situation, seeing what it's like when sensory contact comes, at what moments the burning heat of defilement and craving arises, and why they're all so very quick.
When you contemplate how to disband suffering and defilement, you need the proper tools and have to make the effort without being complacent.
The fact that we've come to practice out here without any involvements or worldly responsibilities helps speed up the practice.
It's extremely beneficial in helping us to examine our inner diseases in detail and to disband suffering and stress continually in line with our mindfulness and discernment.
Our burdens grow lighter and we come to realize how much our practice of the Dhamma is progressing in the direction of the cessation of suffering.
Those who don't have the time to come and rest here or to really stop, get carried away with all kinds of distractions.
They may say, “I can practice anywhere,” but it's just words.
The fact of the matter is that their practice is to follow the defilements until their heads are spinning, and yet they can still boast that they can practice anywhere!
Their mouths aren't in line with their minds, and their minds — burned and beaten by defilement, craving, and attachment — don't realize their situation.
They're like worms that live in filth and are happy to stay and die right there in the filth.
People with any mindfulness and discernment feel disgust at the filth of the defilements in the mind.
The more they practice, the more sensitive they become, the more their revulsion grows.
Before, when our mindfulness and discernment were still crude, we didn't feel this at all.
We were happy to play around in the filth within ourselves.
But now that we've come to practice, to contemplate from the blatant to the more subtle levels, we sense more and more how disgusting the filth really is.
There's nothing to it that's worth falling for at all, because it's all inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
So what's there to want out of life?
Those who are ignorant say that we're born to gain wealth and be millionaires, but that kind of life is like falling into hell!
If you understand the practice of the Dhamma in the Buddha's footsteps, you realize that nothing is worth having, nothing is worth getting involved with, everything has to be let go.
Those who still latch onto the body, feeling, perceptions, thought-formations, and consciousness as self need to contemplate until they see that the body is stressful, feelings are stressful, perceptions are stressful, thought-formations are stressful, consciousness is stressful — in short, name is stressful and so is form, or in even plainer terms, the body is stressful and so is the mind.
You have to focus on stress.
Once you see it thoroughly, from the blatant to the subtle levels, you'll be able to rise above pleasure and pain because you've let them go.
But if you have yet to fully understand stress, you'll still yearn for pleasure — and the more you yearn, the more you suffer.
This holds too for the pleasure that comes when the mind is tranquil.
If you let yourself get stuck on it, you're like a person addicted to a drug: Once there's the desire, you take the drug and think yourself happy.
But as for how much suffering the repeated desire causes, you don't have the intelligence to see it.
All you see is that if you take the drug whenever you want, you're okay.
When people can't shake off their addictions, this is why.
They get stuck on the sense of pleasure that comes when they take the drug.
They're ingesting sensuality and they keep on wanting more, for only when they ingest more will their hunger subside.
But soon it comes back again, so they'll want still more.
They keep on ingesting sensuality, stirring up the mind, but don't see that there's any harm or suffering involved.
Instead, they say they're happy When the longing gets really intense, it feels really good to satisfy it.
That's what they say.
People who have heavy defilements and crude discernment don't see that desire and longing are suffering, and so they don't know how to do away with them.
As soon as they take what they want, the desire goes away.
Then it comes back again, so they take some more.
It comes back again and they take still more — over and over like this, so blind that they don't realize anything at all.
People of intelligence, though, contemplate: “Why is there desire and why do I have to satisfy it?
And when it comes back, why do I have to keep satisfying it over and over again?” Once they realize that the desire in and of itself is what they have to attack, that by disbanding this one thing they won't feel any disturbance and will never have to suffer from desire again, that's when they really can gain release from suffering and stress.
But for the most part we don't see things from this angle because we still take our pleasure in consuming things.
This is why it's hard for us to practice to abandon desire.
All we know is how to feed on the bait, so we don't dare try giving it up — as when people who are addicted to meat-eating are afraid to become vegetarians.
Why?
Because they're still attached to flavor, still slaves to desire.
If you can't let go of even these blatant things, how can you ever hope to abandon the damp and fermenting desires within you that are so much harder to detect?
You still take the most blatant baits.
When desire whispers and pleads with you, there you go — pandering to it as quickly as possible.
You don't notice how much this tires you out, don't realize that this is the source of the most vicious sufferings that deceive all living beings into falling under its power.
Even though the Buddha's teachings reveal the easiest way to use our discernment to contemplate cause and effect in this area, we don't make the effort to contemplate and instead keep swallowing the bait.
We get our pleasure and that's all we want, going with the flow of defilement and craving.
Our practice here is to go against the flow of every sort of desire and wandering of the mind.
It means self-restraint and training in many, many areas: as, for instance, when sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations arise and deceive us into liking something and then, a moment later, tiring of it and wanting something else.
We get so thoroughly deceived that we end up running frantically all over the place.
The virulent diseases in the mind are more than many.
If you don't know how to deal with them, you'll remain under Mara's power.
Those who have truly seen stress and suffering will be willing to put their lives on the line in their effort to work free, in the same way the Buddha was willing to put his life on the line in order to gain freedom from suffering and release from the world.
He wasn't out after personal comfort at all.
Each Buddha-to-be has had to undergo suffering in the world for his own sake and that of others.
Each has had to relinquish all of his vast wealth instead of using it for his comfort.
So the practice is one of struggle and endurance.
Whoever struggles and endures will gain victory — and no other victory can match it.
Gaining control over the defilements is the ultimate victory.
Whatever you contemplate, you can let go: That's the ultimate victory.
So please keep at the effort.
You can't let yourself relax after each little victory.
The more you keep being victorious, the stronger, more daring, and more resilient your mindfulness and discernment will become in every area, examining everything regardless of whether it comes in by way of the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body, or mind.
The more you examine yourself, the sharper your mindfulness and discernment will become, understanding how to disband things and let them go.
As soon as there's attachment, you'll see the suffering and stress — just as when you touch fire, feel the heat, and immediately let go.
This is why the practice of the Dhamma is of supreme worth.
It's not just a game you play around with — for the defilements have a great deal of power that's hard to overcome.
But if you make the effort to overcome them, they'll weaken as mindfulness and discernment grow stronger.
This is when you can say that you're making progress in the Dhamma: when you can disband your own suffering and stress.
So try to go all the way while you still have the breath to breathe.
The Buddha said, “Make an effort to attain the as-yet-unattained, reach the as-yet-unreached, realize the as-yet-unrealized.” He didn't want us to be weak and vacillating, always making excuses for ourselves, because now that we've ordained we've already made an important sacrifice.
In the Buddha's time, no matter where the monks and nuns came from — from royal, wealthy, or ordinary backgrounds — once they had left their homes they cut their family ties and entered the Lord Buddha's lineage without ever returning.
To return to the home life, he said, was to become a person of no worth.
His only concern was to keep pulling people out, pulling them out of suffering and stress.
If we want to escape, we have to follow his example, cutting away worry and concern for our family and relatives by entering his lineage.
To live and practice under his discipline is truly the supreme refuge, the supreme way.
Those who follow the principles of the Dhamma-Vinaya — even though they may have managed only an occasional taste of its peace without yet reaching the paths and their fruitions — pledge their lives to the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha.
They realize that nothing else they can reach will lead to freedom from suffering, but if they reach this one refuge, they'll gain total release.
Those whose mindfulness and discernment are deep, far-seeing, and meticulous will cross over to the further shore.
They've lived long enough on this shore and have had all the suffering they can bear.
They've circled around in birth and death countless times.
So now they realize that they have to go to the further shore and so they make a relentless effort to let go of their sense of self.
There's nothing distant about the further shore, but to get there you first have to give up your sense of self in the five aggregates by investigating to see them all as stress, to see that none of them are “me” or “mine.” Focus on this one theme: not clinging.
The Lord Buddha once spoke of the past as below, the future as above, and the present as in the middle.
He also said that unskillful qualities are below, skillful qualities above, and neutral ones in the middle.
To each of them, he said, “Don't cling to it.” Even nibbana, the further shore, shouldn't be clung to.
See how far we're going to be released through not-clinging!
Any of you who can't comprehend that even nibbana isn't to be clung to should consider the standard teaching that tells us not to cling, that we have to let go: “All things are unworthy of attachment.” This is the ultimate summary of all that the Buddha taught.
All phenomena, whether compounded or uncompounded, fall under the phrase, “Sabbe dhamma anatta — All things are not-self.” They're all unworthy of attachment.
This summarizes everything, including our investigation to see the truth of the world and of the Dhamma, to see things clearly with our mindfulness and discernment, penetrating through the compounded to the uncompounded, or through the worldly to the transcendent, all of which has to be done by looking within, not without.
And if we want to see the real essence of the Dhamma, we have to look deeply, profoundly.
Then it's simply a matter of letting go all along the way.
We see all the way in and let go of everything.
The theme of not clinging covers everything from beginning to end.
If our practice is to go correctly, it's because we look with mindfulness and discernment to penetrate everything, not getting stuck on any form, feeling, perception, thought-formation, or consciousness at all.
The Buddha taught about how ignorance — not knowing form, delusion with form — leads to craving, the mental act that arises at the mind and agitates it, leading to the kamma by which we try to get what we crave.
When you understand this, you can practice correctly, for you know that you have to disband the craving.
The reason we contemplate the body and mind over and over again is so that we won't feel desire for anything outside, won't get engrossed in anything outside.
The more you contemplate, the more things outside seem pitiful and not worth getting engrossed in at all.
The reason you were engrossed and excited was because you didn't know.
And so you raved about people and things and made a lot of fuss, talking about worldly matters: “This is good, that's bad, she's good, he's bad.” The mind got all scattered in worldly affairs — and so how could you examine the diseases within your own mind?
The Buddha answered Mogharaja's question — “In what way does one view the world so that the king of death does not see one?” — by telling him to see the world as empty, as devoid of self.
We have to strip away conventions, such as “person” and “being,” and all designations such as elements, aggregates, and sense media.
Once we know how to strip away conventions and designations, there's nothing we need to hold onto.
What's left is the Deathless.
The transcendent.
Nibbana.
There are many names for it, but they're all one and the same thing.
When you strip away all worldly things, what's left is the transcendent.
When you strip away all compounded things, what's left is the uncompounded, the true Dhamma.
So consider for yourself whether or not this is worth attaining.
If we stay in the world, we have to go through repeated births and deaths in the three levels of existence: sensuality, form, and formlessness.
But on that further shore there's no birth, no death.
It's beyond the reach of the King of Mortality.
But because we don't know the further shore, we want to keep on being reborn on this shore with its innumerable repeated sufferings.
Once you comprehend suffering and stress, though, there's nowhere else you want to turn: You head straight for the further shore, the shore with no birth or death, the shore where defilement and craving disband once and for all.
Your practice thus goes straight to the cessation of suffering and defilement, to clear penetration of the Common Characteristics of inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness in the aggregates.
People with mindfulness and discernment focus their contemplation in the direction of absolute disbanding, for if their disbanding isn't absolute, they'll have to be reborn again in suffering and stress.
So keep disbanding attachments, keep letting go, contemplating inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness and relinquishing them.
This is the right path for sure.
Isn't this something worth knowing and training for?
It's not all that mysterious or far away, you know.
It's something that anyone — man or woman — can realize, something we can all train in.
We can develop virtue, can make the mind quiet, and can use our mindfulness and discernment to contemplate.
So isn't this really worth practicing?
Stupid people like to say no.
They say they can't do it: They can't observe the precepts, can't make the mind quiet.
The best thing in life — the practice for release from suffering and stress — and yet they reject it.
Instead, they rush around in a turmoil, competing with one another, bragging to one another, and then end up rotting in their coffins.
Exactly what is appealing about all that?
We've gone astray for far too long already, our lives almost gone after how many decades.
Now we've come here to turn ourselves around.
No matter how old you are, the air you breathe isn't just for your convenience and comfort, but for you to learn about suffering and stress.
That way you'll be able to disband it.
Don't imagine that your family and relatives are essential to you.
You are alone.
You came alone and you'll go alone.
This holds true for each of us.
Only when there's no self to go: That's when you penetrate to the Dhamma.
If there is still a self to be born, then you're stuck in the cycle of suffering and stress.
So isn't it worthwhile to strive for release?
After all, it's something each of us has to find for him or herself.
Those who trust in the Lord Buddha will all have to follow this way.
To trust the defilements is to throw yourself down in the mire — and there who will you be able to brag to, aside from your own sufferings?
The knowledge that leads to dispassion and disenchantment is what counts as true knowledge.
But if your knowledge leads you to hold on, then you're a disciple of Mara.
You still find things very delicious.
You may say that you're disenchanted, but the mind isn't disenchanted at all.
It still wants to take this, to get that, to stay right here.
Whoever can keep reading the truth within her own mind, deeper and deeper, will be able to go all the way through, wiping out stupidity and delusion each step along the way.
Where you used to be deluded, you've now begun to come to your senses.
Where you used to brag, you now realize how very stupid you were — and that you'll have to keep on correcting your stupidity.
Reading yourself, contemplating yourself, you see new angles, you gain more precise self-knowledge each step along the way.
It's not a question of being expert about things outside.
You see how what's inside is really inconstant, really stressful, really not-self.
The way you used to fall for things and latch onto them was because of your blindness, because you didn't understand.
So who can you blame?
Your own stupidity, that's who — because it wanted to brag about how much it knew.
Now you know that you've still got a lot of stupidity left and that you'll have to get rid of it before you die.
Every day that you still have breath left to breathe, you'll use it to wipe out your stupidity rather than to get this or be that or to dance around.
The ones who dance around are possessed by spirits: the demons of defilement making them crazy and deluded, wanting to get this and be that and dance all over the place.
But if you focus your attention in on yourself, then your pride, your conceit, your desires to stand out will shrink out of sight, never daring to show their faces for the rest of your life, for you realize that the more you brag, the more you suffer.
So the essence of the practice is to turn around and focus inside.
The more you can wash away these things, the more empty and free the mind will be: This is its own reward.
If you connive with your conceits, you'll destroy whatever virtue you have, but if you can drive these demons away, virtuous influences will come and stay with you.
If the demons are still there, the virtuous ones won't be able to stay.
They can't get along at all.
If you let yourself get entangled in turmoil, it's an affair of the demons.
If you're empty and free, it's an affair of cleanliness and peace — an affair of the virtuous influences.
So go and check to see how many of these demons you've been able to sweep away.
Are they thinning out?
When they make an appearance, point them right in the face and call them what they are: demons and devils, come to eat your heart and drink your blood.
You've let them eat you before, but now you've finally come to your senses and can drive them away.
That will put an end to your troubles, or at least help your sufferings grow lighter.
Your sense of self will start to shrivel away.
Before, it was big, fat, and powerful, but now its power is gone.
Your pride and conceit have grown thin and weak.
It's as when a person has been bitten by a rabid dog: They give him a serum made from rabid dogs to drive out the disease.
The same holds here: If we can recognize these things, they disband.
The mind is then empty and at peace, for this one thing — the theme of not clinging — can disband suffering and stress with every moment.
Today we have gathered for our regular meeting.
The way we've been contemplating to the point of giving rise to knowledge through genuine mindfulness and discernment makes us realize how this is a process of disbanding suffering and defilement.
Whenever mindfulness lapses and we latch on to anything, our practice of reading ourselves step by step will enable us to realize the situation easily.
This helps us keep the mind under control and does a world of good.
Still, it's not enough, for the affairs of suffering and defilement are paramount issues buried deep in the character.
We thus we have to contemplate and examine things within ourselves.
Looking outside is something we're already used to: Whenever we know things outside, the mind is in a turmoil instead of being empty and at peace.
This is something we can all be aware of.
And this is why we have to maintain the mind in its state of neutrality or mindful centeredness.
We then notice from our experience in the practice: What state have we been able to maintain the mind in?
Is our mindfulness continuous throughout all our activities?
These are things we all have to notice, using our own powers of observation.
When the mind deviates from its foundation because of mental fabrications, thinking up all sorts of turmoil for itself as it's used to doing, what can we do to make it settle down and grow still?
If it doesn't grow still, it gets involved in nothing but stress: wandering around thinking, imagining, taking on all sorts of things.
That's stress.
You have to keep reading these things at all times, seeing clearly the ways in which they're inconstant, changing, and stressful.
Now, if you understand the nature of arising and passing away by turning inward to watch the arising and passing away within yourself, you realize that it's neither good nor bad nor anything of the sort.
It's simply a natural process of arising, persisting, and passing away.
Try to see deeply into this, and you'll be sweeping the mind clean, just as when you constantly sweep out your house: If anything then comes to make it dirty, you'll be able to detect it.
So with every moment, we have to sweep out whatever arises, persists, and then passes away.
Let it all pass away, without latching on or clinging to anything.
Try to make the mind aware of this state of unattachment within itself: If it doesn't latch on to anything, doesn't cling to anything, there's no commotion in it.
It's empty and at peace.
This state of awareness is so worth knowing, for it doesn't require that you know a lot of things at all.
You simply have to contemplate so as to see the inconstancy of form, feelings, perceptions, thought-formations, and consciousness.
Or you can contemplate whatever preoccupies the mind as it continually changes — arising and passing away — with every moment.
This is something you have to contemplate until you really know it.
Otherwise, you'll fall for your preoccupations in line with the way you label sensory contacts.
If you don't fall for sensory contacts arising in the present, you fall for your memories or thought-formations.
This is why you have to train the mind to stay firmly centered in neutrality without latching onto anything at all.
If you can maintain this one stance continuously, you'll be sweeping everything out of the mind, disbanding its suffering and stress in the immediate present with each and every moment.
Everything arises and then passes away, arises and then passes away — everything.
Don't grasp hold of anything, thinking that it's good or bad or taking it as your self.
Stop all your discursive thinking and mental fabrications.
When you can maintain this state of awareness, the mind will calm down on its own, will naturally become empty and free.
If any thoughts arise, see that they just come and go, so don't latch onto them.
When you can read the aspects of the mind that arise and pass away, there's not much else to do: Just keep watching and letting go within yourself, and there will be no remaining long, drawn-out trains of thought about past or future.
They all stop right at the arising and passing away.
When you really see the present with its arisings and passings away, there are no great issues.
Whatever you think about will all pass away, but if you can't notice its passing away, you'll grasp at whatever comes up, and then everything will become a turmoil of ceaseless imaginings.
So you have to cut off these connected thought-formations that keep flowing like a stream of water.
Establish your mindfulness and, once it's established, simply fix your whole attention on the mind.
Then you'll be able to still the flow of thought-formations that had you distracted.
You can do this at any time, and the mind will always grow still to become empty, unentangled, unattached.
Then keep watch over the normalcy of the mind again and again whenever it gets engrossed and starts spinning out long, drawn out thought-formations.
As soon as you're aware, let them stop.
As soon as you're aware, let them stop, and things will disband right there.
Whatever the issue, disband it immediately.
Practice like this until you become skilled at it, and the mind won't get involved in distractions.
It's like driving a car: When you want to stop, just slam on the brakes and you stop immediately.
The same principle works with the mind.
You'll notice that, no matter when, as soon as there's mindfulness, it stops and grows still.
In other words, when mindfulness is firmly centered, then no matter what happens, as soon as you're mindfully aware of it, the mind stops, disengages, and is free.
This is a really simple method: stopping as soon as you're mindful.
Any other approach is just too slow to cope.
This method of examining yourself, knowing yourself, is very worth knowing because anyone can apply it at any time.
Even right here while I'm speaking and you're listening, just focus your attention right at the mind as it's normal in the present.
This is an excellent way of knowing your own mind.
Before we knew anything about all this, we let the mind go chasing after any thoughts that occurred to it, taking up a new thought as soon as it was finished with an old one, spinning its webs to trap us in all kinds of complications.
Whatever meditation techniques we tried weren't really able to stop our distraction.
So don't underestimate this method as being too simple.
Train yourself to be on top of any objects that make contact or any opinions that intrude on your awareness.
When pride and opinions come pouring out, cry, “Stop!
Let me finish first!” This method of calling a halt can really still the defilements immediately, even when they're like two people interrupting each other to speak, the conceit or sense of “self” on one side immediately raising objections before the other side has even finished.
Or you might say it's like suddenly running into a dangerous beast — a tiger or poisonous snake — with no means of escape.
All you can do is simply stop, totally still, and spread thoughts of loving-kindness.
The same holds true here: You simply stop, and that cuts the strength of the defilement or any sense of self that's made a sudden appearance.
We have to stop the defilements in their tracks, for if we don't, they'll grow strong and keep intensifying.
So we have to stop them right from the first.
Resist them right from the first.
This way your mindfulness will get used to dealing with them.
As soon as you say, “Stop!”, things stop immediately.
The defilements will grow obedient and won't dare push you around in any way.
If you're going to sit for an hour, make sure that you're mindful right at the mind the whole time.
Don't just aim at the pleasure of tranquillity.
Sit and watch the sensations within the mind to see how it's centered.
Don't concern yourself with any cravings or feelings that arise.
Even if pain arises, in whatever way, don't pay it any attention.
Keep being mindful of the centered normalcy of the mind at all times.
The mind won't stray off to any pleasures or pains, but will let go of them all, seeing the pains as an affair of the aggregates, because the aggregates are inconstant.
Feelings are inconstant.
The body's inconstant.
That's the way they have to be.
When a pleasant feeling arises, the craving that wants pleasure is contented with it and wants to stay with that pleasure as long as possible.
But when there's pain, it acts in an entirely opposite way, because pain hurts.
When pains arise as we sit for long periods of time, the mind gets agitated because craving pushes for a change.
It wants us to adjust things in this way or that.
We have to train ourselves to disband the craving instead.
If pains grow strong in the body, we have to practice staying at equanimity by realizing that they're the pains of the aggregates — and not our pain — until the mind is no longer agitated and can return to a normal state of equanimity.
Even if the equanimity isn't complete, don't worry about it.
Simply make sure that the mind doesn't struggle to change the situation.
Keep disbanding the struggling, the craving.
If the pain is so unbearable that you have to change positions, don't make the change while the mind is really worked up.
Keep sitting still, watch how far the pain goes, and change positions only when the right moment comes.
Then as you stretch out your leg, make sure that the mind is still centered, still at equanimity.
Stay that way for about five minutes, and the fierce pain will go away.
But watch out: When a pleasant feeling replaces the pain, the mind will like it.
So you have to use mindfulness to keep the mind neutral and at equanimity.
Practice this in all your activities, because the mind tends to get engrossed with pleasant feelings.
It can even get engrossed with neutral feelings.
So you have to keep your mindfulness firmly established, knowing feelings for what they really are: inconstant and stressful, with no real pleasure to them at all.
Contemplate pleasant feelings to see them as nothing but stress.
You have to keep doing this at all times.
Don't get infatuated with pleasant feelings, for if you do, you fall into more suffering and stress, because craving wants nothing but pleasure even though the aggregates have no pleasure to offer.
The physical and mental aggregates are all stressful.
If the mind can rise above pleasure, above pain, above feeling, right there is where it gains release.
Please understand this: It's release from feeling.
If the mind hasn't yet gained release from feeling — if it still wants pleasure, is still attached to pleasure and pain — then try to notice the state of mind at the moments when it's neutral toward feeling.
That will enable it to gain release from suffering and stress.
So we have to practice a lot with feelings of physical pain and, at the same time, to make an effort to comprehend pleasant feelings as well, for the pleasant feelings connected with the subtle defilements of passion and craving are things we don't really understand.
We think that they're true pleasure, which makes us want them.
This wanting is craving — and the Buddha tells us to abandon craving and passion for name and form.
“Passion” here means wanting to get nothing but pleasure and then becoming entangled in liking or disliking what results.
It means that we're entangled in the delicious flavors of feelings, regardless of whether they're physical feelings or mental ones.
We should come to realize that when a feeling of physical pain gets very strong, we can handle it by using mindfulness to keep the mind from struggling.
Then, even if there's a great deal of physical pain, we can let go.
Even though the body may be agitated, the mind isn't agitated along with it.
But to do this, you first have to practice separating feelings from the mind while you're still strong and healthy.
As for the feelings that come with desire, if we accumulate them they lead to even greater suffering.
So don't think of them as being easeful or comfortable, because that's delusion.
You have to keep track of how feelings — no matter what the sort — are all inconstant, stressful and not-self.
If you can let go of feeling, you'll become disenchanted with form, feelings, perceptions, thought-formations, and consciousness that carry feelings of pleasure.
But if you don't contemplate these things, you'll stay infatuated with them.
So try noticing when the mind is in this infatuated state.
Is it empty and at peace?
If it's attached, you'll see that it's dirty and defiled because it's deluded into clinging.
As soon as there's pain, it grows all agitated.
If the mind is addicted to the three kinds of feeling — pleasant, painful, and neither pleasant nor painful — it has to endure suffering and stress.
We have to see the inconstancy, stressfulness, and not-selfness of the body and mind so that we won't cling.
We won't cling whether we look outside or in.
We'll be empty — empty because of our lack of attachment.
We'll know that the mind isn't suffering from stress.
The more deeply we look inside, the more we'll see that the mind is truly empty of attachment.
This is how we gain release from suffering and stress.
It's the simplest way to gain release, but if we don't really understand, it's the hardest.
Thus you absolutely have to keep working at letting go.
The moment the mind latches onto anything, make it let go.
And then notice to see that when you tell the mind to let go, it does let go.
When you tell it to stop, it stops.
When you tell it to be empty, it's really and truly empty.
This method of watching the mind is extremely useful, but we're rarely interested in contemplating to the point of becoming adept and resourceful at disbanding our own sufferings.
We practice in a leisurely, casual way, and don't know which points we should correct, where we should disband things, what we should let go of.
And so we keep circling around with suffering and attachment.
We have to figure out how to find our opportunity to disband suffering with every moment.
We can't just live, sleep, and eat at our ease.
We need to find ways to examine and contemplate all things, using our mindfulness and discernment to see their emptiness of “self.” Only then will we be able to loosen our attachments.
If we don't know with real mindfulness and discernment, our practice won't be able to lead us out of suffering and stress at all.
Every defilement — each one in the list of sixteen — is hard to abandon.
Still, they don't arise all sixteen at once, but only one at a time.
If you know the features of their arising, you can let them go.
The first step is to recognize their faces clearly, because you have to realize that they're burning hot every time they arise.
If they have you sad or upset, it's easy to know them.
If they have you happy, they're harder to detect.
So you first have to learn to recognize the mind at normalcy, keeping your words and deeds at normalcy, too.
“Normalcy” here means being free of liking and disliking.
It's a question of purity in virtue — just as when we practice restraint of the senses.
Normalcy is the basic foundation.
If the mind isn't at normalcy — if it likes this or dislikes that — that means your restraint of the senses isn't pure.
For instance, when you see a sight with the eye or hear a sound with the ear, you don't get upset as long as no real pains arise, but if you get distracted and absentminded as the pains get more and more earnest, your precepts will suffer, and you'll end up all agitated.
So don't underestimate even the smallest things.
Use your mindfulness and discernment to disband things, to destroy them, and to keep working at your investigation.
Then, even if serious events happen, you'll be able to let go of them.
If your attachments are heavy, you'll be able to let go of them.
If they're many, you'll be able to thin them out.
The same holds true with intermediate defilements: the five Hindrances.
Any liking for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations is the Hindrance of sensual desire.
If you don't like what you see, hear, etc., that's the Hindrance of ill will.
These Hindrances of liking and disliking defile the mind, making it agitated and scattered, unable to grow calm.
Try observing the mind when it's dominated by the five Hindrances to see whether or not it's in a state of suffering.
Do you recognize these intermediate defilements when they enshroud your mind?
The Hindrance of sensual desire is like a dye that clouds clear water, making it murky — and when the mind is murky, it's suffering.
Ill will as a Hindrance is irritability and dissatisfaction, and the Hindrance of sloth and torpor is a state of drowsiness and lethargy — a condition of refusing to deal with anything at all, burying yourself in sleep and lazy forgetfulness.
All the Hindrances, including the final pair — restlessness & anxiety and uncertainty — cloak the mind in darkness.
This is why you need to be resilient in fighting them off at every moment and in investigating them so that you can weaken and eliminate every form of defilement — from the gross to the middling and on to the subtle — from the mind.
The practice of the Dhamma is very delicate work, requiring that you use all your mindfulness and discernment in probing and comprehending the body and mind.
When you look into the body, try to see the truth of how it's inconstant, stressful, and nothing more than physical elements.
If you don't contemplate in this way, your practice will simply grope around and won't be able to release you from suffering and stress — for the sufferings caused by the defilements concocting things in the mind are more than many.
The mind is full of all kinds of tricks.
Sometimes you may gain some insight through mindfulness and discernment — becoming bright, empty, and at peace — only to find the defilements slipping in to spoil things, cloaking the mind in total darkness once more, so that you get distracted and can't know anything clearly.
We each have to find special strategies in reading ourselves so that we don't get lost in distractions.
Desire is a big troublemaker here, and so is distraction.
Torpor and lethargy — all the Hindrances — are enemies blocking your way.
The fact that you haven't seen anything all the way through is because these characters are blocking your way and have you surrounded.
You have to find a way to destroy them using apt attention, i.e., a skillful way of making use of the mind.
You have to dig down and explore, contemplating to see how these things arise, how they pass away, and what exactly is inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
These are questions you have to keep asking yourself so that the mind will really come to know.
When you really know inconstancy, you're sure to let go of defilement, craving, and attachment, or at least be able to weaken and thin them out.
It's like having a broom in your hand.
Whenever attachment arises, you sweep it away until the mind can no longer grow attached to anything, for there's nothing left for it to be attached to.
You've seen that everything is inconstant, so what's there to latch onto?
When you're persistent in contemplating to see your inconstancy, stress and not-selfness, the mind feels ease because you've loosened your attachments.
This is the marvel of the Dhamma: an ease of body and mind completely free from entanglement in the defilements.
It's truly special.
Before, the ignorance obscuring the mind caused you wander about spellbound by sights, sounds, and so forth, so that defilement, craving, and attachment had you under their power.
But now, mindfulness and discernment break the spell by seeing that there's no self to these things, nothing real to them at all.
They simply arise and pass away with every moment.
There's not the least little bit of “me” or “mine” to them at all.
Once we really know with mindfulness and discernment, we sweep everything clean, leaving nothing but pure Dhamma with no sense of self at all.
We see nothing but inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness, with no pleasure or pain.
The Lord Buddha taught, “Sabbe dhamma anatta — All things are not-self.” Both the compounded and the uncompounded — which is nibbana, the transcendent — are not-self.
There's just Dhamma.
This is very important.
There's no sense of self there, but what is there, is Dhamma.
This isn't the extinction taught by the wrong view of annihilationism; it's the extinction of all attachment to “me” and “mine.” All that remains is Deathlessness — the undying Dhamma, the undying property — free from birth, aging, illness, and death.
Everything still remains as it was, it hasn't been annihilated anywhere; the only things annihilated are the defilements together with all suffering and stress.
It's called “suñño” — empty — because it's empty of the label of self.
This Deathlessness is the true marvel the Buddha discovered and taught to awaken us.
This is why it's so worth looking in to penetrate clear through the inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness of the five aggregates, for what then remains is the natural Dhamma free from birth, aging, illness, and death.
It's called Unbinding, Emptiness, the Unconditioned: These names all mean the same thing.
They're simply conventional designations that also have to be let go so that you can dwell in the aspect of mind devoid of any sense of self.
So the paths, fruitions, and nibbana are not something to hope for in a future life by developing a vast heap of perfections.
Some people like to point out that the Lord Buddha had to accumulate so many, many virtues — but what about you?
You don't consider how many lives have passed while you still have yet to attain the goal, all because of your stupidity in continually finding excuses for yourself.
The basic principles that the Lord Buddha taught — such as the four foundations of mindfulness, the four Noble Truths, the three characteristics of inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness — are right here inside you, so probe on in to contemplate them until you know them.
Defilement, craving, and attachment are right here inside you, too, so contemplate them until you gain true insight.
Then you'll be able to let them go, no longer latching onto them as really being “me” or “mine.” This way you'll gain release from suffering and stress within yourself.
Don't keep excusing yourself by relying, for instance, on the miraculous powers of some object or waiting to build up the perfections.
Don't think in those terms.
Think instead of what the defilements are like right here and now: Is it better to disband them or to fall in with them?
If you fall in with them, is there suffering and stress?
You have to find out the truth within yourself so as to get rid of your stupidity and delusion in thinking that this bodily frame of suffering is really happiness.
We're all stuck in this delusion because we don't open our eyes.
This is why we have to keep discussing these issues, giving advice and digging out the truth so that you'll give rise to the mindfulness and discernment that will enable you to know yourself.
The fact that you've begun to see things, to acknowledge the defilements and stress within yourself to at least some extent, is very beneficial.
It's better that we talk about these things than about anything else, so that we'll gain knowledge about suffering and its cause, about how to contemplate body, feelings, mind, and mental qualities so as to disband our suffering and stress.
This way we can reduce our sufferings because we'll be letting go of the defilements that scorch the mind and get it agitated.
Our mindfulness and discernment will gradually be able to eliminate the defilements and cravings from the heart.
This practice of ours, if we really do it and really come to know, will really reduce our sufferings.
This will attract others to follow our example.
We won't have to advertise, for they'll have to notice.
We don't have to brag about what level we've attained or what degrees we've earned.
We don't have any of that here, for all we talk about is suffering, stress, the defilements, not-self.
If we know with real mindfulness and discernment, we can scrape away our defilements, cravings, and attachments, and the good results will be right there inside us.
So now that we have this opportunity, we should make a concerted effort for the sake of our own progress.
Don't let your life pass under the influence of defilement, craving, and attachment.
Make an effort to correct yourself in this area every day, every moment, and you're sure to progress in your practice of destroying your defilements and disbanding your suffering and stress at all times.
This business of sacrificing defilements or sacrificing your sense of self is very important because it gives rewards — peace, normalcy, freedom with every moment — right here in the heart.
The practice is thus something really worthy of interest.
If you're not interested in the practice of searching out and destroying the diseases of defilement, of your own suffering and stress, you'll have to stay stuck there in repeated suffering along with every other ignorant person in the world.
When Mara — temptation — tried to stop the Buddha's efforts by telling him that within seven days he would become a Universal Emperor, the Buddha answered, “I know already!
Don't try to deceive me or tempt me.” Because the Buddha had the ability to know such things instantly for himself, Mara was continually defeated.
But what about you?
Are you a disciple of the Lord Buddha or of Mara?
Whenever temptation appears — there you go, following him hook, line, and sinker, with no sense of weariness or dispassion at all.
If we're really disciples of the Buddha we have to go against the flow of defilement, craving, and attachment, establishing ourselves in good qualities — beginning with morality, which forms the ideal principle for protecting ourselves.
Then we can gain release from suffering by working from the level of the precepts on to mental calm and then using discernment to see inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
This is a high level of discernment, you know: the discernment that penetrates not-self.
At any rate, the important point is that you not believe your defilements.
Even though you may still have the effluents of ignorance or craving in your mind, always keep making use of mindfulness and discernment as your means of knowing, letting go, scrubbing things clean.
When these effluents come to tempt you, simply stop.
Let go.
Refuse to go along with them.
If you believe them when they tell you to latch onto things, you'll simply continue being burned and agitated by desire.
But if you don't go along with them, the desires in the mind will gradually loosen, subside, and eventually cease.
So in training the mind, you have to take desire as your battlefield in the same way you would in treating an addiction: If you aren't intent on defeating it, there's no way you can escape being a slave to it repeatedly.
We have to use mindfulness as a protective shield and discernment as our weapon to cut through and destroy our desires.
That way our practice will result in steady progress, enabling us to keep abreast of defilement, craving and attachment with more and more precision.
If, in your practice, you can read and decipher the mind, you'll find your escape route, following the footsteps of the Noble Ones.
But as long as you don't see it, you'll think that there are no paths, no fruitions, no nibbana.
Only when you can disband the defilements will you know.
You really have to be able to disband them in order to know for yourself that the paths, fruitions, and nibbana really exist and really can disband suffering and stress.
This is something you have to know for yourself.
It's timeless: No matter what the time or season, whenever you have the mindfulness to stop and let go, there's no suffering.
As you learn to do this over and over, more and more frequently, the defilements grow weaker and weaker.
This is why it's ehipassiko — something you can invite other people to come and see, for all people who do this can disband defilement and suffering.
If they contemplate until they see inconstancy, stress, and not-self, they'll no longer have any attachments, and their minds will become Dhamma, will become free.
There's no need to get all excited about anyone outside — spirit entities or whatever — because success in the practice lies right here in the heart.
Look into it until you penetrate clearly all the way through yourself, sweep away all your attachments, and then you'll have this “ehipassiko” within you.
“Come and see!
Come and see!” But if there's still any defilement, then it's, “Come and see!
Come and see the defilements burning me!” It can work both ways, you know.
If you disband the defilements, let go, and come to a stop, then it's, “Come and see how the defilements are gone, how the mind is empty right here and now!” This is something anyone can know, something you can know thoroughly for yourself with no great difficulty.
Turning to look into the mind isn't all that difficult, you know.
You don't have to travel far to do it.
You can watch it at any time, in any posture.
True things and false are all there within you, but if you don't study yourself within, you won't know them — for you spend all your time studying outside, the things of the world that worldly people study.
If you want to study the Dhamma, you have to turn around and come inside, watching right at the body, at feelings, at the mind, at mental qualities, until you know the truth that the body isn't you or yours; it's inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
Feelings are inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
The mind is inconstant, stressful, and not-self as well.
Then look at the Dhamma of mental qualities: They're inconstant and stressful.
They arise, persist, and pass away.
If you don't latch on and can become free from any sense of self right here at mental qualities, the mind becomes free.
If you understand correctly, the mind is really easy to deal with.
If you don't, it's the exact opposite.
Like pushing a light switch: If you hit the “on” button, the light is immediately bright.
With the “off” button, it's immediately dark.
The same holds true with the mind.
If your knowledge is wrong, it's dark.
If your knowledge is right, it's bright.
Then look to see if there's anything worth clinging to.
If you really look, you'll see that there isn't, for all the things you can cling to are suffering and stress — affairs of ignorance, speculation, day-dreaming, taking issue with things, self, people, useless chatter, endless news reports.
But if you focus on probing into the mind, there's nothing — nothing but letting go to be empty and free.
This is where the Dhamma arises easily — as easily as defilements arise on the other side, simply that you're now looking from a different angle and have the choice: Do you want the dark angle or the bright?
Should you stop or keep running?
Should you be empty or entangled?
It's yours to decide within you.
The Dhamma is something marvelous and amazing.
If you start out with right understanding, you can understand all the way through.
If you get snagged at any point, you can examine and contemplate things to see where you're still attached.
Keep cross-examining back and forth, and then all will become clear.
We're already good at following the knowledge of defilement and craving, so now we have to follow the knowledge of mindfulness and discernment instead.
Keep cross-examining the defilements.
Don't submit to them easily.
You have to resist their power and refuse to fall in with them.
That's when you'll really come to know.
When you really know, everything stops.
Craving stops, your wanderings stop, likes, hatreds — this knowledge sweeps everything away.
But if you don't know, you keep gathering things up until you're thoroughly embroiled: arranging this, adjusting that, wanting this and that, letting your sense of self rear its ugly head.
Think of it like this: You're a huge playhouse showing a true-to-life drama whose hero, heroine, and villains — which are conventional suppositions — are entirely within you.
If you strip away all conventional suppositions and designations, what you have left is nothing but Dhamma: freedom, emptiness.
And simply being free and empty of any sense of self is enough to bring the whole show to an end.
This is translated from a talk given in July,, to a group of monks and nuns, most of whom were relatively new to meditation.
Because his listeners were already familiar with the basic techniques of concentration practice as explained in “Method “ in Ajaan Lee's book, Keeping the Breath in Mind, Ajaan Fuang here focuses less on technique than on the proper attitude and understanding to bring to the practice.
The style of the talk is fairly repetitive and so works best when it is read aloud.
Our teachers have laid the basis for our practice, setting out everything, with nothing lacking.
The fact that the developments we experience in the practice aren't complete comes from a lack within ourselves, in our own practice.
We haven't practiced enough to cut things away.
We haven't given the practice our full effort.
So let's take the opportunity today to make an effort, i.e., to fix our mindfulness — each and every one of us — securely on the in-and-out breath.
There's nothing much to it.
Each of us has a breath.
It's a meditation theme we already have within ourselves.
We don't have to go looking for it anywhere else.
And there's no need to doubt as to whether or not it's true.
So let's come and look within ourselves, observe, investigate, ponder what's within ourselves.
The Buddha knew for himself what was true within himself; and we follow him by practicing in line with his teachings so as to see whether what's within ourselves is true or false.
So try to be as observant as possible within yourself.
This practice is said to be akaliko — timeless.
The Buddha's teachings are timeless.
The fact that there are no developments in our practice is because we have times.
The Buddha says, “timeless.” We say there are times.
Our times are more than many.
Time for this, time for that, times for walking, times for sitting, times for sleeping, times for eating, times for talking — there are lots of them.
Our life turns into nothing but times.
So now let's try practicing in a way that it becomes timeless.
The truth will then appear in our minds — each and every one of us.
Everything that's ready to develop is already there.
We don't have to get it from anywhere else.
Awareness itself — the “knowing” in the mind — is already there within us.
So use your mindfulness to keep the breath in mind so that what's already there will appear clearly, continually — and developments in the mind will appear as well.
We've got to be observant as much as possible.
Use your mindfulness to keep the breath in mind — the breath that's already there within you, that's been there from the day you were born up to the present.
The effort lies in taking what's already there and keeping it continuous, without break, so that it grows, so that it's steady and constant.
It'll then gain momentum.
There will be strength in the breath.
Developments will appear.
Our in-and-out breath will become timeless.
It will appear continuously to our awareness.
This is something we have to pursue as much as possible, do as much as possible.
The more we do it, the more all sorts of good things will appear within us.
If we don't work at it, our goodness won't develop.
It'll turn into times.
The opportunity to know the truth won't appear clearly within us.
The truth will stay incomplete.
So we have to use the power of our mindfulness to keep the breath in mind in a way that becomes more and more complete.
Then developments will appear within us.
The Dhamma — our meditation theme — is something we all have within us — each and every one of us.
It's something we're doing as we sit here.
We're practicing it, training in it.
The question is how we take what's already here and make it more complete.
We have to make an effort to use our powers of observation to acquaint ourselves with what's already there.
Our teachers simply tell us, point out the way.
As for us, we have to train ourselves to use our powers of observation within ourselves: to know in line with the truth within us.
Once we see that it's true, we look after it so that it develops — we keep looking after it as much as possible, and there's no two ways about it: it'll simply have to progress.
There aren't a lot of complicated steps to all this.
We simply look after what's already there so that it can become more full and complete.
It'll grow day by day, month by month, year by year.
The developments in our minds will get better and better.
It's not the case that things appear only for a moment and that's plenty enough.
That's not the case at all.
Whatever appears here and now, while we're sitting here, we have to keep looking after it continually, all day, all night, all month, all year long.
We have to keep after it continuously, without stop.
If we keep looking after it, the developments in our minds will keep developing further along.
If things happen just once, that's not enough.
It's the same as when we eat.
One mouthful of food isn't enough.
We have to keep eating and eating until we're full.
The same holds true in the effort to develop good qualities, noble qualities, within ourselves.
Whether we build them through our thoughts, our words, or our deeds, it all comes down to the one heart.
We have to train our heart to gain a sense of respite and peace.
We have to train it to grow better and better, for all good things arise from the heart.
This is why we train it to be mindful, to stay with the in-breath, the out-breath.
We train it in its meditation theme so that it will have roots, a foundation — so that it will be steady and solid and won't go straying off after its thoughts and concepts.
We get it to gather together solely at the in-and-out breath so as to give it respite from its Hindrances, so that the Hindrances won't be able to come in and interfere with its goodness.
That way we'll be able to develop more goodness, to get the mind firmly established in concentration.
This is something each person has to do for him or herself — each and every one of us.
It's our very own personal duty.
Whatever techniques actually solve the problems of our hearts so that they can experience peace, whatever methods work in getting the mind to stay with the body in the present — whatever the methods — the important thing is that the mind stays firmly in its goodness all day, all night, whether we're standing, walking, sitting, or lying down.
After all, we don't get much of a chance to do good, you know.
It's not the case that we'll get to do this forever.
There are always obstacles ready to get in the way.
So while you've got the chance — right now and on into the future, as long as you've got the opportunity — you should try to accelerate your efforts.
Keep at it.
Keep at it as much as you can until the mind gains full strength, so that it can prevent all its lower qualities, its unskillful qualities, from getting in the way, from interfering with it, so that you'll have the opportunity to develop your goodness in full.
The goodness that arises from our thoughts, words, and deeds is something we all have.
It's not the case that anyone without any goodness is sitting here.
The question is how we take this goodness and make it even better — making it better, here, means meditation, the goodness accomplished in the area of the mind.
For this, we have to make an effort to train the mind to be more solid and steady.
We have to make an effort, persevere, be resilient, put the mind through its paces — for who else can train the mind for us?
We ourselves are the only ones who can train our own minds.
We have to draw the line to teach ourselves.
Only then will things be able to develop.
Other people can teach you only the outer skin, the rind, but as for what lies deeper inside, only you can lay down the law for yourself.
You have to draw the line, being mindful, keeping track of what you do at all times.
It's like having a teacher following you around, in public and in private, keeping watch over you, alerting you, telling what to do and what not to do, making sure that you stay in line.
If you don't have this sort of teacher inside you, the mind is bound to stray off the path and get into mischief, shoplifting all over town.
That's the way it is with the mind.
So we have to draw the line to keep it in place.
We can make it stay in place from morning to noon, or from noon to late afternoon — whatever the boundaries we set for it, we have to make it stay in line, to make it stay in school.
Like a child in a schoolroom: we give it directions and set a goal for its work so that the results will be substantial and solid.
We have to keep training the mind in line with the path of our practice, and as a result it'll get gradually more familiar with the work, bit by bit.
It'll keep getting more tractable, more tame, so that it wanders off only occasionally, only once in a long, long while.
It'll rarely get lost.
If we strap it down too tightly, it may struggle to get away.
So we may have to put it on a long leash.
But whether you keep it on a slack leash or a tight leash all depends on which technique you find works for you.
The strategies needed for training the mind aren't the same for everyone.
Some people really have to force the mind, come down hard on it, go without water and food.
But it all comes down to whatever works in keeping the mind within its proper bounds.
To summarize, our practice is to keep the breath in mind.
This is the path our teacher, Ajaan Lee, set out for us while he was still alive.
We practice staying with the in-and-out breath.
We focus on keeping track of the in-and-out breath.
We watch, follow, know the in-and-out breath.
Stay with the breath.
Don't wander off.
Observe the in-and-out breath so that it's clear, so that it's complete.
If we can maintain this, continue keeping this in mind, there's no problem — for the breath is always there.
It's already coming in, going out, all day, all night.
Whether or not we watch it, whether or not we focus on it, it's always there by its very nature.
All we have to do is maintain what's already there, look after what's already there.
Actually, it sounds pretty easy: it's not the sort of thing you have to go borrow from anyone else anywhere else at all.
It's already there, already happening.
All you have to do is look after it, or keep it in mind.
And you don't have to invest a lot of capital.
Just keep the breath in mind, gently support and protect what's already developing there so that it becomes more complete.
If you do just this, you'll experience a sense of ease.
Bodily pleasure.
Mental pleasure.
The mind will experience peace.
So straighten out your views.
Make them right.
If your views are right, the mind will immediately experience a sense of ease.
If your views are wrong, everything else will immediately be wrong — for the things we're talking about are already there, already happening.
So keep your views straight in line with the breath.
You won't have to exert a lot of energy.
You'll experience a sense of ease.
Your mind will immediately feel peace.
Now, how do you use your powers of observation to get acquainted with the breath?
Ask yourself: Do you know the breath yet, or not?
Is the breath truly there, or not?
If you can't see whether the breath is true, look further in until it's clearly there.
There's no trick, no mystery to it.
It's always true, right there.
The important thing is whether or not you're true.
Then that's all there is to it — this little, tiny point.
There aren't a lot of complications.
Once that awareness is true, you simply maintain it, maintain that truth, your truth, continually.
Keep it constantly in mind, and the developments in the mind will be able to continue developing.
They'll gradually grow stronger, and the mind will grow calm.
Just be clear about what you're doing.
Don't have any doubts.
If you can doubt even your own breath, then there are no two ways about it: You'll doubt everything.
No matter what happens, you'll be uncertain about it.
So being true in this way is what will solve the problem of vicikiccha, the Hindrance of uncertainty.
So reflect, ponder, investigate what's going on inside yourself, as you're sitting here practicing, to see why the mind isn't experiencing any peace, why there's no sense of physical or mental pleasure.
Why is it?
Why is the mind still restless and distracted?
Set your mind on what you're doing.
Don't let yourself have any doubts.
Be straightforward and true in whatever you do, for everything comes down to whether or not you're true.
So you have to keep using your powers of observation as much as possible.
You have to get acquainted with your own breath — coming in, going out — and make it clear.
Once you're clearly acquainted with it, then maintain it, keep looking after the way it develops, keep it in mind at all times.
There's just this one little point in our practice.
All I ask is that you recognize it, that you're aware of it, for this awareness is already the basis of cognitive skill.
The trick is to make it more and more aware, more and more developed.
To be aware just once isn't enough.
You have to keep becoming more and more aware, more and more aware, until it's totally full — your awareness is totally full, with no lapses, no gaps.
It stays steady and continuous at all times.
That's when it's called knowing in full measure.
Ajaan Fuang rarely allowed his talks to be taped, and he was even more adamant about not allowing anyone to tape his conversations.
Somehow, though, the following conversation was taped with his permission.
In it, he's giving advice to some of his students — young women in their late twenties and early thirties — who were being pressured by their parents to settle down, get married, and start having children.
There were other occasions on which, when asked, he gave advice on how to lead a happily married life to any of his students who were planning on marriage, but it's easy to see from this discussion where his heart really lay.
Ajaan Fuang: That's right.
Give it a lot of thought.
Once there's birth, there has to be suffering.
We've all suffered in this way.
First there's your own suffering, then you take on the sufferings of others.
Look at a baby.
What is it?
Where does it come from?
The Buddha says that it's suffering; it comes from the power of craving and defilement.
First you have to carry it around in your womb, then when it's born you have to carry it around on your hip, and then when it starts to walk you have to lead it by the hand.
When you see this sort of thing your heart just…
Student: Withers.
Ajaan Fuang: Yes.
It withers.
This is what gives you a sense of samvega.
This is the sort of thing you want in your practice.
It's your teacher.
They call it your teacher.
Ask yourself: “Is this what you want out of life?
Is this what you want, this sort of thing?” Not really.
“Then if you don't want this sort of thing, don't get involved.” How many times have you been through this already?
This isn't the first time, you know.
You've been doing this holding-carrying-weighing-yourself-down routine for a long, long time — hundreds of thousands of eons.
If you keep getting involved, there's no way you'll get free.
Birth, aging, illness, and death: these things are normal.
Birth is the normal way of things, aging's the normal way of things, illness and death are the normal way of things.
Get so that you can see clearly that this is the way things normally are.
That's when a sense of disenchantment can arise.
You'll be able to loosen the grip that these things have on you.
You'll be able to pull them out, root and all.
We've suffered as the slaves of defilement and craving for how long now?
Can you remember?
Ask yourself.
Can you remember all you've been through?
And how much longer are you going to let it keep on happening — this holding and carrying and weighing yourself down?
How many eons have you been doing this?
Tens of thousands, hundreds of thousands of eons.
Can you count them all?
Of course you can't.
And how much longer will you have to keep on suffering in this way?
If you're still stubborn, still unwilling to listen to the Buddha's teachings, this is the kind of reward you'll have to expect out of life.
Do you want it?
Do you like it?
If you don't want it, then you'll have to develop the goodness of your mind so that you can see your way out of this, so that you can see your defilements, so that you can see the suffering and harm they cause.
Look at suffering.
Look at the rewards of suffering.
When people feel that we don't have much suffering, they find more suffering for us.
Even just the five aggregates provide us with more than enough suffering — the suffering we have just on our own.
So when they talk about the happiness of taking on another person, exactly what happiness is there?
Nothing but more suffering.
“Treasures” that bring you suffering.
Our parents want us to get married, to have a spouse and a family.
They've had plenty of suffering raising us, and yet it's not enough.
How many children has your mother carried around in her womb?
And now she's looking for more suffering for her children.
Student: Than Phaw, is it true what they say, that a woman gains of lot of merit in having a child, in that she gives someone else the chance to be born?
Ajaan Fuang: If that were true, then dogs would get gobs of merit, giving birth to whole litters at a time.
No, that's just propaganda from those who want to see more and more beings getting born in this world.
Student: When people want to get married, it's because they have a lot of bad karma with each other.
Isn't that right?
Ajaan Fuang: Of course that's right.
Just look at what they're doing.
There's no need to explain.
It's nothing but imposing on each other, causing each other affliction and pain.
There's no real happiness there; nothing but suffering.
Getting married is no way to escape suffering.
Actually, all you do is pile more suffering on yourself.
The Buddha taught that the five aggregates are a heavy burden, but if you get married, all of a sudden you have ten to worry about, and then fifteen, and then twenty.
And that's not the end of the matter.
As soon as a child is born, it comes down with this, then comes down with that.
It's not the case that from the moment it pops out it doesn't need to take medicine, that we can just leave it alone and it'll grow day and night.
Oh, all the things you have to do for it until it's grown!
It starts out so small and can only lie there.
Then think of what it needs until it can sit up, and then what it needs until it can stand, and then what it needs until it can walk.
When was it ever an easy thing, raising a child?
And that's not all.
As soon as you want to lie down for a little rest, it cries.
You lie down for a little bit and it cries.
There's nothing wonderful about it at all.
When people pressure you to get married and have children, it's like someone who walks along and steps in a pile of excrement and then tries to figure out how to get other people to step in it, too, to make up for his own mistake.
Yes, it's karma that makes people want to get married.
Karma is what obscures their vision.
They can't see that what they want is a form of suffering.
To them it's something wonderful — because that's the best they know.
The best they have.
They don't know anything better than that.
When your parents want you to get married, it's because that's all they know.
Get them to meditate, and then they'll realize: “Oh!
What we've been through is suffering!” To see this sort of thing, though, you have to meditate.
If you don't meditate, you won't see.
If you don't meditate, you'll have to see things the way they do.
Even when you do meditate, you still see things the way they do.
It's not easy to pull yourself out of that way of thinking.
It's not easy at all.
If the power of this defilement won't surrender… Only when your views are straight and you really let go: only then will you be done with the matter.
Even the devas in heaven: they're still satisfied with their sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations.
They're still satisfied with what they've got.
They're infatuated with the way they look and sound and smell, infatuated with their companions.
They're tied down to sensuality, hand and foot, which is why it disturbs them when we meditate.
They're afraid we'll get away.
They're determined not to let it happen.
When we meditate and our minds grow still, they come and attack, stirring us up so that we start turning back in our tracks, so that we don't see the right path to release from suffering.
This is called karma that keeps us in the round of samsara, the karma we do that makes us fall in line with everyone else, so that we don't see the path to release from suffering.
All we can see is the path to staying stuck, staying stuck in suffering.
Student: In that case, then, when you think you've found your mate, you've really found someone who holds some of your old karma debts.
Ajaan Fuang: What else did you think?
It's like horseshoe crabs.
Have you ever seen them?
They live in the sea.
Even they have their mates.
Everywhere they go, they go in pairs.
The male doesn't know how to feed itself, so it rides on the back of the female.
Student: So how can we escape this?
We can avoid this, can't we, Than Phaw, if we really want to?
Ajaan Fuang: If you don't want this sort of thing, then don't let any horseshoe crabs catch hold of you.
After all, it's just an animal instinct.
Animals have to mate in order to spread their species, their influence.
But if we don't want to have a part in that, we just don't get involved.
Your mate can demand repayment on your old karma debts only if you get involved.
Student: Can you really escape?
Ajaan Fuang: Why shouldn't you be able to escape?
Just don't get involved, don't get attached.
Try to keep your mind strong and don't waver.
Develop your perfections so that they're greater and greater, and these other desires will just wither away.
They're really shallow, you know, and nothing but suffering.
They come about because we're attracted to our own bodies, but when you get an image of yourself in meditation, just take it apart.
Take it apart, and then what's left?
Anything?
Nothing at all.
It's all in the form.
When you take the form apart, there's nothing left.
And what substance is there in the form?
Look at it.
Take it apart.
There's nothing but earth, water, wind, and fire.
Is there anything to be attracted to then?
Student: No, nothing.
Ajaan Fuang: And when you're sound asleep.
Does the body know anything of desire?
Student: No, not at all.
Ajaan Fuang: The mind is the instigator.
The body on its own doesn't have anything to do.
It simply acts under the orders of its boss: the mind.
The body doesn't know a thing.
It depends on the boss' orders.
So when the boss says, “Enough!
No more!” then that's the end of the matter.
The mind doesn't struggle or thirst.
What struggles and thirsts is the aggregate of fabrication.
If you latch on to fabrication, that's the essence of suffering — big-time suffering.
If you look at the body, you'll see that there really are no issues there.
The issues all come from fabrication.
If the mind can break through and understand this attachment to the body, then where else will desire come from?
The body isn't really ours.
Wherever you see anything that's “yours,” uproot it, take it apart, and let it go.
Take it apart: the earth, the water, the wind, the fire.
That's all there's been to it, all along, since who knows when.
That's all there is to it now.
The problem is that we've been deluded about it and so we've latched onto it.
We've been deluded just like everyone else.
Deep down, doesn't the mind already know this?
Of course it knows, for that's the nature of the mind: to know.
We have to know.
So bring this knowledge in and take it to heart.
You have to be your own refuge, you know.
If you're the sort that has to take refuge in other people, then you'll have to see things the same way they do, which means you have to be stupid the same way they are.
So pull yourself out of all that and take a good look at yourself until things are clear within you.
Keep contemplating things until there's just the “knower” inside.
This knower isn't paired with anything else.
It doesn't have a mate.
It's single.
It's one.
It doesn't have anything.
So focus in on the knower and make it one.
Get so that it lets go of everything.
It lets go of pleasure, lets go of pain, lets go of equanimity.
It's bright, all on its own.
Keep focused there until there's nothing left but a state of oneness.
Then ask yourself: is it male or female?
There's no “male” or “female” in there at all.
It doesn't place labels on anything.
And when you've gotten there, that's the end of those issues.
Those who get stuck on mental phenomena are called Brahmas.
Once they reach this point in their practice… The devas in their heavens still have their mates, but the Brahmas have no interest in sights, smells, sounds, tastes, tactile sensations.
They're content in their oneness…
We're told that if we listen well, we gain discernment.
If we don't listen well, we won't gain any discernment.
In terms of the Buddha's teachings, listening well means that the mind has to be centered and firmly intent.
Success depends on our mind's being firmly intent.
If we're not intent, there won't be any success — we won't succeed in attaining the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana in the way they did in the past.
In the past they listened for just an instant and succeeded in attaining nibbana.
Why was that?
Because they listened well.
They gained discernment.
They understood.
In other words, they took it to heart.
Nowadays we study all kinds of things — going abroad to study; studying many, many fields of knowledge — but it doesn't lead to release from suffering.
It just leads back into the world of conventional truths and wandering on.
We already know a lot, but if we want to listen well, in the way that leads to discernment, the mind has to be still.
How do we make it still?
Offerings we've already given.
The precepts we've already taken: against killing, against stealing, against illicit sex, against lying, against intoxicants.
And now it's up to us as to whether we'll keep them or not.
The rewards of keeping the precepts, you know, go all the way to nibbana.
The attainment of the human state, the attainment of the heavenly state, the attainment of nibbana are all results of keeping the precepts.
That's what we're told.
Next comes meditation, making the mind centered, firmly intent.
This is the duty of each and every one of us.
You have to make a mental effort to look after the mind.
It's a subtle thing, not blatant at all.
It's subtle — but it lies within us.
Lots of teachers have come through here, teaching you to think buddho, or buddho, dhammo, sangho.
You have to keep recollecting these things until the mind gets firmly centered.
The reason the mind isn't yet firmly centered in concentration is because you go centering it outside.
It's centered inside just a bit and then goes stretching outside.
It won't stay centered inside.
And when this is the case, you find it hard to listen well.
So you have to try to listen well.
Make the mind firmly centered.
You listen with your mind, not just with your ears.
You listen with your mind.
When the mind is firmly centered, you gain discernment.
Understanding.
Total comprehension.
In the past, they listened for just a little bit and they understood.
They became stream-winners, once-returners, non-returners, and arahants.
So focus your minds on meditating.
Make the mind still.
Let it calm down from its outside preoccupations.
Outside preoccupations are all around us.
Let your eyes and ears be still.
Our ears keep on hearing, so how can they be quiet?
We're the ones who aren't quiet.
We keep giving rise to things that go flowing out the ears and eyes.
We keep making contact.
So we're told to make the mind quiet.
Make it centered.
We have to be mindful, keeping the breath in mind.
So.
Sit and meditate right now.
Focus on your breath.
Close your eyes and focus on your breath.
Close your eyes and think bud- with the in-breath, dho with the out.
Bud- in, dho out.
Train the mind.
And listen.
If you simply listen without doing the training, nothing will develop.
When you've listened, that's not the end of it.
You have to listen and do it as well.
What this means is that when you've listened, you have to do it right then and there so that you can gain some benefits from listening.
Only then will you gain the skillfulness that you hope for, that you want.
When the mind is centered and you understand, it leads to merit and skill.
When the mind is still, you see what they mean by “merit,” you reach what they mean by “merit.” It's not the least bit hard.
If the mind isn't centered, it's pretty hard.
So fix the mind firmly on nothing but the in-and-out breath.
Observe the breath.
Is there an in-breath?
An out-breath?
It's something we all have within each and every one of us.
This treasure is already there.
The in-breath is there.
The out-breath is there.
So we have to bring our powers of observation inside the body.
Keep this breath in mind.
Don't go wandering off far, okay?
Look at what's already there inside you.
You have a valuable treasure within you — the treasure of being a human being.
So you have to look after this treasure until it grows more complete, until it becomes the treasure of the heavenly realms, the treasure of nibbana.
Look after this treasure.
It's hard to look after if you don't know how to use it, if you don't know how to take care of it.
If you're not discerning, this treasure can turn into a liability — there's no need to doubt it.
So what can we do when we're not yet discerning?
There are all kinds of dangers that can make us fall away from this treasure.
This is why we have to develop the skills needed to take care of it — in other words, observing the five precepts and keeping the mind firmly centered on the in-and-out breath.
Keep the mind firmly centered.
Keep watch over the breath continually.
Keep after it continually, making sure that the in-breath is comfortable, the out-breath is comfortable.
When we do this, we're looking after our treasure.
When we look after it mindfully, nothing will threaten it.
If anything comes our way, we'll know in advance.
We'll be able to look after our treasure for the rest of our lives.
Or we'll be able to increase it, add to it, so that it becomes the treasure of the heavenly realms, the treasure of nibbana.
It all comes from this one spot right here.
It comes from the breath.
If we can take care of it and keep it firm, it'll take us to the treasure of the human state, the treasure of the heavenly realms, all the way to the treasure of nibbana.
Now, it's only natural that doing this will require persistence.
Effort.
Patience and endurance.
Only then will we arrive at our goal.
If we're diligent and persistent, we're sure to succeed, just like the great ajaans, just like the Buddha.
They reached the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana through endurance, diligence, and persistence.
That's how the Buddha became the Buddha we worship and bow down to every day.
Why do we bow down to him?
Because he exerted the kind of effort and persistence that enabled him to gain omniscience, to become the mainstay for all beings, human and divine.
The same principle holds true for us.
Once we've set our minds on developing our treasures — our noble wealth, our inner wealth as well as our outer wealth — we have take good care of this spot: the breath.
We have to train the heart so that it's firmly centered and established, staying with the breath at all times every day.
Actually, the breath is already always there.
If it weren't there, we'd be finished.
The breath has been with us ever since the day of our birth, but the mind hasn't looked after it, hasn't taken care of it.
In other words, it hasn't looked after its guardian, hasn't even been acquainted with its guardian from birth.
This guardian has looked after us all along, you know, from the time we came out of our mother's womb up until now.
If this guardian hadn't been attentive in caring for us, we'd be dead.
Finished.
So we shouldn't forget the good that she's done us.
Look to see what kind of person she is: What does she look like?
What are her features?
Is she warm or cold?
Short or long?
Focus on seeing what kind of person she is, to see why she's been so good-hearted.
She's been looking after us all the way up until now, even though we aren't acquainted with her, haven't paid her any attention at all, to see how she's getting along, what her needs are.
We've never looked after her at all.
So let's give her some thought.
Look to see what she's like when she comes in, what she's like when she goes out.
Keep track of her.
Pay her some attention.
Be observant.
Reflect on what you see.
That way you'll see that the in-breath is there, the out-breath is there.
Then it's up to you: sit here and keep this awareness going.
Keep the breath going comfortably.
Notice: is the in-breath comfortable?
Is the out-breath comfortable?
If the in-breath and out-breath are comfortable, keep them going that way.
If they're not comfortable, we can change them.
You might try in long and out short, depending on what you notice feels good.
If long breathing isn't comfortable, you can change to short.
Or if short breathing isn't comfortable, you can change to long.
In other words, gain a sense of how to adjust things so that they're comfortable.
If you're well acquainted with the breath, you can adjust it.
If you're not acquainted with the breath, how will you be able to adjust it?
So first we have to get acquainted with it, to see the features of the breath already coming in and going out of the body.
What's it like when it comes in?
What's it like when it goes out?
When we can clearly observe it, when it's comfortable, then we keep after it, keep it going, continually.
We'll find that our guardian grows more good-hearted and kind.
When our guardian is good-hearted, our heart will grow good as well.
Why is that?
It's the same as when we live with good-hearted people, our heart feels good, too.
When our guardian is good-hearted, our heart will keep on being good.
The Buddha taught, asevana ca balanam, panditanañca sevana: when you associate with fools… When our heart sours, it's as if we associate with fools — fools inside us.
When the heart is good, it's because we have good friends — panditanañca — within.
When the mind has a good friend as its guardian within, it will grow bright, open, and refreshed.
It will gain in mindfulness and discernment.
Whatever we think of doing won't be for the purpose of harming ourselves or others.
So keep your mind firmly established in this way, because you've got a good friend, a guardian who will keep giving you good advice.
The mind will experience brightness and clarity throughout the day, the month, the year, all the way until there's no more in-and-out breathing.
So keep looking after your guardian until you breathe your last.
If the mind is in really good shape, you'll go all the way to nibbana.
If that's what you want, you have to make an effort to study and train a lot, keep after it, for it's a skill that arises only from within you.
It's your own direct refuge.
In gaining this skill, you have to depend on yourself.
The Buddha taught us to train ourselves, that we have to be strict with ourselves.
Our parents, brothers and sisters, our teachers: these are simply people with whom we associate for a short while.
But if we're really earnest, really intent, we have to depend on ourselves.
That's what the Buddha taught.
When he had taught living beings to take themselves as their own refuge, he was able to teach them to reach the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana.
When he taught them, they took his teachings inward — opanayiko — to contemplate and then to put into practice so that they saw in line with the Dhamma.
So we should train ourselves to be better and better every day, every night, for this is our very own affair.
You can say that the practice of the Dhamma is hard, and it is.
You can say that it's easy, and it is, for the breath is right here within us.
It's our very own affair.
It all depends on whether you want to do it or not.
If you don't train yourself, aren't strict with yourself, then you won't make progress.
If you train yourself, are strict with yourself, then you will — every day, every night.
You start out with your parents and teachers.
They teach you how to talk, how to eat, how to sit up, how to walk, all kinds of things.
Ever since you came out crying: how long has it been?
They trained you for months and then years, kept on training you.
You depended on your parents to train you.
You couldn't sit up, you couldn't walk, and so they taught you how.
You couldn't talk, so they kept teaching you how.
You gradually became more and more skilled, more and more intelligent.
You've depended on your parents as your first teachers to teach you and advise you to the point where you're grown.
Now it's your own duty.
You're adults.
It's your own duty to train yourself, to be strict with yourself.
It's all up to you.
Whether you're to be good or bad, to rise or fall, it's all up to you.
If you don't train yourself, and just let things follow their course, who's going to suffer?
You will.
The things we have to practice are all already within us.
So we have to be selective in looking at the heart to make it firmly centered within.
We have to realize that we've already got wealth.
We're human beings.
Aggathanam manussesu: the supreme status is in the human state.
Being supreme in this way isn't something easily gained, you know.
To be born as a human being and to meet with the Buddha's teachings is hard.
There are a lot of beings out there who don't make it here.
So we already have a treasure, we already have wealth.
It's now up to us to develop that treasure into the treasure of the heavenly realms, the treasure of nibbana.
It's not all that hard.
For those who don't have this treasure — spirits, angry demons, hungry ghosts — it's hard.
They want to do good, but they can't.
Why not?
Because they don't have any bodies.
They don't have any wealth.
They want to do good along with everyone else, but they can't.
So they have to wander around, begging from people here and there, trying to get a message through by possessing this person and that, telling them to do good.
They themselves want to do good but they can't.
Back when they were human beings they didn't want to do good.
Having gained the human state, they were lazy, eating and sleeping, sleeping and eating, letting the days pass by, pass by.
So we have to take time out every day to give some value to our lives.
If human beings had a sense of how to give value to their lives — even just for an hour a day, every day… The important thing is that you not be complacent.
Be intent on accelerating your efforts.
Whatever goodness you should develop, should realize, should master, should perfect: make an effort to give rise to it.
Give the heart something to hold to.
When the heart has something firm to hold to, it's not put to any difficulties.
So be as intent as you can on not being complacent.
The Buddha told us to accelerate our efforts.
Whatever goodness you haven't yet developed in your actions, go ahead and develop it.
Whatever goodness you haven't yet developed in your words, go ahead and develop it.
Whatever goodness you haven't yet developed in the area of the mind, you should accelerate your efforts and build it up within yourself as the treasure of the human state.
That way, when you die and leave this human realm, you won't have to beg for anything from anyone else, because you've already provided for yourself.
What you have is perfectly complete, with nothing lacking in any way at all.
This is why those who know accelerate their efforts.
When we're born into the human realm, we're born into a realm that's abundant in every way.
So when those who know are born here, they waste no time and make every effort to build up their perfections even further.
Like the Buddha — think about it: for four incalculable periods and one hundred thousand aeons he kept returning to this human realm to build up his perfections, taking birth again and again, growing old, growing sick, and dying again and again.
Four.
Incalculables.
Do you have any idea how long that is?
Twenty-eight beings have completed their perfections to the point of becoming Buddhas.
Each perfection of each Buddha has to be totally complete in every way.
If you were to take all the treasures of the human realm, they'd still be no match for the perfections of the Buddha.
He was born for the sake of perfection, to build his perfections.
That was his aim.
Whatever he was born as, it was always for the sake of his perfections, for the sake of the knowledge of Awakening.
That was why he kept swimming around in samsara, dying and taking birth, dying and taking birth, dying and taking birth, over and over again.
He kept on building up his perfections until he succeeded in gaining Awakening in line with his aims.
The same with his disciples: they all were born for the sake of building up their perfections.
So how about us?
What are the perfections we've been born for?
Why haven't we accelerated our efforts to give rise to something?
Why haven't we aimed our sights higher?
Ask yourself: what do you aim for?
What are your aspirations?
When you have an aspiration, work to fulfil it.
Bring it into being in line with your aims.
Even if you don't succeed in this lifetime, you're forming the habits, the requisite conditions, for the next life, so that they're tempered and strong, so that they'll keep on growing higher and higher with every lifetime — because you keep adding to them with every lifetime.
In that way you'll be able to succeed.
When we come into this world, we have to know within ourselves what we've come for.
What were we born for?
What were we born for?
We're born to build up our goodness, so we should hurry up and develop our goodness and make it a reality.
Just like the Buddha and his disciples: They weren't complacent.
No matter where they were born, they were born for perfection.
They didn't get infatuated with the affairs of worldly treasures.
No matter how much worldly pleasure they experienced, they weren't satisfied.
As soon as they had the opportunity, they left home to practice the holy life in order to continue building up their perfections in line with their aims.
As for us, as soon as we experience a little bit of pleasure we get stuck on it, addicted to it.
And so we aren't willing to go anywhere.
Even with just little pleasures, we get satisfied with the way things are.
These pleasures are really tricky, you know — these human pleasures.
They're called sensual pleasure.
Sensual pleasure is like a drug: One taste and you get addicted.
They say that with heroin it's hard to break the habit, but this is even worse.
It goes deep, right into the bone.
It's what made us get born in the first place, and has kept us circling through birth and death for aeons and aeons.
There's no medicine you can take to break the habit, to wash it out of your system, aside from the medicine of the Buddha's teachings.
Only when you use the Buddha's teachings will your addiction to these pleasures gradually loosen, gradually lighten, gradually fade away.
Only then will you be done with the poison of this intoxicant.
That's what it is: sensual intoxication.
We live with sensual intoxication.
It's really fierce.
It's what keeps us swimming around in death and rebirth.
Think about it.
Think about it.
Human beings, common animals, they're all in the same boat.
No matter where you're born in the sensual realm: even those who are born in the heavenly realm are still addicted.
Even in the heavenly realms, they're not done with it.
As soon as you escape from the human realm you get stuck in the heavenly realms.
So as long as we don't use the medicine of the Buddha's teachings to cut through this addiction, to drive it out, we'll have to keep on swimming through death and rebirth, going and coming back the way we are right now, with never a chance to put an end to it.
This is why those who know have ears, have eyes, have discernment.
They listen well and gain discernment.
That's why they see through everything.
They contemplate all fabricated things and see right through them.
That's why they're able to destroy becoming and birth, so that they no longer have to keep swimming through death and rebirth.
They let go of all stress and suffering, all difficulties and hardships, and enter nibbana.
They abandon all fabrications without leaving a trace and go straight to nibbana.
The Buddha and his disciples have all succeeded in this way, washing away all states of becoming and birth, so that they don't have to come back and suffer in this human world ever again.
So we should all set our hearts on making the mind into a firm foundation that we can hold to, as much as possible.
If you can't yet hold to it, then do what you need to, so that you can.
There are lots of people who are ashamed to talk about their own defilements but who feel no shame at talking about the defilements of others.
Those who are willing to report their own diseases — their own defilements — in a straightforward manner are few and far between.
As a result, the disease of defilement is hushed up and kept secret, so that we don't realize how serious and widespread it is.
We all suffer from it, and yet no one is open about it.
No one is really interested in diagnosing his or her own defilements…
We have to find a skillful approach if we hope to wipe out this disease, and we have to be open about it, admitting our defilements from the grossest to the most subtle levels, dissecting them down to their minutest details.
Only then will we gain from our practice.
If we look at ourselves in a superficial way, we may feel that we're already fine just as we are, already know all we need to know.
But then when the defilements let loose with full force as anger or delusion, we pretend that nothing is wrong — and this way the defilements become a hidden disease, hard to catch hold of, hard to diagnose…
We have to be strong in fighting off defilements, cravings, and illusions of every sort.
We have to test our strength against them and bring them under our power.
If we can bring them under our power, we can ride on their backs.
If we can't, they'll have to ride on our backs, making us do their work, pulling us around by the nose, making us want, wearing us out in all sorts of ways.
So are we still beasts of burden?
Are we beasts of burden because defilement and craving are riding on our backs?
Have they put a ring through our noses?
When you get to the point when you've had enough, you have to stop — stop and watch the defilements to see how they come into being, what they want, what they eat, what they find delicious.
Make it your sport — watching the defilements and making them starve, like a person giving up an addiction… See if it gets the defilements upset.
Do they hunger to the point where they're salivating?
Then don't let them eat.
No matter what, don't let them eat what they're addicted to.
After all, there are plenty of other things to eat.
You have to be hard on them — hard on your “self” — like this… “Hungry?
Well go ahead and be hungry!
You're going to die?
Fine!
Go ahead and die!” If you can take this attitude, you'll be able to win out over all sorts of addictions, all sorts of defilements — because you're not pandering to desire, you're not nourishing the desire that exists for the sake of finding flavor in physical things.
It's time you stopped, time you gave up feeding these things.
If they're going to waste away and die, let them die.
After all, why should you keep them fat and well fed?
No matter what, you have to keep putting the heat on your cravings and defilements until they wither and waste away.
Don't let them raise their heads.
Keep them under your thumb.
This is the sort of straightforward practice you have to follow.
If you're steadfast, if you put up a persistent fight until they're all burned away, then there's no other victory that can come anywhere near, no other victory that's anywhere near a match for victory over the cravings and defilements in your own heart.
This is why the Buddha taught us to put the heat on the defilements in all our activities — sitting, standing, walking, and lying down.
If we don't do this, they'll burn us in all our activities…
If you consider things carefully, you'll see that the Buddha's teachings are all exactly right, both in how they tell us to examine the diseases of defilement and in how they tell us to let go, destroy, and extinguish defilement.
All the steps are there, so we needn't go study anywhere else.
Every point in his doctrine and discipline shows us the way, so we needn't wonder how we can go about examining and doing away with these diseases.
This becomes mysterious and hard to know only if you study his teachings without making reference to doing away with your own defilements.
People don't like to talk about their own defilements, so they end up completely ignorant.
They grow old and die without knowing a thing about their own defilements at all.
When we start to practice, when we come to comprehend how the defilements burn our own hearts, that's when we gradually come to know ourselves.
To understand suffering and defilement and learn how to extinguish defilement gives us space to breathe…
When we learn how to put out the fires of defilement, how to destroy them, it means we have tools.
We can be confident in ourselves — no doubts, no straying off into other paths of practice, because we're sure to see that practicing in this way, contemplating inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness in this way at all times, really gets rid of our defilements.
The same holds true with virtue, concentration, and discernment.
They're our tools — and we need a full set.
We need the discernment that comes with Right View and the virtue that comes with self-discipline.
Virtue is very important.
Virtue and discernment are like our right and left hands.
If one of our hands is dirty, it can't wash itself.
You need to use both hands to keep both hands washed and clean.
Thus wherever there's virtue, you have to have discernment.
Wherever there's discernment, you have to have virtue.
Discernment is what enables you to know; virtue is what enables you to let go, to relinquish, to destroy your addictions.
Virtue isn't just a matter of the five or eight precepts, you know.
It has to deal with the finest details.
Whatever your discernment sees as a cause of suffering, you have to stop, you have to let go.
Virtue is something that gets very subtle and precise.
Letting go, giving up, renouncing, abstaining, cutting away, and destroying: All of these things are an affair of virtue.
This is why virtue and discernment have to go together, just as our right and left hands have to help each other.
They help each other wash away defilement.
That's when your mind can become centered, bright, and clear.
These things show their benefits right at the mind.
If we don't have these tools, it's as if we had no hands or feet: We wouldn't be able to get anywhere at all.
We have to use our tools — virtue and discernment — to destroy defilement.
That's when our minds will benefit…
This is why the Buddha taught us to keep training in virtue, concentration, and discernment.
We have to keep fit in training these things.
If we don't keep up the training as we should, our tools for extinguishing suffering and defilement won't be sharp, won't be of much use.
They won't be a match for the defilements.
The defilements have monstrous powers for burning the mind in the twinkling of an eye.
Say that the mind is quiet and neutral: The slightest sensory contact can set things burning in an instant by making us pleased or displeased.
Why?
Sensory contact is our measuring stick for seeing how firm or weak our mindfulness is.
Most of the time it stirs things up.
As soon as there's contact by way of the ear or eye, the defilements are very quick.
When this is the case, how can we keep things under control?
How are we going to gain control over our eyes?
How are be going to gain control over our ears, nose, tongue, body, and mind?
How can we get mindfulness and discernment in charge of these things?
This is a matter of practice, pure and simple… our own affair, something by which we can test ourselves, to see why defilements flare up so quickly when sensory contact takes place.
Say, for instance, that we hear a person criticizing someone else.
We can listen and not get upset.
But say that the thought occurs to us, “She's actually criticizing me.” As soon as we conjure up this “me,” we're immediately angry and displeased.
If we concoct very much of this “me,” we can get very upset.
Just this fact alone should enable us to observe that as soon as our “self” gets involved, we suffer immediately.
This is how it happens.
If no sense of self comes out to get involved, we can remain calm and indifferent.
When they criticize other people, we can stay indifferent; but as soon as we conclude that they're criticizing us, our “self” appears and immediately gets involved — and we immediately burn with defilement.
Why?
You have to pay close attention to this.
As soon as your “self” arises, suffering arises in the very same instant.
The same holds true even if you're just thinking.
The “self” you think up spreads out into all sorts of issues.
The mind gets scattered all over the place with defilement, craving, and attachments.
It has very little mindfulness and discernment watching over it, so it gets dragged every which way by craving and defilement.
And yet we don't realize it.
We think we're just fine.
Is there anyone among us who realizes that this is what's happening?
We're too weighted down, weighted down with our own delusions.
No matter how much the mind is smothered in the defilement of delusion, we don't realize it, for it keeps us deaf and blind…
There are no physical tools you can use to detect or cure this disease of defilement, because it arises only at sensory contact.
There's no substance to it.
It's like a match in a matchbox.
As long as the match doesn't come into contact with the friction strip on the side of the box, it won't give rise to fire.
But as soon as we strike it against the side of the box, it bursts into flame.
If it goes out right then, all that gets burned is the matchhead.
If it doesn't stop at the matchhead, it'll burn the matchstick.
If it doesn't stop with the matchstick, and meets up with anything flammable, it can grow into an enormous fire.
When defilement arises in the mind, it starts from the slightest contact.
If we can be quick to put it out right there, it's like striking a match that flares up — chae — for an instant and then dies down right in the matchhead.
The defilement disbands right there.
But if we don't put it out the instant it arises, and let it start concocting issues, it's like pouring fuel into a fire.
We have to observe the diseases of defilement in our own minds to see what their symptoms are, why they're so quick to flare up.
They can't stand to be disturbed.
The minute you disturb them, they flare up into flame.
When this is the case, what can we do to prepare ourselves beforehand?
How can we stock up on mindfulness before sensory contact strikes?
The way to stock up is to practice meditation, as when we keep the breath in mind.
This is what gets our mindfulness prepared so that we can keep ahead of defilement, so that we can keep it from arising as long as we have our theme of meditation as an inner shelter for the mind.
The mind's outer shelter is the body, which is composed of physical elements, but its inner shelter is the theme of meditation we use to train its mindfulness to be focused and aware.
Whatever theme we use, that's the inner shelter for the mind that keeps it from wandering around, concocting thoughts and imaginings.
This is why we need a theme of meditation.
Don't let the mind chase after its preoccupations the way ordinary people who don't meditate do.
Once we have a meditation theme to catch this monkey of a mind so that it becomes less and less willful, day by day, it will gradually calm down, calm down until it can stand firm for long or short periods, depending on how much we train and observe ourselves.
Now, as for how we do breath meditation: The texts say to breathe in long and out long — heavy or light — and then to breathe in short and out short, again heavy or light.
Those are the first steps of the training.
After that we don't have to focus on the length of the in-breath or out-breath.
Instead, we simply gather our awareness at any one point of the breath and keep this up until the mind settles down and is still.
When the mind is still, you then focus on the stillness of the mind at the same time you're aware of the breath.
At this point you don't focus directly on the breath.
You focus on the mind that is still and at normalcy.
You focus continuously on the normalcy of the mind at the same time that you're aware of the breath coming in and out, without actually focusing on the breath.
You simply stay with the mind, but you watch it with each in-and-out breath.
Usually when you are doing physical work and your mind is at normalcy, you can know what you're doing, so why can't you be aware of the breath?
After all, it's part of the body.
Some of you are new at this, which is why you don't know how you can focus on the mind at normalcy with each in-and-out breath without focusing directly on the breath itself.
What we're doing here is practicing how to be aware of the body and mind, pure and simple, in and of themselves…
Start out by focusing on the breath for about,, or minutes.
Breathe in long and out long, or in short and out short.
At the same time, notice the stages in how the mind feels, how it begins to settle down when you have mindfulness watching over the breath.
You've got to make a point of observing this, because usually you breathe out of habit, with your attention far away.
You don't focus on the breath; you're not really aware of it.
This leads you to think that it's hard to stay focused here, but actually it's quite simple.
After all, the breath comes in and out on its own, by its very nature.
There's nothing at all difficult about breathing.
It's not like other themes of meditation.
For instance, if you're going to practice recollection of the Buddha, or buddho, you have to keep on repeating buddho, buddho, buddho.
Actually, if you want, you can repeat buddho in the mind with each in-and-out breath, but only in the very beginning stages.
You repeat buddho to keep the mind from concocting thoughts about other things.
Simply by keeping up this repetition you can weaken the mind's tendency to stray, for the mind can take on only one object at a time.
This is something you have to observe.
The repetition is to prevent the mind from thinking up thoughts and clambering after them.
After you've kept up the repetition — you don't have to count the number of times — the mind will settle down to be aware of the breath with each in-and-out breath.
It will begin to be still, neutral, at normalcy.
This is when you focus on the mind instead of the breath.
Let go of the breath and focus on the mind — but still be aware of the breath on the side.
You don't have to make note of how long or short the breath is.
Make note of the mind staying at normalcy with each in-and-out breath.
Remember this carefully so that you can put it into practice.
The posture: For focusing on the breath, sitting is a better posture than standing, walking, or lying down, because the sensations that come with the other postures often overcome the sensations of the breath.
Walking jolts the body around too much, standing for a long time can make you tired, and if the mind settles down when you're lying down, you tend to fall asleep.
With sitting it's possible to stay in one position and keep the mind firmly settled for a long period of time.
You can observe the subtleties of the breath and the mind naturally and automatically.
Here I'd like to condense the steps of breath meditation to show how all four of the tetrads mentioned in the texts can be practiced at once.
In other words, is it possible to focus on the body, feelings, the mind, and the Dhamma all in one sitting?
This is an important question for all of us.
You could, if you wanted to, precisely follow all the steps in the texts so as to develop strong powers of mental absorption, but it takes a lot of time.
It's not appropriate for those of us who are old and have only a little time left.
What we need is a way of gathering our awareness at the breath long enough to make the mind firm, and then go straight to examining how all formations are inconstant, stressful, and not-self, so that we can see the truth of all formations with each in-and-out breath.
If you can keep at this continually, without break, your mindfulness will become firm and snug enough for you to give rise to the discernment that will enable you to gain clear knowledge and vision.
So what follows is a guide to the steps in practicing a condensed form of breath meditation… Give them a try until you find they give rise to knowledge of your own within you.
You're sure to give rise to knowledge of your very own.
The first thing when you're going to meditate on the breath is to sit straight and keep your mindfulness firm.
Breathe in.
Breathe out.
Make the breath feel open and at ease.
Don't tense your hands, your feet, or any of your joints at all.
You have to keep your body in a posture that feels appropriate to your breathing.
At the beginning, breathe in long and out long, fairly heavily, and gradually the breath will shorten — sometimes heavy and sometimes light.
Then breathe in short and out short for about or minutes and then change.
After a while, when you stay focused mindfully on it, the breath will gradually change.
Watch it change for as many minutes as you like, then be aware of the whole breath, all of its subtle sensations.
This is the third step, the third step of the first tetrad: sabba-kaya-patisamvedi — focusing on how the breath affects the whole body by watching all the breath sensations in all the various parts of the body, and in particular the sensations related to the in-and-out breath.
From there you focus on the sensation of the breath at any one point.
When you do this correctly for a fairly long while, the body — the breath — will gradually grow still.
The mind will grow calm.
In other words, the breath grows still together with the awareness of the breath.
When the subtleties of the breath grow still at the same time that your undistracted awareness settles down, the breath grows even more still.
All the sensations in the body gradually grow more and more still.
This is the fourth step, the stilling of bodily formations.
As soon as this happens, you begin to be aware of the feelings that arise with the stilling of the body and mind.
Whether they are feelings of pleasure or rapture or whatever, they appear clearly enough for you to contemplate them.
The stages through which you have already passed — watching the breath come in and out, long or short — should be enough to make you realize — even though you may not have focused on the idea — that the breath is inconstant.
It's continually changing, from in long and out long to in short and out short, from heavy to light and so forth.
This should enable you to read the breath, to understand that there's nothing constant to it at all.
It changes on its own from one moment to the next.
Once you have realized the inconstancy of the body — in other words, of the breath — you'll be able to see the subtle sensations of pleasure and pain in the realm of feeling.
So now you watch feelings, right there in the same place where you've been focusing on the breath.
Even though they are feelings that arise from the stillness of the body or mind, they're nevertheless inconstant even in that stillness.
They can change.
So these changing sensations in the realm of feeling exhibit inconstancy in and of themselves, just like the breath.
When you see change in the body, change in feelings, and change in the mind, this is called seeing the Dhamma, i.e., seeing inconstancy.
You have to understand this correctly.
Practicing the first tetrad of breath meditation contains all four tetrads of breath meditation.
In other words, you see the inconstancy of the body and then contemplate feeling.
You see the inconstancy of feeling and then contemplate the mind.
The mind, too, is inconstant.
This inconstancy of the mind is the Dhamma.
To see the Dhamma is to see this inconstancy.
When you see the true nature of all inconstant things, then keep track of that inconstancy at all times, with every in-and-out breath.
Keep this up in all your activities to see what happens next.
What happens next is dispassion.
Letting go.
This is something you have to know for yourself.
This is what condensed breath meditation is like.
I call it condensed because it contains all the steps at once.
You don't have to do one step at a time.
Simply focus at one point, the body, and you'll see the inconstancy of the body.
When you see the inconstancy of the body, you'll have to see feeling.
Feeling will have to show its inconstancy.
The mind's sensitivity to feeling, or its thoughts and imaginings, are also inconstant.
All of these things keep on changing.
This is how you know inconstancy…
If you can become skilled at looking and knowing in this way, you'll be struck with the inconstancy, stressfulness, and not-selfness of your “self,” and you'll meet with the genuine Dhamma.
The Dhamma that's constantly changing like a burning fire — burning with inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness — is the Dhamma of the impermanence of all formations.
But further in, in the mind or in the property of consciousness, is something special, beyond the reach of any kind of fire.
There, there's no suffering or stress of any kind at all.
This thing that lies “inside”: You could say that it lies within the mind, but it isn't really in the mind.
It's simply that the contact is there at the mind.
There's no way you can really describe it.
Only the extinguishing of all defilement will lead you to know it for yourself.
This “something special” within exists by its very nature, but defilements have it surrounded on all sides.
All these counterfeit things — the defilements — keep getting in the way and take possession of everything, so that this special nature remains imprisoned inside at all times.
Actually, there's nothing in the dimension of time that can be compared with it.
There's nothing by which you can label it, but it's something that you can pierce through to see — i.e., by piercing through defilement, craving, and attachment into the state of mind that is pure, bright, and silent.
This is the only thing that's important.
But it doesn't have only one level.
There are many levels, from the outer bark to the inner bark and on to the sapwood before you reach the heartwood.
The genuine Dhamma is like the heartwood, but there's a lot to the mind that isn't heartwood: The roots, the branches and leaves of the tree are more than many, but there's only a little heartwood.
The parts that aren't heartwood will gradually decay and disintegrate, but the heartwood doesn't decay.
That's one kind of comparison we can make.
It's like a tree that dies standing.
The leaves fall away, the branches rot away, the bark and sapwood rot away, leaving nothing but the true heartwood.
That's one comparison we can make with this thing we call deathless, this property that has no birth, no death, no changing.
We can also call it nibbana or the Unconditioned.
It's all the same thing.
Now, then.
Isn't this something worth trying to break through to see?…
The production manager would like to thank Venerable Ajahn Puriso, the translator, who kindly not only revised the text for this edition, but also helped with the final proof reading.
This book has come into existence with the help of many devoted people.
Khun Vanee Lamsam, along with her brother Khun Parl Na Pombejra, raised the Fund to support all costs of publication.
Khun Thanu Malakul Na Ayudhaya supplied us a slide of his beautiful painting for the cover.
Khun Panya Vijinthanasarn helped with the cover design and illustrations.
Khun Chutima Thanapura helped with the first proof-reading.
Khun Pansak Panpak-deeddisakul supplied us an invaluable photograph of Luang Por Chah.
Khun Karoon Hansachainand helped with the pasting some parts of the artwork and saw the book through the press.
May the kind meritorious deeds of the above-mentioned people help them experience the supreme bliss, Nibbana.
The talks translated in this book were all taken from old cassette tape recordings of Venerable Ajahn Chah, some in Thai and some in the North-Eastern dialect, most recorded on poor quality equipment under less than optimum conditions.
This presented some difficulty in the work of translation, which was overcome by occasionally omitting very unclear passages and at other times asking for advice from other listeners more familiar with those languages.
Nevertheless there has inevitably been some editing in the process of making this book.
Apart from the difficulties presented by the lack of clarity of the tapes, there is also the necessity of editing when one is taking words from the spoken to the written medium.
For this, the translator takes full responsibility.
Pali words have occasionally been left as they are, in other cases translated.
The criteria here has been readability.
Those Pali words which were considered short enough or familiar enough to the reader already conversant with Buddhist terminology have generally been left untranslated.
This should present no difficulty, as they are generally explained by the Venerable Ajahn in the course of the talk.
Longer words, or words considered to be probably unfamiliar to the average reader, have been translated.
Of these, there are two which are particularly noteworthy.
They are Kamasukhallikanuyogo and Attakilamathanuyogo, which have been translated as Indulgence in Pleasure and Indulgence in Pain respectively.
These two words occur in no less than five of the talks included in this book and although the translations provided here are not those generally used for these word, they are nevertheless in keeping with the Venerable Ajahn's use of them.
Venerable Ajahn Chah always gave his talks in simple, everyday language.
His objective was to clarify the Dhamma, not to confuse his listeners with an overlog of information.
Consequently the talks presented here have been rendered into correspondingly simple English.
The aim has been to present Ajahn Chah's teaching in both the spirit and the letter.
In this third printing of A Taste of Freedom, a number of corrections have been made to clumsily worded passages, of which there are now hopefully less than in the first editions.
For such inadequacies the translator must also take responsibility, and hopes the reader will bear with any literary shortcomings in order to receive the full benefit of the teachings contained herein.
The translator
About this mind… In truth there is nothing really wrong with it.
It is intrinsically pure.
Within itself it's already peaceful.
That the mind is not peaceful these days is because it follows moods.
The real mind doesn't have anything to it, it is simply Nature.
It becomes peaceful or agitated because moods deceive it.
The untrained mind is stupid.
Sense impressions come and trick it into happiness, suffering, gladness and sorrow, but the mind's true nature is none of those things.
That gladness or sadness is not the mind, but only a mood coming to deceive us.
The untrained mind gets lost and follows these things, it forgets itself.
Then we think that it is we who are upset or at ease or whatever.
But really this mind of ours is already unmoving and peaceful… really peaceful!
Just like a leaf which is still as long as no wind blows.
If a wind comes up the leaf flutters.
The fluttering is due to the wind — the “fluttering” is due to those sense impressions; the mind follows them.
If it doesn't follow them, it doesn't “flutter.” If we know fully the true nature of sense impressions we will be unmoved.
Our practice is simply to see the Original Mind.
So we must train the mind to know those sense impressions, and not get lost in them.
To make it peaceful.
Just this is the aim of all this difficult practice we put ourselves through.
To calm the mind means to find the right balance.
If you try to force your mind too much it goes too far; if you don't try enough it doesn't get there, it misses the point of balance.
Normally the mind isn't still, it's moving all the time, it lacks strength.
Making the mind strong and making the body strong are not the same.
To make the body strong we have to exercise it, to push it, in order to make it strong, but to make the mind strong means to make it peaceful, not to go thinking of this and that.
For most of us the mind has never been peaceful, it has never had the energy of samadhi, so we establish it within a boundary.
We sit in meditation, staying with the One who knows.
If we force our breath to be too long or too short we're not balanced, the mind won't become peaceful.
It's like when we first start to use a pedal sewing machine.
At first we just practice pedaling the machine to get our co-ordination right, before we actually sew anything.
Following the breath is similar.
We don't get concerned over how long or short, weak or strong it is, we just note it.
We simply let it be, following the natural breathing.
When it's balanced, we take the breathing as our meditation object.
When we breathe in, the beginning of the breath is at the nose tip, the middle of the breath at the chest and the end of the breath at the abdomen.
This is the path of the breath.
When we breathe out, the beginning of the breath is at the abdomen, the middle at the chest and the end at the nose tip.
We simply take note of this path of the breath at the nose tip, the chest and the abdomen, then at the abdomen, the chest and the tip of the nose.
We take note of these three points in order to make the mind firm, to limit mental activity so that mindfulness and self-awareness can easily arise.
When we are adept at noting these three points we can let them go and note the in and out breathing, concentrating solely at the nose-tip or the upper lip where the air passes on its in and out passage.
We don't have to follow the breath, just establish mindfulness in front of us at the nose-tip, and note the breath at this one point — entering, leaving, entering, leaving.
There's no need to think of anything special, just concentrate on this simple task for now, having continuous presence of mind.
There's nothing more to do, just breathing in and out.
Soon the mind becomes peaceful, the breath refined.
The mind and body become light.
This is the right state for the work of meditation.
When sitting in meditation the mind becomes refined, but whatever state it's in we should try to be aware of it, to know it.
Mental activity is there together with tranquillity.
There is vitakka.
Vitakka is the action of bringing the mind to the theme of contemplation.
If there is not much mindfulness, there will be not much vitakka.
Then vicara, the contemplation around that theme, follows.
Various “weak” mental impressions may arise from time to time but our self-awareness is the important thing — whatever may be happening we know it continuously.
As we go deeper we are constantly aware of the state of our meditation, knowing whether or not the mind is firmly established.
Thus, both concentration and awareness are present.
To have a peaceful mind does not mean that there's nothing happening, mental impressions do arise.
For instance, when we talk about the first level of absorption, we say it has five factors.
Along with vitakka and vicara, piti arises with the theme of contemplation and then sukha.
These four things all lie together in the mind established in tranquillity.
They are as one state.
The fifth factor is ekaggata or one-pointedness.
You may wonder how there can be one-pointedness when there are all these other factors as well.
This is because they all become unified on that foundation of tranquillity.
Together they are called a state of samadhi.
They are not everyday states of mind, they are factors of absorption.
There are these five characteristics, but they do not disturb the basic tranquillity.
There is vitakka, but it does not disturb the mind; vicara, rapture and happiness arise but do not disturb the mind.
The mind is therefore as one with these factors.
The first level of absorption is like this.
We don't have to call it First Jhana, Second Jhana, third Jhana and so on, let's just call it “a peaceful mind.” As the mind becomes progressively calmer it will dispense with vitakka and vicara, leaving only rapture and happiness.
Why does the mind discard vitakka and vicara?
This is because, as the mind becomes more refined, the activity of vitakka and vicara is too coarse to remain.
At this stage, as the mind leaves off vitakka and vicara, feelings of great rapture can arise, tears may gush out.
But as the samadhi deepens rapture, too, is discarded, leaving only happiness and one-pointedness, until finally even happiness goes and the mind reaches its greatest refinement.
There are only equanimity and one-pointedness, all else has been left behind.
The mind stands unmoving.
Once the mind is peaceful this can happen.
You don't have to think a lot about it, it just happens by itself.
This is called the energy of a peaceful mind.
In this state the mind is not drowsy; the five hindrances, sense desire, aversion, restlessness, dullness and doubt, have all fled.
But if mental energy is still not strong and mindfulness weak, there will occasionally arise intruding mental impressions.
The mind is peaceful but it's as if there's a “cloudiness” within the calm.
It's not a normal sort of drowsiness though, some impressions will manifest — maybe we'll hear a sound or see a dog or something.
It's not really clear but it's not a dream either.
This is because these five factors have become unbalanced and weak.
The mind tends to play tricks within these levels of tranquillity.
“Imagery” will sometimes arise when the mind is in this state, through any of the senses, and the meditator may not be able to tell exactly what is happening.
“Am I sleeping?
No.
Is it a dream?
No, it's not a dream…” These impressions arise from a middling sort of tranquillity; but if the mind is truly calm and clear we don't doubt the various mental impressions or imagery which arise.
Questions like, “Did I drift off then?
Was I sleeping?
did I get lost?…” don't arise, for they are characteristics of a mind which is still doubting.
“Am I asleep or awake?”… Here, it's fuzzy!
This is the mind getting lost in its moods.
It's like the moon going behind a cloud.
You can still see the moon but the clouds covering it render it hazy.
It's not like the moon which has emerged from behind the clouds — clear, sharp and bright.
When the mind is peaceful and established firmly in mindfulness and self-awareness, there will be no doubt concerning the various phenomena which we encounter.
The mind will truly be beyond the hindrances.
We will clearly know as it is everything which arises in the mind.
We do not doubt it because the mind is clear and bright.
The mind which reaches samadhi is like this.
However some people find it hard to enter samadhi because it doesn't suit their tendencies.
There is samadhi, but it's not strong or firm.
But one can attain peace through the use of wisdom, through contemplating and seeing the truth of things, solving problems that way.
This is using wisdom rather than the power of samadhi.
To attain calm in practice it's not necessary to sit in meditation, for instance.
Just ask yourself, “Ehh, what is that?…” and solve your problem right there!
A person with wisdom is like this.
Perhaps he can't really attain high levels of samadhi, although he develops some, enough to cultivate wisdom.
It's like the difference between farming rice and farming corn.
One can depend on rice more than corn for one's livelihood.
Our practice can be like this, we depend more on wisdom to solve problems.
When we see the truth, peace arises.
The two ways are not the same.
Some people have insight and are strong in wisdom but do not have much samadhi.
When they sit in meditation they aren't very peaceful.
They tend to think a lot, contemplating this and that, until eventually they contemplate happiness and suffering and see the truth of them.
Some incline more towards this than samadhi.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or lying, enlightenment of the Dhamma can take place.
Through seeing, through relinquishing, they attain peace.
They attain peace through knowing the truth without doubt, because they have seen it for themselves.
Other people have only little wisdom but their samadhi is very strong.
They can enter very deep samadhi quickly, but not having much wisdom, they cannot catch their defilements, they don't know them.
They can't solve their problems.
But regardless of whichever approach we use, we must do away with wrong thinking, leaving only Right View.
We must get rid of confusion, leaving only peace.
Either way we end up at the same place.
There are these two sides to practice, but these two things, calm and insight, go together.
We can't do away with either of them.
They must go together.
That which “looks over” the various factors which arise in meditation is 'sati', mindfulness.
This sati is a condition which, through practice, can help other factors to arise.
Sati is life.
Whenever we don't have sati, when we are heedless, it's as if we are dead.
If we have no sati, then our speech and actions have no meaning.
This sati is simply recollection.
It's a cause for the arising of self-awareness and wisdom.
Whatever virtues we have cultivated are imperfect if lacking in sati.
Sati is that which watches over us while standing, walking, sitting and lying.
Even when we are no longer in samadhi, sati should be present throughout.
Whatever we do we take care.
A sense of shame will arise.
We will feel ashamed about the things we do which aren't correct.
As shame increases, our collectedness will increase as well.
When collectedness increases, heedlessness will disappear.
Even if we don't sit in meditation, these factors will be present in the mind.
And this arises because of cultivating sati.
Develop sati!
This is the dhamma which looks over the work we are doing or have done in the past.
It has usefulness.
We should know ourselves at all times.
If we know ourselves like this, right will distinguish itself from wrong, the path will become clear, and cause for all shame will dissolve.
Wisdom will arise.
We can bring the practice all together as morality, concentration and wisdom.
To be collected, to be controlled, this is morality.
The firm establishing of the mind within that control is concentration.
Complete, overall knowledge within the activity in which we are engaged is wisdom.
The practice in brief is just morality, concentration and wisdom, or in other words, the path.
There is no other way.
Today I would like to ask you all.
“Are you sure yet, are you certain in your meditation practice?” I ask because these days there are many people teaching meditation, both monks and laypeople, and I'm afraid you may be subject to wavering and doubt.
If we understand clearly, we will be able to make the mind peaceful and firm.
You should understand “the Eightfold Path” as morality, concentration and wisdom.
The path comes together as simply this.
Our practice is to make this path arise within us.
When sitting meditation we are told to close the eyes, not to look at anything else, because now we are going to look directly at the mind.
When we close our eyes, our attention comes inwards.
We establish our attention on the breath, center our feelings there, put our mindfulness there.
When the factors of the path are in harmony we will be able to see the breath, the feelings, the mind and its mood for what they are.
Here we will see the “focus point,” where samadhi and the other factors of the Path converge in harmony.
When we are sitting in meditation, following the breath, think to yourself that now you are sitting alone.
There is no-one sitting around you, there is nothing at all.
Develop this feeling that you are sitting alone until the mind lets go of all externals, concentrating solely on the breath.
If you are thinking, “This person is sitting over here, that person is sitting over there,” there is no peace, the mind doesn't come inwards.
Just cast all that aside until you feel there is no-one sitting around you, until there is nothing at all, until you have no wavering or interest in your surroundings.
Let the breath go naturally, don't force it to be short or long or whatever, just sit and watch it going in and out.
When the mind lets go of all external impressions, the sounds of cars and such will not disturb you.
Nothing, whether sights or sounds, will disturb you, because the mind doesn't receive them.
Your attention will come together on the breath.
If the mind is confused and won't concentrate on the breath, take a full, deep breath, as deep as you can, and then let it all out till there is none left.
Do this three times and then re-establish your attention.
The mind will become calm.
It's natural for it to be calm for a while, and then restlessness and confusion may arise again.
When this happens, concentrate, breathe deeply again, and them re-establish your attention on the breath.
Just keep going like this.
When this has happened many times you will become adept at it, the mind will let go of all external manifestations.
External impressions will not reach the mind.
Sati will be firmly established.
As the mind becomes more refined, so does the breath.
Feelings will become finer and finer, the body and mind will be light.
Our attention is solely on the inner, we see the in-breaths and out-breaths clearly, we see all impressions clearly.
We will see the coming together of Morality, Concentration and Wisdom.
This is called the Path in harmony.
When there is this harmony our mind will be free of confusion, it will come together as one.
This is called samadhi.
After watching the breath for a long time, it may become very refined; the awareness of the breath will gradually cease, leaving only bare awareness.
The breath may become so refined it disappears!
Perhaps we are “just sitting,” as if there is no breathing at all.
Actually there is breathing, but it seems as if there's none.
This is because the mind has reached its most refined state, there is just bare awareness.
It has gone beyond the breath.
The knowledge that the breath has disappeared becomes established.
What will we take as our object of meditation now?
We take just this knowledge as our object, that is, the awareness that there's no breath.
Unexpected things may happen at this time; some people experience them, some don't.
If they do arise, we should be firm and have strong mindfulness.
Some people see that the breath has disappeared and get a fright, they're afraid they might die.
Here we should know the situation just as it is.
We simply notice that there's no breath and take that as our object of awareness.
This, we can say, is the firmest, surest type of samadhi.
There is only one firm, unmoving state of mind.
Perhaps the body will become so light it's as if there is no body at all.
We feel like we're sitting in empty space, all seems empty.
Although this may seem very unusual, you should understand that there's nothing to worry about.
Firmly establish your mind like this.
When the mind is firmly unified, having no sense impressions to disturb it, one can remain in that state for any length of time.
There will be no painful feelings to disturb us.
When samadhi has reached this level, we can leave it when we choose, but if we come out of this samadhi we do so comfortably, not because we've become bored with it or tired.
We come out because we've had enough for now, we feel at ease, we have no problems at all.
If we can develop this type of samadhi, then if we sit, say, thirty minutes or an hour, the mind will be cool and calm for many days.
When the mind is cool and calm like this, it is clean.
Whatever we experience, the mind will take up and investigate.
This is a fruit of samadhi.
Morality has one function, concentration has another function and Wisdom another.
These factors are like a cycle.
We can see them all within the peaceful mind.
When the mind is calm it has collectedness and restraint because of wisdom and the energy of concentration.
As it becomes more collected it becomes more refined, which in turn gives morality the strength to increase in purity.
As our morality becomes purer, this will help in the development of concentration.
When concentration is firmly established it helps in the arising of wisdom.
Morality, concentration and wisdom help each other, they are inter-related like this.
In the end the Path becomes one and functions at all times.
We should look after the strength which arises from the path, because it is the strength which leads to Insight and Wisdom.
Samadhi is capable of bringing much harm or much benefit to the meditator, you can't say it brings only one or the other.
For one who has no wisdom it is harmful, but for one who has wisdom it can bring real benefit, it can lead him to Insight.
That which can be most harmful to the meditator is Absorption Samadhi, the samadhi with deep, sustained calm.
This samadhi brings great peace.
Where there is peace, there is happiness.
When there is happiness, attachment and clinging to that happiness arise.
The meditator doesn't want to contemplate anything else, he just wants to indulge in that pleasant feeling.
When we have been practicing for a long time we may become adept at entering this samadhi very quickly.
As soon as we start to note our meditation object, the mind enters calm, and we don't want to come out to investigate anything.
We just get stuck on that happiness.
This is a danger to one who is practicing meditation.
We must use Upacara Samadhi.
Here, we enter calm and then, when the mind is sufficiently calm, we come out and look at outer activity.
Looking at the outside with a calm mind gives rise to wisdom.
This is hard to understand, because it's almost like ordinary thinking and imagining.
When thinking is there, we may think the mind isn't peaceful, but actually that thinking is taking place within the calm.
There is contemplation but it doesn't disturb the calm.
We may bring thinking up in order to contemplate it.
Here we take up the thinking to investigate it, it's not that we are aimlessly thinking to investigate it, it's not that we are aimlessly thinking or guessing away; it's something that arises from a peaceful mind.
This is called “awareness within calm and calm within awareness.” If it's simply ordinary thinking and imagining, the mind won't be peaceful, it will be disturbed.
But I am not talking about ordinary thinking, this is a feeling that arises from the peaceful mind.
It's called “contemplation.” Wisdom is born right here.
So, there can be right samadhi and wrong samadhi.
Wrong samadhi is where the mind enters calm and there's no awareness at all.
One could sit for two hours or even all day but the mind doesn't know where it's been or what's happened.
It doesn't know anything.
There is calm, but that's all.
It's like a well-sharpened knife which we don't bother to put to any use.
This is a deluded type of calm, because there is not much self-awareness.
The meditator may think he has reached the ultimate already, so he doesn't bother to look for anything else.
Samadhi can be an enemy at this level.
Wisdom cannot arise because there is no awareness of right and wrong.
With right samadhi, no matter what level of calm is reached, there is awareness.
There is full mindfulness and clear comprehension.
This is the samadhi which can give rise to wisdom, one cannot get lost in it.
Practitioners should understand this well.
You can't do without this awareness, it must be present from beginning to end.
This kind of samadhi has no danger.
You may wonder where does the benefit arise, how does the wisdom arise, from samadhi?
When right samadhi has been developed, wisdom has the chance to arise at all times.
When the eye sees form, the ear hears sound, the nose smells odor, the tongue experiences taste, the body experiences touch or the mind experiences mental impressions — in all postures — the mind stays with full knowledge of the true nature of those sense impressions, it doesn't “pick and choose.” In any posture we are fully aware of the birth of happiness and unhappiness.
We let go of both of these things, we don't cling.
This is called Right Practice, which is present in all postures.
These words “all postures” do not refer only to bodily postures, they refer to the mind, which has mindfulness and clear comprehension of the truth at all times.
When samadhi has been rightly developed, wisdom arises like this.
This is called “insight,” knowledge of the truth.
There are two kinds of peace — the coarse and the refined.
The peace which comes from samadhi is the coarse type.
When the mind is peaceful there is happiness.
The mind then takes this happiness to be peace.
But happiness and unhappiness are becoming and birth.
There is no escape from samsara here because we still cling to them.
So happiness is not peace, peace is not happiness.
The other type of peace is that which comes from wisdom.
Here we don't confuse peace with happiness; we know the mind which contemplates and knows happiness and unhappiness as peace.
The peace which arises from wisdom is not happiness, but is that which sees the truth of both happiness and unhappiness.
Clinging to those states does not arise, the mind rises above them.
This is the true goal of all Buddhist practice.
The teaching of Buddhism is about giving up evil and practicing good.
Then, when evil is given up and goodness is established, we must let go of both good and evil.
We have already heard enough about wholesome and unwholesome conditions to understand something about them, so I would like to talk about the Middle Way, that is, the path to escape from both of those things.
All the Dhamma talks and teachings of the Buddha have one aim — to show the way out of suffering to those who have not yet escaped.
The teachings are for the purpose of giving us the right understanding.
If we don't understand rightly, then we can't arrive at peace.
When the various Buddhas became enlightened and gave their first teachings, they all declared these two extremes — indulgence in pleasure and indulgence in pain.
These two ways are the ways of infatuation, they are the ways between which those who indulge in sense pleasures must fluctuate, never arriving at peace.
They are the paths which spin around in samsara.
The Enlightened One observed that all beings are stuck in these two extremes, never seeing the Middle Way of Dhamma, so he pointed them out in order to show the penalty involved in both.
Because we are still stuck, because we are still wanting, we live repeatedly under their way.
The Buddha declared that these two ways are the ways of intoxication, they are not the way of a meditator, nor the ways to peace.
These ways are indulgence in pleasure and indulgence in pain, or, to put it simply, the way of slackness and the way of tension.
If you investigate within, moment by moment, you will see that the tense way is anger, the way of sorrow.
Going this way there is only difficulty and distress.
Indulgence in Pleasure — if you've escaped from this, it means you've escaped from happiness.
These ways, both happiness and unhappiness, are not peaceful states.
The Buddha taught to let go of both of them.
This is right practice.
This is the Middle Way.
These words, “the Middle Way,” do not refer to our body and speech, they refer to the mind.
When a mental impression which we don't like arises, it affects the mind and there is confusion.
When the mind is confused, when it's “shaken up,” this is not the right way.
When a mental impression arises which we like, the mind goes to indulgence in pleasure — that's not the way either.
We people don't want suffering, we want happiness.
But in fact happiness is just a refined form of suffering.
Suffering itself is the coarse form.
You can compare them to a snake.
The head of the snake is unhappiness, the tail of the snake is happiness.
The head of the snake is really dangerous, it has the poisonous fangs.
If you touch it, the snake will bite straight away.
But never mind the head, even if you go and hold onto the tail, it will turn around and bite you just the same, because both the head and the tail belong to the one snake.
In the same way, both happiness and unhappiness, or pleasure and sadness, arise from the same parent — wanting.
So when you're happy the mind isn't peaceful.
It really isn't!
For instance, when we get the things we like, such as wealth, prestige, praise or happiness, we become pleased as a result.
But the mind still harbors some uneasiness because we're afraid of losing it.
That very fear isn't a peaceful state.
Later on we may actually lose that thing and then we really suffer.
Thus, if you aren't aware, even if you're happy, suffering is imminent.
It's just the same as grabbing the snake's tail — if you don't let go it will bite.
So whether it's the snake's tail or its head, that is, wholesome or unwholesome conditions, they're all just characteristics of the Wheel of Existence, of endless change.
The Buddha established morality, concentration and wisdom as the path to peace, the way to enlightenment.
But in truth these things are not the essence of Buddhism.
They are merely the path.
The Buddha called them “Magga,” which means “path.” The essence of Buddhism is peace, and that peace arises from truly knowing the nature of all things.
If we investigate closely, we can see that peace is neither happiness nor unhappiness.
Neither of these is the truth.
The human mind, the mind which the Buddha exhorted us to know and investigate, is something we can only know by its activity.
The true “original mind” has nothing to measure it by, there's nothing you can know it by.
In its natural state it is unshaken, unmoving.
When happiness arises all that happens is that this mind is getting lost in a mental impression, there is movement.
When the mind moves like this, clinging and attachment to those things come into being.
The Buddha has already laid down the path of practice fully, but we have not yet practiced, or if we have, we've practiced only in speech.
Our minds and our speech are not yet in harmony, we just indulge in empty talk.
But the basis of Buddhism is not something that can be talked about or guessed at.
The real basis of Buddhism is full knowledge of the truth of reality.
If one knows this truth then no teaching is necessary.
If one doesn't know, even if he listens to the teaching, he doesn't really hear.
This is why the Buddha said, “The Enlightened One only points the way.” He can't do the practice for you, because the truth is something you cannot put into words or give away.
All the teachings are merely similes and comparisons, means to help the mind see the truth.
If we haven't seen the truth we must suffer.
For example, we commonly say “sankharas” when referring to the body.
Anybody can say it, but in fact we have problems simply because we don't know the truth of these sankharas, and thus cling to them.
Because we don't know the truth of the body, we suffer.
Here is an example.
Suppose one morning you're walking to work and a man yells abuse and insults at you from across the street.
As soon as you hear this abuse your mind changes from its usual state.
You don't feel so good, you feel angry and hurt.
That man walks around abusing you night and day.
When you hear the abuse, you get angry, and even when you return home you're still angry because you feel vindictive, you want to get even.
A few days later another man comes to your house and calls out, “Hey!
That man who abused you the other day, he's mad, he's crazy!
Has been for years!
He abuses everybody like that.
Nobody takes any notice of anything he says.” As soon as you hear this you are suddenly relieved.
That anger and hurt that you've pent up within you all these days melts away completely.
Why?
Because you know the truth of the matter now.
Before, you didn't know, you thought that man was normal, so you were angry at him.
Understanding like that caused you to suffer.
As soon as you find out the truth, everything changes: “Oh, he's mad!
That explains everything!” When you understand this you feel fine, because you know for yourself.
Having known, then you can let go.
If you don't know the truth you cling right there.
When you thought that man who abused you was normal you could have killed him.
But when you find out the truth, that he's mad, you feel much better.
This is knowledge of the truth.
Someone who sees the Dhamma has a similar experience.
When attachment, aversion and delusion disappear, they disappear in the same way.
As long as we don't know these things we think, “What can I do?
I have so much greed and aversion.” This is not clear knowledge.
It's just the same as when we thought the madman was sane.
When we finally see that he was mad all along we're relieved of worry.
No-one could show you this.
Only when the mind sees for itself can it uproot and relinquish attachment.
It's the same with this body which we call sankharas.
Although the Buddha has already explained that it's not substantial or a real being as such, we still don't agree, we stubbornly cling to it.
If the body could talk, it would be telling us all day long, “You're not my owner, you know.” Actually it's telling us all the time, but it's Dhamma language, so we're unable to understand it.
For instance, the sense organs of eye, ear, nose, tongue and body are continually changing, but I've never seen them ask permission from us even once!
Like when we have a headache or a stomachache — the body never asks permission first, it just goes right ahead, following its natural course.
This shows that the body doesn't allow anyone to be its owner, it doesn't have an owner.
The Buddha described it as an empty thing.
We don't understand the Dhamma and so we don't understand these sankharas; we take them to be ourselves, as belonging to us or belonging to others.
This gives rise to clinging.
When clinging arises, “becoming” follows on.
Once becoming arises, then there is birth.
Once there is birth, then old age, sickness, death… the whole mass of suffering arises.
This is the Paticcasamuppada.
We say ignorance gives rise to volitional activities, they give rise to consciousness and so on.
All these things are simply events in mind.
When we come into contact with something we don't like, if we don't have mindfulness, ignorance is there.
Suffering arises straight away.
But the mind passes through these changes so rapidly that we can't keep up with them.
It's the same as when you fall from a tree.
Before you know it — “Thud!” — you've hit the ground.
Actually you've passed many branches and twigs on the way but you couldn't count them, you couldn't remember them as you passed them.
You just fall, and then “Thud!
The Paticcasamuppada is the same as this.
If we divide it up as it is in the scriptures, we say ignorance gives rise to volitional activities, volitional activities give rise to consciousness, consciousness gives rise to mind and matter, mind and matter give rise to the six sense bases, the sense bases give rise to sense contact, contact gives rise to feeling, feeling gives rise to wanting, wanting gives rise to clinging, clinging gives rise to becoming, becoming gives rise to birth, birth gives rise to old age, sickness, death, and all forms of sorrow.
But in truth, when you come into contact with something you don't like, there's immediate suffering!
That feeling of suffering is actually the result of the whole chain of the Paticcasamuppada.
This is why the Buddha exhorted his disciples to investigate and know fully their own minds.
When people are born into the world they are without names - once born, we name them.
This is convention.
We give people names for the sake of convenience, to call each other by.
The scriptures are the same.
We separate everything up with labels to make studying the reality convenient.
In the same way, all things are simply sankharas.
Their original nature is merely that of things born of conditions.
The Buddha said that they are impermanent, unsatisfactory and not-self.
They are unstable.
We don't understand this firmly, our understanding is not straight, and so we have wrong view.
This wrong view is that the sankharas are ourselves, we are the sankharas, or that happiness and unhappiness are ourselves, we are happiness and unhappiness.
Seeing like this is not full, clear knowledge of the true nature of things.
The truth is that we can't force all these things to follow our desires, they follow the way of nature.
A simple comparison is this: suppose you go and sit in the middle of a freeway with the cars and trucks charging down at you.
You can't get angry at the cars, shouting, “Don't drive over here!
Don't drive over here!” It's a freeway, you can't tell them that!
So what can you do?
You get off the road!
The road is the place where cars run, if you don't want the cars to be there, you suffer.
It's the same with sankharas.
We say they disturb us, like when we sit in meditation and hear a sound.
We think, “Oh, that sound's bothering me.” If we understand that the sound bothers us then we suffer accordingly.
If we investigate a little deeper, we will see that it's we who go out and disturb the sound!
The sound is simply sound.
If we understand like this then there's nothing more to it, we leave it be.
We see that the sound is one thing, we are another.
One who understands that the sound comes to disturb him is one who doesn't see himself.
He really doesn't!
Once you see yourself, then you're at ease.
The sound is just sound, why should you go and grab it?
You see that actually it was you who went out and disturbed the sound.
This is real knowledge of the truth.
You see both sides, so you have peace.
If you see only one side, there is suffering.
Once you see both sides, then you follow the Middle Way.
This is the right practice of the mind.
This is what we call “straightening out our understanding.
In the same way, the nature of all sankharas is impermanence and death, but we want to grab them, we carry them about and covet them.
We want them to be true.
We want to find truth within the things that aren't true!
Whenever someone sees like this and clings to the sankharas as being himself, he suffers.
The Buddha wanted us to consider this.
The practice of Dhamma is not dependent on being a monk, a novice, or a layman; it depends on straightening out your understanding.
If our understanding is correct, we arrive at peace.
Whether you are ordained or not it's the same, every person has the chance to practice Dhamma, to contemplate it.
We all contemplate the same thing.
If you attain peace, it's all the same peace; it's the same Path, with the same methods.
Therefore the Buddha didn't discriminate between laymen and monks, he taught all people to practice to know the truth of the sankharas.
When we know this truth, we let them go.
If we know the truth there will be no more becoming or birth.
How is there no more birth?
There is no way for birth to take place because we fully know the truth of sankharas.
If we fully know the truth, then there is peace.
Having or not having, it's all the same.
Gain and loss are one.
The Buddha taught us to know this.
This is peace; peace from happiness, unhappiness, gladness and sorrow.
We must see that there is no reason to be born.
Born in what way?
Born into gladness: When we get something we like we are glad over it.
If there is no clinging to that gladness there is no birth; if there is clinging, this is called “birth.” So if we get something, we aren't born.
If we lose, then we aren't born.
This is the birthless and the deathless.
Birth and death are both founded in clinging to and cherishing the sankharas.
So the Buddha said.
“There is no more becoming for me, finished is the holy life, this is my last birth.” There!
He knew the birthless and the deathless!
This is what the Buddha constantly exhorted his disciples to know.
This is the right practice.
If you don't reach it, if you don't reach the Middle Way, then you won't transcend suffering.
It's of great importance that we practice the Dhamma.
If we don't practice, then all our knowledge is only superficial knowledge, just the outer shell of it.
It's as if we have some sort of fruit but we haven't eaten it yet.
Even though we have that fruit in our hand we get no benefit from it.
Only through the actual eating of the fruit we really know its taste.
The Buddha didn't praise those who merely believe others, he praised the person who knows within himself.
Just as with that fruit, if we have tasted it already, we don't have to ask anyone else if it's sweet or sour.
Our problems are over.
Why are they over?
Because we see according to the truth.
One who has realized the Dhamma is like one who has realized the sweetness or sourness of the fruit.
All doubts are ended right here.
When we talk about Dhamma, although we may say a lot, it can usually be brought down to four things.
They are simply to know suffering, to know the cause of suffering, to know the end of suffering and to know the path of practice leading to the end of suffering.
This is all there is.
All that we have experienced on the path of practice so far comes down to these four things.
When we know these things, our problems are over.
Where are these four things born?
They are born just within the body and the mind, nowhere else.
So why is the Dhamma of the Buddha so broad and expansive?
This is so in order to explain these things in a more refined way, to help us to see them.
When Siddhattha Gotama was born into the world, before he saw the Dhamma, he was an ordinary person just like us.
When he knew what he had to know, that is the truth of suffering, the cause, the end and the way leading to the end of suffering, he realized the Dhamma and became a perfectly Enlightened Buddha.
When we realize the Dhamma, wherever we sit we know Dhamma, wherever we are we hear the Buddha's teaching.
When we understand Dhamma, the Buddha is within our mind, the Dhamma is within our mind, and the practice leading to wisdom is within our own mind.
Having the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha within our mind means that whether our actions are good or bad, we know clearly for ourselves their true nature.
It was thus that the Buddha discarded worldly opinions, he discarded praise and criticism.
When people praised or criticized him he just accepted it for what it was.
These two things are simply worldly conditions so he wasn't shaken by them.
Why not?
Because he knew suffering.
He knew that if he believed in that praise or criticism they would cause him to suffer.
When suffering arises it agitates us, we feel ill at ease.
What is the cause of that suffering?
It's because we don't know the Truth, this is the cause.
When the cause is present, then suffering arises.
Once arisen we don't know how to stop it.
The more we try to stop it, the more it comes on.
We say, “Don't criticize me,” or “Don't blame me”.
Trying to stop it like this, suffering really comes on, it won't stop.
So the Buddha taught that the way leading to the end of suffering is to make the Dhamma arise as a reality within our own minds.
We become one who witnesses the Dhamma for himself.
If someone says we are good we don't get lost in it; they say we are no good we don't get lost in it; they say we are no good and we don't forget ourselves.
This way we can be free.
“Good” and “evil” are just worldly dhammas, they are just states of mind.
If we follow them our mind becomes the world, we just grope in the darkness and don't know the way out.
If it's like this then we have not yet mastered ourselves.
We try to defeat others, but in doing so we only defeat ourselves; but if we have mastery over ourselves then we have mastery over all — over all mental formations, sights, sounds, smells, tastes and bodily feelings.
Now I'm talking about externals, they're like that, but the outside is reflected inside also.
Some people only know the outside, they don't know the inside.
Like when we say to “see the body in the body.” Having seen the outer body is not enough, we must know the body within the body.
Then, having investigated the mind, we should know the mind within the mind.
Why should we investigate the body?
What is this “body in the body”?
When we say to know the mind, what is this “mind”?
If we don't know the mind then we don't know the things within the mind.
This is to be someone who doesn't know suffering, doesn't know the cause, doesn't know the end and doesn't know the way.
The things which should help to extinguish suffering don't help, because we get distracted by the things which aggravate it.
It's just as if we have an itch on our head and we scratch our leg!
If it's our head that's itchy then we're obviously not going to get much relief.
In the same way, when suffering arises we don't know how to handle it, we don't know the practice leading to the end of suffering.
For instance, take this body, this body that each of us has brought along to this meeting.
If we just see the form of the body there's no way we can escape suffering.
Why not?
Because we still don't see the inside of the body, we only see the outside.
We only see it as something beautiful, something substantial.
The Buddha said that only this is not enough.
We see the outside with our eyes; a child can see it, animals can see it, it's not difficult.
The outside of the body is easily seen, but having seen it we stick to it, we don't know the truth of it.
Having seen it we grab onto it and it bites us!
So we should investigate the body within the body.
Whatever's in the body, go ahead and look at it.
If we just see the outside it's not clear.
We see hair, nails and so on and they are just pretty things which entice us, so the Buddha taught to see the inside of the body, to see the body within the body.
What is in the body?
Look closely within!
We will see many things inside to surprise us, because even though they are within us, we've never seen them.
Wherever we walk we carry them with us, sitting in a car we carry them with us, but we still don't know them at all!
It's as if we visit some relatives at their house and they give us a present.
We take it and put it in our bag and then leave without opening it to see what is inside.
When at last we open it — full of poisonous snakes!
Our body is like this.
If we just see the shell of it we say it's fine and beautiful.
We forget ourselves.
We forget impermanence, unsatisfactoriness and not-self.
If we look within this body it's really repulsive.
If we look according to reality, without trying to sugar things over, we'll see that it's really pitiful and wearisome.
Dispassion will arise.
This feeling of “disinterest” is not that we feel aversion for the world or anything; it's simply our mind clearing up, our mind letting go.
We see things are naturally established just as they are.
However we want them to be, they just go their own way regardless.
Whether we laugh or cry, they simply are the way they are.
Things which are unstable are unstable; things which are not beautiful are not beautiful.
So the Buddha said that when we experience sights, sounds, tastes, smells, bodily feelings or mental states, we should release them.
When the ear hears sounds, let them go.
When the nose smells an odor, let it go… just leave it at the nose!
When the bodily feelings arise, let go of the like or dislike that follow, let them go back to their birth-place.
The same for mental states.
All these things, just let them go their way.
This is knowing.
Whether it's happiness or unhappiness, it's all the same.
This is called meditation.
Meditation means to make the mind peaceful in order to let wisdom arise.
This requires that we practice with body and mind in order to see and know the sense impressions of form, sound, taste, smell, touch and mental formations.
To put it shortly, it's just a matter of happiness and unhappiness.
Happiness is pleasant feeling in the mind, unhappiness is just unpleasant feeling.
The Buddha taught to separate this happiness and unhappiness from the mind.
The mind is that which knows.
Feeling is the characteristic of happiness or unhappiness, like or dislike.
When the mind indulges in these things we say that it clings to or takes that happiness and unhappiness to be worthy of holding.
That clinging is an action of mind, that happiness or unhappiness is feeling.
When we say the Buddha told us to separate the mind from the feeling, he didn't literally mean to throw them to different places.
He meant that the mind must know happiness and know unhappiness.
When sitting in samadhi, for example, and peace fills the mind, then happiness comes but it doesn't reach us, unhappiness comes but doesn't reach us.
This is to separate the feeling from the mind.
We can compare it to oil and water in a bottle.
They don't combine.
Even if you try to mix them, the oil remains oil and the water remains water.
Why is this so?
Because they are of different density.
The natural state of the mind is neither happiness nor unhappiness.
When feeling enters the mind then happiness or unhappiness is born.
If we have mindfulness then we know pleasant feeling as pleasant feeling.
The mind which knows will not pick it up.
Happiness is there but it's “outside” the mind, not buried within the mind.
The mind simply knows it clearly.
If we separate unhappiness from the mind, does that mean there is no suffering, that we don't experience it?
Yes, we experience it, but we know mind as mind, feeling as feeling.
We don't cling to that feeling or carry it around.
The Buddha separated these things through knowledge.
Did he have suffering?
He knew the state of suffering but he didn't cling to it, so we say that he cut suffering off.
And there was happiness too, but he knew that happiness, if it's not known, is like a poison.
He didn't hold it to be himself.
Happiness was there through knowledge, but it didn't exist in his mind.
Thus we say that he separated happiness and unhappiness from his mind.
When we say that the Buddha and the Enlightened Ones killed defilements, it's not that they really killed them.
If they had killed all defilements then we probably wouldn't have any!
They didn't kill defilements; when they knew them for what they are, they let them go.
Someone who's stupid will grab them, but the Enlightened Ones knew the defilements in their own minds as a poison, so they swept them out.
They swept out the things which caused them to suffer, they didn't kill them.
One who doesn't know this will see some things, such as happiness, as good, and then grab them, but the Buddha just knew them and simply brushed them away.
But when feeling arises for us we indulge in it, that is, the mind carries that happiness and unhappiness around.
In fact they are two different things.
The activities of mind, pleasant feeling, unpleasant feeling and so on, are mental impressions, they are the world.
If the mind knows this it can equally do work involving happiness or unhappiness.
Why?
Because it knows the truth of these things.
Someone who doesn't know them sees them as equal.
If you cling to happiness it will be the birth-place of unhappiness later on, because happiness is unstable, it changes all the time.
When happiness disappears, unhappiness arises.
The Buddha knew that because both happiness and unhappiness are unsatisfactory, they have the same value.
When happiness arose he let it go.
He had right practice, seeing that both these things have equal values and drawbacks.
They come under the Law of Dhamma, that is, they are unstable and unsatisfactory.
Once born, they die.
When he saw this, right view arose, the right way of practice became clear.
No matter what sort of feeling or thinking arose in his mind, he knew it as simply the continuous play of happiness and unhappiness.
He didn't cling to them.
When the Buddha was newly enlightened he gave a sermon about indulgence in Pleasure and Indulgence in Pain.
“Monks!
Indulgence in Pleasure is the loose way, Indulgence in Pain is the tense way.” These were the two things that disturbed his practice until the day he was enlightened, because at first he didn't let go of them.
When he knew them, he let them go, and so was able to give his first sermon.
So we say that a meditator should not walk the way of happiness or unhappiness, rather he should know them.
Knowing the truth of suffering, he will know the cause of suffering, the end of suffering and the way leading to the end of suffering.
And the way out of suffering is meditation itself.
To put it simply, we must be mindful.
Mindfulness is knowing, or presence of mind.
Right now what are we thinking, what are we doing?
What do we have with us right now?
We observe like this, we are aware of how we are living.
When we practice like this wisdom can arise.
We consider and investigate at all times, in all postures.
When a mental impression arises that we like to know it as such, we don't hold it to be anything substantial.
It's just happiness.
When unhappiness arises we know that it's Indulgence in Pain, it's not the path of a meditator.
This is what we call separating the mind from the feeling.
If we are clever we don't attach, we leave things be.
We become the 'one who knows'.
The mind and feeling are just like oil and water; they are in the same bottle but they don't mix.
Even if we are sick or in pain, we still know the feeling as feeling, the mind as mind.
We know the painful or comfortable states but we don't identify with them.
We stay only with peace: the peace beyond both comfort and pain.
You should understand it like this, because if there is no permanent self then there is no refuge.
You must live like this, that is, without happiness and without unhappiness.
You stay only with the knowing, you don't carry things around.
As long as we are still unenlightened all this may sound strange but it doesn't matter, we just set our goal in this direction.
The mind is the mind.
It meets happiness and unhappiness and we see them as merely that, there's nothing more to it.
They are divided, not mixed.
If they are all mixed up then we don't know them.
It's like living in a house; the house and its occupant are related, but separate.
If there is danger in our house we are distressed because we must protect it, but if the house catches fire we get out of it.
If painful feeling arises we get out of it, just like that house.
When it's full of fire and we know it, we come running out of it.
They are separate things; the house is one thing, the occupant is the other.
We say that we separate mind and feeling in this way but in fact they are by nature already separate.
Our realization is simply to know this natural separateness according to reality.
When we say they are not separated it's because we're clinging to them through ignorance of the truth.
So the Buddha told us to meditate.
This practice of meditation is very important.
Merely to know with the intellect is not enough.
The knowledge which arises from practice with a peaceful mind and the knowledge which comes from study are really far apart.
The knowledge which comes from study is not real knowledge of our mind.
The mind tries to hold onto and keep this knowledge.
Why do we try to keep it?
Just lose it!
And then when it's lost we cry!
If we really know, then there's letting go, leaving things be.
We know how things are and don't forget ourselves.
If it happens that we are sick we don't get lost in that.
Some people think, “This year I was sick the whole time, I couldn't meditate at all.” These are the words of a really foolish person.
Someone who's sick and dying should really be diligent in his practice.
One may say he doesn't trust his body, and so he feels that he can't meditate.
If we think like this then things are difficult.
The Buddha didn't teach like that.
He said that right here is the place to meditate.
When we're sick or almost dying that's when we can really know and see reality.
Other people say they don't have the chance to meditate because they're too busy.
Sometimes school teachers come to see me.
They say they have many responsibilities so there's no time to meditate.
I ask them, “When you're teaching do you have time to breathe?” They answer, “Yes.” “So how can you have time to breathe if the work is so hectic and confusing?
Here you are far from Dhamma.
Actually this practice is just about the mind and its feelings.
It's not something that you have to run after or struggle for.
Breathing continues while working.
Nature takes care of the natural processes — all we have to do is try to be aware.
Just to keep trying, going inwards to see clearly.
Meditation is like this.
If we have that presence of mind then whatever work we do will be the very tool which enables us to know right and wrong continually.
There's plenty of time to meditate, we just don't fully understand the practice, that's all.
While sleeping we breathe, eating we breathe, don't we?
Why don't we have time to meditate?
Wherever we are we breathe.
If we think like this then our life has as much value as our breath, wherever we are we have time.
All kinds of thinking are mental conditions, not conditions of body, so we need simply have presence of mind, then we will know right and wrong at all times.
Standing, walking, sitting and lying, there's plenty of time.
We just don't know how to use it properly.
Please consider this.
We cannot run away from feeling, we must know it.
Feeling is just feeling, happiness is just happiness, unhappiness is just unhappiness.
They are simply that.
So why should we cling to them?
If the mind is clever, simply to hear this is enough to enable us to separate feeling from the mind.
If we investigate like this continuously the mind will find release, but it's not escaping through ignorance.
The mind lets go, but it knows.
It doesn't let go through stupidity, not because it doesn't want things to be the way they are.
It lets go because it knows according to the truth.
This is seeing nature, the reality that's all around us.
When we know this we are someone who's skilled with the mind, we are skilled with mental impressions.
When we are skilled with mental impressions we are skilled with the world.
This is to be a “Knower of the World.” The Buddha was someone who clearly knew the world with all its difficulty.
He knew the troublesome, and that which was not troublesome was right there.
This world is so confusing, how is it that the Buddha was able to know it?
Here we should understand that the Dhamma taught by the Buddha is not beyond our ability.
In all postures we should have presence of mind and self-awareness — and when it's time to sit meditation we do that.
We sit in meditation to establish peacefulness and cultivate mental energy.
We don't do it in order to play around at anything special.
Insight meditation is sitting in samadhi itself.
At some places they say, “Now we are going to sit in samadhi, after that we'll do insight meditation.” Don't divide them like this!
Tranquillity is the base which gives rise to wisdom; wisdom is the fruit of tranquillity.
To say that now we are going to do calm meditation, later we'll do insight — you can't do that!
You can only divide them in speech.
Just like a knife, the blade is on one side, the back of the blade on the other.
You can't divide them.
If you pick up one side you get both sides.
Tranquillity gives rise to wisdom like this.
Morality is the father and mother of Dhamma.
In the beginning we must have morality.
Morality is peace.
This means that there are no wrong doings in body or speech.
When we don't do wrong then we don't get agitated; when we don't become agitated then peace and collectedness arise within the mind.
So we say that morality, concentration and wisdom are the path on which all the Noble Ones have walked to enlightenment.
They are all one.
Morality is concentration, concentration is morality.
Concentration is wisdom, wisdom is concentration.
It's like a mango.
When it's a flower we call it a flower.
When it becomes a fruit we call it a mango.
When it ripens we call it a ripe mango.
It's all one mango but it continually changes.
The big mango grows from the small mango, the small mango becomes a big one.
You can call them different fruits or all one.
Morality, concentration and wisdom are related like this.
In the end it's all the path that leads to enlightenment.
The mango, from the moment it first appears as a flower, simply grows to ripeness.
This is enough, we should see it like this.
Whatever others call it, it doesn't matter.
Once it's born it grows to old age, and then where?
We should contemplate this.
Some people don't want to be old.
When they get old they become regretful.
These people shouldn't eat ripe mangoes!
Why do we want the mangoes to be ripe?
If they're not ripe in time, we ripen them artificially, don't we?
But when we become old we are filled with regret.
Some people cry, they're afraid to get old or die.
If it's like this then they shouldn't eat ripe mangoes, better eat just the flowers!
If we can see this then we can see the Dhamma.
Everything clears up, we are at peace.
Just determine to practice like that.
So today the Chief Privy Councillor and his party have come together to hear the Dhamma.
You should take what I've said and contemplate it.
If anything is not right, please excuse me.
But for you to know whether it's right or wrong depends on your practicing and seeing for yourselves.
Whatever's wrong, throw it out.
If it's right then take it and use it.
But actually we practice in order to let go both right and wrong.
In the end we just throw everything out.
If it's right, throw it out; wrong, throw it out!
Usually if it's right we cling to rightness, if it's wrong we hold it to be wrong, and then arguments follow.
But he Dhamma is the place where there's nothing — nothing at all.
Some of us start to practice, and even after a year or two, still don't know what's what.
We are still unsure of the practice.
When we're still unsure, we don't see that everything around us is purely Dhamma, and so we turn to teachings from the Ajahns.
But actually, when we know our own mind, when there is sati to look closely at the mind, there is wisdom.
All times and all places become occasions for us to hear the Dhamma.
We can learn Dhamma from nature, from trees for example.
A tree is born due to causes and it grows following the course of nature.
Right here the tree is teaching us Dhamma, but we don't understand this.
In due course, it grows until it buds, flowers and fruit appear.
All we see is the appearance of the flowers and fruit; we're unable to bring this within and contemplate it.
Thus we don't know that the tree is teaching us Dhamma.
The fruit appears and we merely eat it without investigating: sweet, sour or salty, it's the nature of the fruit.
And this Dhamma, the teaching of the fruit.
Following on, the leaves grow old.
They wither, die and then fall from the tree.
All we see is that the leaves have fallen down.
We step on them, we sweep them up, that's all.
We don't investigate thoroughly, so we don't know that nature is teaching us.
Later on the new leaves sprout, and we merely see that, without taking it further.
We don't bring these things into our minds to contemplate.
If we can bring all this inwards and investigate it, we will see that the birth of a tree and our own birth are no different.
This body of ours is born and exists dependent on conditions, on the elements of earth, water, wind and fire.
It has its food, it grows and grows.
Every part of the body changes and flows according to its nature.
It's no different from the tree; hair, nails, teeth and skin — all change.
If we know the things of nature, then we will know ourselves.
People are born.
In the end they die.
Having died they are born again.
Nails, teeth and skin are constantly dying and re-growing.
If we understand the practice then we can see that a tree is no different from ourselves.
If we understand the teaching of the Ajahns, then we realize that the outside and the inside are comparable.
Things which have consciousness and those without consciousness do not differ.
They are the same.
And if we understand this sameness, then when we see the nature of a tree, for example, we will know that it's no different from our own five khandhas — body, feeling, memory, thinking and consciousness.
If we have this understanding then we understand Dhamma.
If we understand Dhamma we understand the five khandhas, how they constantly shift and change, never stopping.
So whether standing, walking, sitting or lying we should have sati to watch over and look after the mind.
When we see external things it's like seeing internals.
When we see internals it's the same as seeing externals.
If we understand this then we can hear the teaching of the Buddha.
If we understand this, then we can say that Buddha-nature, the 'One who knows', has been established.
It knows the external.
It knows the internal.
It understands all things which arise.
Understanding like this, then sitting at the foot of a tree we hear the Buddha's teaching.
Standing, walking, sitting or lying, we hear the Buddha's teaching.
Seeing, hearing, smelling, tasting, touching and thinking, we hear the Buddha's teaching.
The Buddha is just this 'One who knows' within this very mind.
It knows the Dhamma, it investigates the Dhamma.
It's not that the Buddha-nature, the 'one who knows', arises.
The mind becomes illumined.
If we establish the Buddha within our mind then we see everything, we contemplate everything, as no different from ourselves.
We see various animals, trees, mountains and vines as no different from ourselves.
We see poor people and rich people — they're no different!
They all have the same characteristics.
One who understands like this is content wherever he is.
He listens to the Buddha's teaching at all times.
If we don't understand this, then even if we spend all our time listening to teachings from the various Ajahns, we still won't understand their meaning.
The Buddha said that enlightenment of the Dhamma is just knowing Nature, the reality which is all around us, the Nature which is right here!
If we don't understand this Nature we experience disappointment and joy, we get lost in moods, giving rise to sorrow and regret.
Getting lost in mental objects is getting lost in Nature.
When we get lost in Nature then we don't know Dhamma.
The Enlightened One merely pointed out this Nature.
Having arisen, all things change and die.
Things we make, such as plates, bowls and dishes, all have the same characteristic.
A bowl is molded into being due to a cause, man's impulse to create, and as we use it, it gets old, breaks up and disappears.
Trees, mountains and vines are the same, right up to animals and people.
When Añña Kondañña, the first disciple, heard the Buddha's teaching for the first time, the realization he had was nothing very complicated.
He simply saw that whatever thing is born, that thing must change and grow old as a natural condition and eventually it must die.
Añña Kondañña had never thought of this before, or if he had it wasn't thoroughly clear, so he hadn't yet let go, he still clung to the khandhas.
As he sat mindfully listening to the Buddha's discourse, Buddha-nature arose in him.
He received a sort of Dhamma “transmission,” which was the knowledge that all conditioned things are impermanent.
Any thing which is born must have aging and death as a natural result.
This feeling was different from anything he'd ever known before.
He truly realized his mind, and so “Buddha” arose within him.
At that time the Buddha declared that Añña Kondañña had received the Eye of Dhamma.
What is it that this Eye of Dhamma sees?
This Eye sees that whatever is born has aging and death as a natural result.
“Whatever is born” means everything!
Whether material or immaterial, it all comes under this “whatever is born.” It refers to all of Nature.
Like this body for instance — it's born and then proceeds to extinction.
When it's small it “dies” from smallness to youth.
After a while it “dies” from youth and becomes middle-aged.
Then it goes on to “die” from middle-age and reach old-age, finally reaching the end.
Trees, mountains and vines all have this characteristic.
So the vision or understanding of the 'One who knows' clearly entered the mind of Añña Kondañña as he sat there.
This knowledge of “whatever is born” became deeply embedded in his mind, enabling him to uproot attachment to the body.
This attachment was sakkayaditthi.
This means that he didn't take the body to be a self or a being, or in terms of “he” or “me.” He didn't cling to it.
He saw it clearly, thus uprooting sakkayaditthi.
And the vicikiccha was destroyed.
Having uprooted attachment to the body he didn't doubt his realization.
Silabbata paramasa was also uprooted.
His practice became firm and straight.
Even if his body was in pain or fever he didn't grasp it, he didn't doubt.
He didn't doubt, because he had uprooted clinging.
This grasping of the body is called silabbata paramasa.
When one uproots the view of the body being the self, grasping and doubt are finished with.
If just this view of the body as the self arises within the mind then grasping and doubt begin right there.
So as the Buddha expounded the Dhamma, Añña Kondañña opened the Eye of Dhamma.
This Eye is just the “One who knows clearly.” It sees things differently.
It sees this very nature.
Seeing Nature clearly, clinging is uprooted and the 'One who knows' is born.
Previously he knew but he still had clinging.
You could say that he knew the Dhamma but he still hadn't seen it, or he had seen the Dhamma but still wasn't one with it.
At this time the Buddha said, “Kondañña knows.” What did he know?
He just knew Nature!
Usually we get lost in Nature, as with this body of ours.
Earth, water, fire and wind come together to make this body.
It's an aspect of Nature, a material object we can see with the eye.
It exists depending on food, growing and changing until finally it reaches extinction.
Coming inwards, that which watches over the body is consciousness — just this 'One who knows', this single awareness.
If it receives through the ear it's called hearing; through the nose it's called smelling; through the tongue, tasting; through the body, touching; and through the mind, thinking.
This consciousness is just one but when it functions at different places we call it different things.
Through the eye we call it one thing, through the ear we call it another.
But whether it functions at the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body or mind it's just one awareness.
Following the scriptures we call it the six consciousness, but in reality there is only one consciousness arising at these six different bases.
There are six “doors” but a single awareness, which is this very mind.
This mind is capable of knowing the truth of Nature.
If the mind still has obstructions, then we say it knows through ignorance.
It knows wrongly and it sees wrongly.
Knowing wrongly and seeing wrongly, or knowing and seeing rightly, it's just a single awareness.
We say wrong view and right view but it's just one thing.
Right and wrong both arise from this one place.
When there is wrong knowledge we say that Ignorance conceals the truth.
When there is wrong knowledge then there is wrong view, wrong intention, wrong action, wrong livelihood — everything is wrong!
And on the other hand the path of right practice is born in this same place.
When there is right then the wrong disappears.
The Buddha practiced enduring many hardships and torturing himself with fasting and so on, but he investigated deeply into his mind until finally he uprooted ignorance.
All the Buddhas were enlightened in mind, because the body knows nothing.
You can let it eat or not, it doesn't matter, it can die at any time.
The Buddhas all practiced with the mind.
They were enlightened in mind.
The Buddha, having contemplated his mind, gave up the two extremes of practice — indulgence in pleasure and indulgence in pain — and in his first discourse expounded the Middle Way between these two.
But we hear his teaching and it grates against our desires.
We're infatuated with pleasure and comfort, infatuated with happiness, thinking we are good, we are fine — this is indulgence in pleasure.
It's not the right path.
Dissatisfaction, displeasure, dislike and anger — this is indulgence in pain.
These are the extreme ways which one on the path of practice should avoid.
These “ways” are simply the happiness and unhappiness which arise.
The “one on the path” is this very mind, the 'One who knows'.
If a good mood arises we cling to it as good, this is indulgence in pleasure.
If an unpleasant mood arises we cling to it through dislike- this is indulgence in pain.
These are the wrong paths, they aren't the ways of a meditator.
They're the ways of the worldly, those who look for fun and happiness and shun unpleasantness and suffering.
The wise know the wrong paths but they relinquish them, they give them up.
They are unmoved by pleasure and displeasure, happiness and unhappiness.
These things arise but those who know don't cling to them, they let them go according to their nature.
This is right view.
When one knows this fully there is liberation.
Happiness and unhappiness have no meaning for an Enlightened One.
The Buddha said that the Enlightened Ones were far from defilements.
This doesn't mean that they ran away from defilements, they didn't run away anywhere.
Defilements were there.
He compared it to a lotus leaf in a pond of water.
The leaf and the water exist together, they are in contact, but the leaf doesn't become damp.
The water is like defilements and the lotus leaf is the Enlightened Mind.
The mind of one who practices is the same; it doesn't run away anywhere, it stays right there.
Good, evil, happiness, and unhappiness, right and wrong arise, and he knows them all.
The meditator simply knows them, they don't enter his mind.
That is, he has no clinging.
He is simply the experiencer.
To say he simply experiences is our common language.
In the language of Dhamma we say he lets his mind follow the Middle Way.
These activities of happiness, unhappiness and so on are constantly arising because they are characteristics of the world.
The Buddha was enlightened in the world, he contemplated the world.
If he hadn't contemplated the world, if he hadn't seen the world, he couldn't have risen above it.
The Buddha's Enlightenment was simply enlightenment of this very world.
The world was still there: gain and loss, praise and criticism, fame and disrepute, happiness and unhappiness were still there.
If there weren't these things there would be nothing to become enlightened to!
What he knew was just the world, that which surrounds the hearts of people.
If people follow these things, seeking praise and fame, gain and happiness, and trying to avoid their opposites, they sink under the weight of the world.
Gain and loss, praise and criticism, fame and disrepute, happiness and unhappiness — this is the world.
The person who is lost in the world has no path of escape, the world overwhelms him.
This world follows the Law of Dhamma so we call it worldly dhamma.
He who lives within the worldly dhamma is called a worldly being.
He lives surrounded by confusion.
Therefore the Buddha taught us to develop the path.
We can divide it up into morality, concentration and wisdom — develop them to completion!
This is the path of practice which destroys the world.
Where is this world?
It is just in the minds of beings infatuated with it!
The action of clinging to praise, gain, fame, happiness and unhappiness is called “world.” when it is there in the mind, then the world arises, the worldly being is born.
The world is born because of desire.
Desire is the birthplace of all worlds.
To put an end to desire is to put an end to the world.
Our practice of morality, concentration and wisdom is otherwise called the Eightfold Path.
This Eightfold Path and the eight worldly dhammas are a pair.
How is it that they are a pair?
If we speak according to the scriptures, we say that gain and loss, praise and criticism, fame and disrepute, happiness and unhappiness are the eight worldly dhammas.
Right view, Right Intention, Right Speech, Right Action, Right Livelihood, Right Effort, Right Mindfulness and Right Concentration, this is the Eightfold Path.
These two eightfold ways exist in the same place.
The eight worldly dhammas are right here in this very mind, with the 'One who knows' but this 'One who knows' has obstructions, so it knows wrongly and thus becomes the world.
It's just this one 'One who knows', no other!
The Buddha-nature has not yet arisen in this mind, it has not yet extracted itself from the world.
The mind like this is the world.
When we practice the path, when we train our body and speech, it's all done in that very same mind.
It's the same place so they see each other; the path sees the world.
If we practice with this mind of ours we encounter this clinging to praise, fame, pleasure and happiness, we see the attachment to the world.
The Buddha said, “You should know the world.
It dazzles like a king's royal carriage.
Fools are entranced, but the wise are not deceived.” It's not that he wanted us to go all over the world looking at everything, studying everything about it.
He simply wanted us to watch this mind which is attached to it.
When the Buddha told us to look at the world he didn't want us to get stuck in it, he wanted us to investigate it, because the world is born just in this mind.
sitting in the shade of a tree you can look at the world.
When there is desire the world comes into being right there.
Wanting is the birth place of the world.
To extinguish wanting is to extinguish the world.
When we sit in meditation we want the mind to become peaceful, but it's not peaceful.
Why is this?
We don't want to think but we think.
It's like a person who goes to sit on an ant's nest: the ants just keep on biting him.
When the mind is the world then even sitting still with our eyes closed, all we see is the world.
Pleasure, sorrow, anxiety, confusion — it all arises.
Why is this?
It's because we still haven't realized Dhamma.
If the mind is like this the meditator can't endure the worldly dhammas, he doesn't investigate.
It's just the same as if he were sitting on an ants' nest.
The ants are going to bite because he's right on their home!
So what should he do?
He should look for some poison or use fire to drive them out.
But most Dhamma practitioners don't see it like that.
If they feel content they just follow contentment, feeling discontent they just follow that.
Following the worldly dhammas the mind becomes the world.
Sometimes we may think, “Oh, I can't do it, it's beyond me…”, so we don't even try!
This is because the mind is full of defilements, the worldly dhammas prevent the path from arising.
We can't endure in the development of morality, concentration and wisdom.
It's just like that man sitting on the ants' nest.
He can't do anything, the ants are biting and crawling all over him, he's immersed in confusion and agitation.
He can't rid his sitting place of the danger, so he just sits there, suffering.
So it is with our practice.
The worldly dhammas exist in the minds of worldly beings.
When those beings wish to find peace the worldly dhammas arise right there.
When the mind is ignorant there is only darkness.
When knowledge arises the mind is illumined, because ignorance and knowledge are born in the same place.
When ignorance has arisen, knowledge can't enter, because the mind has accepted ignorance.
When knowledge has arisen, ignorance cannot stay.
So the Buddha exhorted his disciples to practice with the mind, because the world is born in this mind, the eight worldly dhammas are there.
The Eightfold Path, that is, investigation through calm and insight meditation, our diligent effort and the wisdom we develop, all these things loosen the grip of the world.
Attachment, aversion and delusion become lighter, and being lighter, we know them as such.
If we experience fame, material gain, praise, happiness or suffering we're aware of it.
We must know these things before we can transcend the world, because the world is within us.
When we're free of these things it's just like leaving a house.
When we enter a house what sort of feeling do we have?
We feel that we've come through the door and entered the house.
When we leave the house we feel that we've left it, we come into the bright sunlight, it's not dark like it was inside.
The action of the mind entering the worldly dhammas is like entering the house.
The mind which has destroyed the worldly dhammas is like one who has left the house.
So the Dhamma practitioner must become one who witnesses the Dhamma for himself.
He knows for himself whether the worldly dhammas have left or not, whether or not the path has been developed.
When the path has been well developed it purges the worldly dhammas.
It becomes stronger and stronger.
Right view grows as wrong view decreases, until finally the path destroys defilements — either that or defilements will destroy the path!
Right view and wrong view, there are only these two ways.
Wrong view has its tricks as well, you know, it has its wisdom — but it's wisdom that's misguided.
The meditator who begins to develop the path experiences a separation.
Eventually it's as if he is two people — one in the world and the other on the path.
They divide, they pull apart.
Whenever he's investigating there's this separation, and it continues on and on until the mind reaches insight, vipassana.
Or maybe it's vipassanu!
Having tried to establish wholesome results in our practice, seeing them, we attach to them.
This type of clinging comes from our wanting to get something from the practice.
This is vipassanu, the wisdom of defilements.
Some people develop goodness and cling to it, they develop purity and cling to that, or they develop knowledge and cling to that.
The action of clinging to that goodness or knowledge is vipassanu, infiltrating our practice.
So when you develop vipassana, be careful!
Watch out for vipassanu, because they're so close that sometimes you can't tell them apart.
But with right view we can see them both clearly.
If it's vipassanu there will be suffering arising at times as a result.
If it's really vipassana there's no suffering.
There is peace.
Both happiness and unhappiness are silenced.
This you can see for yourself.
This practice requires endurance.
Some people, when they come to practice, don't want to be bothered by anything, they don't want friction.
But there's friction the same as before.
We must try to find an end to friction through friction itself!
So, if there's friction in your practice, then it's right.
If there's no friction it's not right, you just eat and sleep as much as you want.
When you want to go anywhere or say anything you just follow your desires.
The teaching of the Buddha grates.
The supermundane goes against the worldly.
Right view opposes wrong view, purity opposes impurity.
The teaching grates against our desires.
There's a story in the scriptures about the Buddha, before he was enlightened.
At that time, having received a plate of rice, he floated that plate on a stream of water, determining in his mind, “If I am to be enlightened, may this plate float against the current of the water.” The plate floated upstream!
That plate was the Buddha's right view, or the Buddha-nature that he became awakened to.
It didn't follow the desires of ordinary beings.
It floated against the flow of his mind, it was contrary in every way.
These days, in the same way, the Buddha's teaching is contrary to our hearts.
People want to indulge in greed and hatred but the Buddha won't let them.
They want to be deluded but the Buddha destroys delusion.
So the mind of the Buddha is contrary to that of worldly beings.
The world calls the body beautiful, he says it's not beautiful.
They say the body belongs to us, he says not so.
They say it's substantial, he says it's not.
Right view is above the world.
Worldly beings merely follow the flow of the stream.
Continuing on, when the Buddha got up from there, he received eight handfuls of grass from a brahman.
The real meaning of this is that the eight handfuls of grass were the right worldly dhammas — gain and loss, praise and criticism, fame and disrepute, happiness and unhappiness.
The Buddha, having received this grass, determined to sit on it and enter samadhi.
The action of sitting on the grass was itself samadhi, that is, his mind was above the worldly dhammas, subduing the world until it realized the transcendent.
The worldly dhammas became like refuse for him, they lost all meaning.
He sat over them but they didn't obstruct his mind in any way.
The various maras came to try to overcome him, but he just sat there in samadhi, subduing the world, until finally he became enlightened to the Dhamma and completely defeated Mara.
That is, he defeated the world.
So the practice of developing the path is that which kills defilements.
People these days have little faith.
Having practiced a year or two they want to get there, and they want to go fast.
They don't consider that the Buddha, our Teacher, had left home a full six years before he became enlightened.
This is why we have “freedom from dependence.” According to the scriptures, a monk must have at least five rains before he is considered able to live on his own.
By this time he has studied and practiced sufficiently, he has adequate knowledge, he has faith, his conduct is good.
Someone who practices for five years, I say he's competent.
But he must really practice, not just “hang out” in the robes for five years.
He must really look after the practice, really do it!
Until you reach five rains you may wonder, “What is this 'freedom from dependence' that the Buddha talked about?” You must really try to practice for five years and then you'll know for yourself the qualities he was referring to.
After that time you should be competent, competent in mind, one who is certain.
At the very least, after five rains, one should be at the first stage of enlightenment.
This is not just five rains in body but five rains in mind as well.
That monk has fear of blame, a sense of shame and modesty.
He doesn't dare to do wrong either in front of people or behind their backs, in the light or in the dark.
Why not?
Because he has reached the Buddha, 'The One who knows'.
He takes refuge in the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha.
To depend truly on the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha we must see the Buddha.
What use would it be to take refuge without knowing the Buddha?
If we don't yet know the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha, our taking refuge in them is just an act of body and speech, the mind still hasn't reached them.
Once the mind reaches them we know what the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha are like.
Then we can really take refuge in them, because these things arise in our minds.
Wherever we are we will have the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha with us.
One who is like this doesn't dare to commit evil acts.
This is why we say that one who has reached the first stage of enlightenment will no longer be born in the woeful states.
His mind is certain, he has entered the Stream, there is no doubt for him.
If he doesn't reach full enlightenment today it will certainly be some time in the future.
He may do wrong but not enough to send him to Hell, that is, he doesn't regress to evil bodily and verbal actions, he is incapable of it.
So we say that person has entered the Noble Birth.
He cannot return.
This is something you should see and know for yourselves in this very life.
These days, those of us who still have doubts about the practice hear these things and say, “Oh, how can I do that?” Sometimes we feel happy, sometimes troubled, pleased or displeased.
For what reason?
Because we don't know Dhamma.
What Dhamma?
Just the Dhamma of Nature, the reality around us, the body and the mind.
The Buddha said, “Don't cling to the five khandhas, let them go, give them up!” Why can't we let them go?
Just because we don't see them or know them fully.
We see them as ourselves, we see ourselves in the khandhas.
Happiness and suffering, we see as ourselves, we see ourselves in happiness and suffering.
We can't separate ourselves from them.
When we can't separate them it means we can't see Dhamma, we can't see Nature.
Happiness, unhappiness, pleasure and sadness — none of them is us but we take them to be so.
These things come into contact with us and we see a lump of 'atta', or self.
Wherever there is self there you will find happiness, unhappiness and everything else.
So the Buddha said to destroy this “lump” of self, that is to destroy sakkaya ditthi.
When atta is destroyed, anatta naturally arises.
We take Nature to be us and ourselves to be Nature, so we don't know Nature truly.
If it's good we laugh with it, if it's bad we cry over it.
But Nature is simply sankharas.
As we say in the chanting, Tesam vupasamo sukho — pacifying the sankharas is real happiness.
How do we pacify them?
We simply remove clinging and see them as they really are.
So there is truth in this world.
Trees, mountains and vines all live according to their own truth, they are born and die following their nature.
It's just we people who aren't true!
We see it and make a fuss over it, the Nature is impassive, it just is as it is.
We laugh, we cry, we kill, but Nature remains in truth, it is truth.
No matter how happy or sad we are, this body just follows its own nature.
It's born, it grows up and ages, changing and getting older all the time.
It follows Nature in this way.
Whoever takes the body to be himself and carries it around with him, will suffer.
So Añña Kondañña recognized this “whatever is born” in everything, be it material or immaterial.
His view of the world changed.
He saw the truth.
Having got up from his sitting place he took that truth with him.
The activity of birth and death continued but he simply looked on.
Happiness and unhappiness were arising and passing away but he merely noted them.
His mind was constant.
He no longer fell into the woeful states.
He didn't get over-pleased or unduly upset about these things.
His mind was firmly established in the activity of contemplation.
There!
Añña Kondañña had received the Eye of Dhamma.
He saw Nature, which we call sankharas, according to truth.
Wisdom is that which knows the truth of sankharas.
This is the mind which knows and sees Dhamma, which has surrendered.
Until we have seen the Dhamma we must have patience and restraint.
We must endure, we must renounce!
We must cultivate diligence and endurance.
Why must we cultivate diligence?
Because we're lazy!
Why must we develop endurance?
Because we don't endure!
That the way it is.
But when we are already established in our practice, have finished with laziness, then we don't need to use diligence.
If we already know the truth of all mental states, if we don't get happy or unhappy over them, we don't need to exercise endurance, because the mind is already Dhamma.
The 'One who knows' has seen the Dhamma, he is the Dhamma.
When the mind is Dhamma, it stops.
It has attained peace.
There's no longer a need to do anything special, because the mind is Dhamma already.
The outside is Dhamma, the inside is Dhamma.
The 'One who knows' is Dhamma.
The state is Dhamma and that which knows the state is Dhamma.
It is one.
It is free.
This Nature is not born, it does not age nor sicken.
This Nature does not die.
This Nature is neither happy nor sad, neither big nor small, heavy nor light; neither short nor long, black nor white.
There's nothing you can compare it to.
No convention can reach it.
This is why we say Nirvana has no color.
All colors are merely conventions.
The state which is beyond the world is beyond the reach of worldly conventions.
So the Dhamma is that which is beyond the world.
It is that which each person should see for himself.
It is beyond language.
You can't put it into words, you can only talk about ways and means of realizing it.
The person who has seen it for himself has finished his work.
The things of this world are merely conventions of our own making.
Having established them we get lost in them, and refuse to let go, giving rise to clinging to our personal views and opinions.
This clinging never ends, it is samsara, flowing endlessly on.
It has no completion.
Now, if we know conventional reality then we'll know Liberation.
If we clearly know Liberation, then we'll know convention.
This is to know the Dhamma.
Here there is completion.
Take people, for instance.
In reality people don't have any names, we are simply born naked into the world.
If we have names, they arise only through convention.
I've contemplated this and seen that is you don't know the truth of this convention it can be really harmful.
It's simply something we use for convenience.
Without it we couldn't communicate, there would be nothing to say, no language.
I've seen the Westerners when they sit in meditation together in the West.
When they get up after sitting, men and women together, sometimes they go and touch each other on the head!
When I saw this I thought, “Ehh, if we cling to convention it gives rise to defilements right there.” If we can let go of convention, give up our opinions, we are at peace.
Like the generals and colonels, men of rank and position, who come to see me.
When they come they say, “Oh, please touch my head.” If they ask like this there's nothing wrong with it, they're glad to have their heads touched.
But if you tapped their heads in the middle of the street it'd be a different story!
This is because of clinging.
So I feel that letting go is really the way of peace.
Touching a head is against our customs, but in reality it is nothing.
When they agree to having it touched there's nothing wrong with it, just like touching a cabbage or a potato.
Accepting, giving up, letting go — this is the way of lightness.
Wherever you're clinging there's becoming and birth right there.
There's danger right there.
The Buddha taught about convention and he taught to undo convention in the right way, and so reach Liberation.
This is freedom, not to cling to conventions.
All things in this world have a conventional reality.
Having established them we should not be fooled by them, because getting lost in them really leads to suffering.
This point concerning rules and conventions is of utmost importance.
One who can get beyond them is beyond suffering.
However, they are a characteristic of our world.
Take Mr.
Boonmah, for instance; he used to be just one of the crowd but now he's been appointed the District Commissioner.
It's just a convention but it's a convention we should respect.
It's part of the world of people.
If you think, “Oh, before we were friends, we used to work at the tailor's together,” and then you go and pat him on the head in public, he'll get angry.
It's not right, he'll resent it.
So we should follow the conventions in order to avoid giving rise to resentment.
It's useful to understand convention, living in the world is just about this.
Know the right time and place, know the person.
Why is it wrong to go against conventions?
It's wrong because of people!
You should be clever, knowing both convention and Liberations.
Know the right time for each.
If we know how to use rules and conventions comfortably then we are skilled.
But if we try to behave according to the higher level of reality in the wrong situation, this is wrong.
Where is it wrong?
It's wrong with people's defilements, nothing else!
People all have defilements.
In one situation we behave one way, in another situation we must behave in another way.
We should know the ins and outs because we live within conventions.
Problems occur because people cling to them.
If we suppose something to be, then it is.
It's there because we suppose it to be there.
But if you look closely, in the absolute sense these things don't really exist.
As I have often said, before we were laymen and now we are monks.
We lived within the convention of “layman” and now we live within the convention of “monk.” We are monks by convention, not monks through Liberation.
In the beginning we establish conventions like this, but if a person merely ordains, this doesn't mean he overcomes defilements.
If we take a handful of sand and agree to call it salt, does this make it salt?
It is salt, but only in name, not in reality.
You couldn't use it to cook with.
It's only use is within the realm of that agreement, because there's really no salt there, only sand.
It becomes salt only through our supposing it to be so.
This word “Liberation” is itself just a convention, but it refers to that beyond conventions.
Having achieved freedom, having reached liberation, we still have to use convention in order to refer to it as liberation.
If we didn't have convention we couldn't communicate, so it does have its use.
For example, people have different names but they are all people just the same.
If we didn't have names to differentiate between them, and we wanted to call out to somebody standing in a crowd, saying, “Hey, Person!
Person!”, that would be useless.
You couldn't say who would answer you because they're all “person.” But if you called, “Hey, John!”, then John would come, the others wouldn't answer.
Names fulfill just this need.
Through them we can communicate, they provide the basis for social behavior.
So you should know both convention and liberation.
Conventions have a use, but in reality there really isn't anything there.
Even people are non-existent!
They are merely groups of elements, born of causal conditions, growing dependent on conditions, existing for a while, or control it.
But without conventions we would have nothing to say, we'd have no names, no practice, no work.
Rules and conventions are established to give us a language, to make things convenient, and that's all.
Take money, for example.
In olden times there weren't any coins or notes, they had no value.
People used to barter goods, but those things were difficult to keep, so they created money using coins and notes.
Perhaps in the future we'll have a new king decree that we don't have to use paper money, we should use wax, melting it down and pressing it into lumps.
We say this is money and use it throughout the country.
Let alone wax, it may even happen that they decide to make chicken dung the local currency — all the other things can't be money, just chicken dung!
Then people would fight and kill each other over chicken dung!
This is the way it is.
You could use many examples to illustrate convention.
What we use for money is simply a convention that we have set up, it has its use within that convention.
Having decreed it to be money, it becomes money.
But in reality, what is money?
Nobody can say.
When there is a popular agreement about something, then a convention comes about to fulfill the need.
The world is just this.
This is convention, but to get ordinary people to understand liberation is really difficult.
Our money, our house, our family, our children and relatives are simply conventions that we have invented, but really, seen in the light of Dhamma, they don't belong to us.
Maybe if we hear this we don't feel so good, but in reality is like that.
These things have value only through the established conventions.
If we establish that it doesn't have value, then it doesn't have value.
This is the way it is, we bring convention into the world to fulfill a need.
Even this body is not really ours, we just suppose it to be so.
It's truly just a supposition.
If you try to find a real, substantial self within it, you can't.
There are merely elements which are born, continue for a while and then die.
Everything is like this.
There's no real, true substance to it, but it's proper that we use it.
It's a tool for your use.
If it breaks there is trouble, so even though it must break, you should try your utmost to preserve it.
And so we have the four supports which the Buddha taught again and again to contemplate.
They are the supports on which a monk depends to continue his practice.
As long as you live you must depend on them, but you should understand them.
Don't cling to them, giving rise to craving in your mind.
Convention and liberation are related like this continually.
Even though we use convention, don't place your trust in it as being the truth.
If you cling to it, suffering will arise.
The case of right and wrong is a good example.
Some people see wrong as being right and right as being wrong, but in the end who really knows what is right and what is wrong?
We don't know.
Different people establish different conventions about what's right and what's wrong, but the Buddha took suffering as his guide-line.
If you want to argue about it there's no end to it.
One says, “right,” another says, “wrong.” One says “wrong,” another says “right.” In truth we don't really know right and wrong at all!
But at a useful, practical level, we can say that right is not to harm oneself and not to harm others.
This way fulfills a use.
So, after all, both rules and conventions and liberation are simply dhammas.
One is higher than the other, but they go hand in hand.
There is no way that we can guarantee that anything is definitely like this or like that, so the Buddha said to just leave it be.
Leave it be as uncertain.
However much you like it or dislike it, you should understand it as uncertain.
Regardless of time and place, the whole practice of Dhamma comes to completion at the place where there is nothing.
It's the place of surrender, of emptiness, of laying down the burden.
This is the finish.
It's not like the person who says, “Why is the flag fluttering in the wind?
I say it's because of the wind.” Another person say's it's because of the flag.
The other retorts that it's because of the wind.
There's no end to this!
The same as the old riddle, “Which came first, the chicken or the egg?” There's no way to reach a conclusion, this is just Nature.
All these things we say are merely conventions, we establish them ourselves.
If you know these things with wisdom then you'll know impermanence, unsatisfactoriness and not-self.
This is the outlook which leads to enlightenment.
You know, training and teaching people with varying levels of understanding is really difficult.
Some people have certain ideas, you tell them something and they don't believe you.
You tell them the truth and they say it's not true.
“I'm right, you're wrong…” There's no end to this.
If you don't let go there will be suffering.
I've told you before about the four men who go into the forest.
They hear a chicken crowing, “Kak-ka-dehhh!” One of them wonders, “Is that a rooster or a hen?” Three of them say together, “It's a hen,” but the other doesn't agree, he insists it's a rooster.
“How could a hen crow like that?” he asks.
They retort, “Well, it has a mouth, hasn't it?” They argue till the tears fall, really getting upset over it, but in the end they're all wrong.
Whether you say a hen or a rooster, they're only names.
We establish these conventions, saying a rooster is like this, a hen is like that; a rooster cries like this, a hen cries like that… and this is how we get stuck in the world!
Remember this!
Actually, if you just say that really there's no hen and no rooster then that's the end of it.
In the field of conventional reality one side is right and the other side it wrong, but there will never be complete agreement.
Arguing till the tears fall has no use!
The Buddha taught not to cling.
How do we practice non-clinging?
We practice simply to give up clinging, but this non-clinging is very difficult to understand.
It takes keen wisdom to investigate and penetrate this, to really achieve non-clinging.
When you think about it, whether people are happy or sad, content or discontent, doesn't depend on their having little or having much — it depends on wisdom.
All distress can be transcended only through wisdom, through seeing the truth of things.
So the Buddha exhorted us to investigate, to contemplate.
This “contemplation” means simply to try to solve these problems correctly.
This is our practice.
Like birth, old age, sickness and death — they are the most natural and common of occurrences.
The Buddha taught to contemplate birth, old age, sickness and death, but some people don't understand this.
“What is there to contemplate?” they say.
They're born but they don't know birth, they will die but they don't know death.
A person who investigates these things repeatedly will see.
Having seen he will gradually solve his problems.
Even if he still has clinging, if he has wisdom and sees that old age, sickness and death are the way of Nature, then he will be able to relieve suffering.
We study the Dhamma simply for this — to cure suffering.
There isn't really much as the basis of Buddhism, there's just the birth and death of suffering, and this the Buddha called the truth.
Birth is suffering, old age is suffering, sickness is suffering and death is suffering.
People don't see this suffering as the truth.
If we know truth, then we know suffering.
This pride in personal opinions, these arguments, they have no end.
In order to put our minds at rest, to find peace, we should contemplate our past, the present, and the things which are in store for us.
Like birth, old age, sickness and death.
What can we do to avoid being plagued by these?
Even though we may still have a little worry, if we investigate till we know according to the truth, all suffering will abate, we will no longer cling to it.
We hear some parts of the teachings and can't really understand them.
We think they shouldn't be the way they are, so we don't follow them, but really there is a reason to all the teachings.
Maybe it seems that things shouldn't be that way, but they are.
At first I didn't even believe in sitting meditation.
I couldn't see what use it would be to just sit with your eyes closed.
And walking meditation… walk from this tree, turn around and walk back again… “Why bother?” I thought, “What's the use of all that walking?” I thought like that, but actually walking and sitting meditation are of great use.
Some people's tendencies make them prefer walking meditation, others prefer sitting, but you can't do without either of them.
In the scriptures they talk about the four postures: standing, walking, sitting and lying.
We live with these four postures.
We may prefer one to the other, but we must use all four.
They say to make these four postures even, to make the practice even in all postures.
At first I couldn't figure out what this meant, to make them even.
Maybe it means we sleep for two hours, then stand for two hours, then walk for two hours… maybe that's it?
I tried it — couldn't do it, it was impossible!
That's not what it meant to make the postures even.
“Making the postures even” refers to the mind, to our awareness.
That is, to make the mind give rise to wisdom, to illumine the mind.
This wisdom of ours must be present in all postures; we must know, or understand, constantly.
Standing, walking, sitting or lying, we know all mental states as impermanent, unsatisfactory and not-self.
Making the postures even in this way can be done, it is possible.
Whether like or dislike are present in the mind we don't forget our practice, we are aware.
If we just focus our attention on the mind constantly then we have the gist of the practice.
Whether we experience mental states which the world knows as good or bad we don't forget ourselves, we don't get lost in good or bad.
We just go straight.
Making the postures constant in this way is possible.
If we have constancy in our practice and we are praised, then it's simply praise; if we are blamed, then it's just blame.
We don't get high or low over it, we stay right here.
Why?
Because we see the danger in all those things, we see their results.
We are constantly aware of the danger in both praise and blame.
Normally, if we have a good mood the mind is good also, we see them, as the same thing; if we have a bad mood the mind goes bad as well, we don't like it.
This is the way it is, this is uneven practice.
If we have constancy just to the extent of knowing our moods, and knowing we're clinging to them, this is better already.
That is, we have awareness, we know what's going on, but we still can't let go.
We see ourselves clinging to good and bad, and we know it.
We cling to good and know it's still not right practice, but we still can't let go.
This is % or % of the practice already.
There still isn't release but we know that if we could let go that would be the way to peace.
We keep going like that, seeing the equally harmful consequences of all our likes and dislikes, of praise and blame, continuously.
Whatever there is, the mind is constant in this way.
But for worldly people, if they get blamed or criticized they get really upset.
If they get praised it cheers them up, they say it's good and get really happy over it.
If we know the truth of our various moods, if we know the consequences of clinging to praise and blame, the danger of clinging to anything at all, we will become sensitive to our moods.
We will know that clinging to them really causes suffering.
We see this suffering, and we see our very clinging as the cause of that suffering.
We begin to see the consequences of grabbing and clinging to good and bad, because we've grasped them and seen the result before — no real happiness.
So now we look for the way to let go.
Where is this “way to let go”?
In Buddhism we say “Don't cling to anything.” We never stop hearing about this “don't cling to anything!” This means to hold, but not to cling.
Like this flashlight.
We think, “What is this?” So we pick it up, “Oh, it's a flashlight,” then we put it down again.
We hold things in this way.
If we didn't hold anything at all, what could we do?
We couldn't walk meditation or do anything, so we must hold things first.
It's wanting, yes, that's true, but later on it leads to parami.
Like wanting to come here, for instance… Venerable Jagaro came to Wat Pah Pong.
He had to want to come first.
If he hadn't felt that he wanted to come he wouldn't have come.
For anybody it's the same, they come here because of wanting.
But when wanting arises don't cling to it!
So you come, and then you go back… What is this?
We pick it up, look at it and see, “Oh, it's a flashlight,” then we put it down.
This is called holding but not clinging, we let go.
We know and then we let go.
To put it simply we say just this, “Know, then let go.” Keep looking and letting go.
“This, they say is good; this, they say is not good”… know, and then let go.
Good and bad, we know it all, but we let it go.
We don't foolishly cling to things, but we “hold” them with wisdom.
Practicing in this “posture” can be constant.
You must be constant like this.
Make the mind know in this way, let wisdom arise.
When the mind has wisdom, what else is there to look for?
We should reflect on what we are doing here.
For what reason are we living here, what are we working for?
In the world they work for this or that reward, but the monks teach something a little deeper than that.
Whatever we do, we ask for no return.
We work for no rewards.
Worldly people work because they want this or that, because they want some gain or other, but the Buddha taught to work just in order to work, we don't ask for anything beyond that.
If you do something just to get some return it'll cause suffering.
Try it out for yourself!
You want to make your mind peaceful so you sit down and try to make it peaceful — you'll suffer!
Try it.
Our way is more refined.
We do, and then let go; do, and then let go.
Look at the brahman who makes a sacrifice: he has some desire in mind, so he makes a sacrifice.
Those actions of his won't help him transcend suffering because he's acting on desire.
In the beginning we practice with some desire in mind; we practice on and on, but we don't attain our desire.
So we practice until we reach a point where we're practicing for no return, we're practicing in order to let go.
This is something we must see for ourselves, it's very deep.
Maybe we practice because we want to go to Nirvana — right there, you won't get to Nirvana!
It's natural to want peace, but it's not really correct.
We must practice without wanting anything at all.
If we don't want anything at all, what will we get?
We don't get anything!
Whatever you get is just a cause for suffering, so we practice not getting anything.
Just this is called “making the mind empty.” It's empty but there is still doing.
This emptiness is something people don't usually understand, but those who reach it see the value of knowing it.
It's not the emptiness of not having anything, it's emptiness within the things that are here.
Like this flashlight: we should see this flashlight as empty, because of the flashlight there is emptiness.
It's not the emptiness where we can't see anything, it's not like that.
People who understand like that have got it all wrong.
You must understand emptiness within the things are here.
Those who are still practicing because of some gaining idea are like the brahman who makes a sacrifice just to fulfill some wish.
Like the people who come to see me to be sprinkled with “holy water.” When I ask them, “Why do you want this 'holy water'?” they say, “We want to live happily and comfortably and not get sick.” There!
They'll never transcend suffering that way.
The worldly way is to do things for a reason, to get some return, but in Buddhism we do things without any gaining idea.
The world has to understand things in terms of cause and effect, but the Buddha teaches us to go above cause, beyond effect; to go above birth and beyond death; to go above happiness and beyond suffering.
Think about it… there's nowhere to stay.
We people live in a “home.” To leave home and go where there is no home… we don't know how to do it, because we've always lived with becoming, with clinging.
If we can't cling we don't know what to do.
So most people don't want to go to Nirvana, there's nothing there; nothing at all.
Look at the roof and the floor here.
The upper extreme is the roof, that's an “abiding.” The lower extreme is the floor, and that's another “abiding.” But in the empty space between the floor and the roof there's nowhere stand.
One could stand on the roof, or stand on the floor, but not on that empty space.
Where there is no abiding, that's where there's emptiness, and, to put it bluntly, we say that Nirvana is this emptiness.
People hear this and they back up a bit, they don't want to go.
They're afraid they won't see their children or relatives.
This is why, when we bless the laypeople, we say “May you have long life, beauty, happiness and strength.” This makes them really happy, “Sadhu!” they all say.
They like these things.
If you start talking about emptiness they don't want it, they're attached to abiding.
But have you ever seen a very old person with a beautiful complexion?
Have you ever seen an old person with a lot of strength, or a lot of happiness?… No… But we say, “Long life, beauty, happiness and strength” and they're all really pleased, every single one says “Sadhu!” This is like the brahman who makes oblations to achieve some wish.
In our practice we don't “make oblations,” we don't practice in order to get some return.
We don't want anything.
If we still want something then there is still something there.
Just make the mind peaceful and have done with it!
But if I talk like this you may not be very comfortable, because you want to be “born” again.
So all you lay practitioners should get close to the monks and see their practice.
To be close to the monks means to be close to the Buddha, to be close to his Dhamma.
The Buddha said, “Ananda, practice a lot, develop your practice!
Whoever sees the Dhamma sees me, and whoever sees me sees the Dhamma.” Where is the Buddha?
We may think the Buddha has been and gone, but the Buddha is the Dhamma, the Truth.
Some people like to say, “Oh, if I was born in the time the Buddha I would go to Nirvana.” Here, stupid people talk like this.
The Buddha is still here.
The Buddha is truth.
Regardless of whoever is born or dies, the truth is still here.
The truth never departs from the world, it's there all the time.
Whether a Buddha is born or not, whether someone knows it or not, the truth is still there.
So we should get close to the Buddha, we should come within and find the Dhamma.
When we reach the Dhamma we will reach the Buddha; seeing the Dhamma we will see the Buddha and all doubts will dissolve.
To put it simply, it's like Teacher Choo.
At first he wasn't a teacher, he was just Mr.
Choo.
When he studied and passed the necessary grades he became a teacher, and became known as Teacher Choo.
How did he become a teacher?
Through studying the required things, thus allowing Mr.
Choo to become Teacher Choo.
When Teacher Choo dies, the study to become a teacher still remains, and whoever studies it will become a teacher.
That course of study to become a teacher doesn't disappear anywhere, just like the Truth, the knowing of which enabled the Buddha to become the Buddha.
So the Buddha is still here.
Whoever practices and sees the Dhamma sees the Buddha.
These days people have got it all wrong, they don't know where the Buddha is.
They say, “If I was born in the time of the Buddha I would have become a disciple of his and become enlightened.” That's just foolishness.
You should understand this.
Don't go thinking that at the end of the rains retreat you'll disrobe.
Don't think like that!
In an instant an evil thought can arise in the mind, you could kill somebody.
In the same way, it only takes a split-second for good to flash into the mind, and you're there already.
Don't think that you have to ordain for a long time to be able to meditate.
Where the right practice lies is in the instant we make kamma.
In a flash an evil thought arises… before you know it you've committed some really heavy kamma.
And in the same way, all the disciples of the Buddha practiced for a long time, but the time they attained enlightenment was merely one thought moment.
So don't be heedless, even in minor things.
Try hard, try to get close to the monks, contemplate things and then you'll know about monks.
Well, that's enough, huh?
It must be getting late now, some people are getting sleepy.
The Buddha said not to teach Dhamma to sleepy people.
The practice of Dhamma goes against our habits, the truth goes against our desires, so there is difficulty in the practice.
Some things which we understand as wrong may be right, while the things we take to be right may be wrong.
Why is this?
Because our minds are in darkness, we don't clearly see the Truth.
We don't really know anything and so are fooled by people's lies.
They point out what is right as being wrong and we believe it; that which is wrong, they say is right, and we believe that.
This is because we are not yet our own masters.
Our moods lie to us constantly.
We shouldn't take this mind and its opinions as our guide, because it doesn't know the truth.
Some people don't want to listen to others at all, but this is not the way of a man of wisdom.
A wise man listens to everything.
One who listens to Dhamma must listen just the same, whether he likes it or not, and not blindly believe or disbelieve.
He must stay at the half-way mark, the middle point, and not be heedless.
He just listens and then contemplates, giving rise to the right results accordingly.
A wise man should contemplate and see the cause and effect for himself before he believes what he hears.
Even if the teacher speaks the truth, don't just believe it, because you don't yet know the truth of it for yourself.
It's the same for all of us, including myself.
I've practiced before you, I've seen many lies before.
For instance, “This practice is really difficult, really hard.” Why is the practice difficult?
It's just because we think wrongly, we have wrong view.
Previously I lived together with other monks, but I didn't feel right.
I ran away to the forests and mountains, fleeing the crowd, the monks and novices.
I thought that they weren't like me, they didn't practice as hard as I did.
They were sloppy.
That person was like this, this person was like that.
This was something that really put me in turmoil, it was the cause for my continually running away.
But whether I lived alone or with others I still had no peace.
On my own I wasn't content, in a large group I wasn't content.
I thought this discontent was due to my companions, due to my moods, due to my living place, the food, the weather, due to this and that.
I was constantly searching for something to suit my mind.
As a dhutanga monk, I went traveling, but things still weren't right.
So I contemplated, “What can I do to make things right?
What can I do?” Living with a lot of people I was dissatisfied, with few people I was dissatisfied.
For what reason?
I just couldn't see it.
Why was I dissatisfied?
Because I had wrong view, just that; because I still clung to the wrong Dhamma.
Wherever I went I was discontent, thinking, “Here is no good, there is no good…” on and on like that.
I blamed others.
I blamed the weather, heat and cold, I blamed everything!
Just like a mad dog.
It bites whatever it meets, because it's mad.
When the mind is like this our practice is never settled.
Today we feel good, tomorrow no good.
It's like that all the time.
We don't attain contentment or peace.
The Buddha once saw a jackal, a wild dog, run out of the forest where he was staying.
It stood still for a while, then it ran into the underbrush, and them out again.
Then it ran into a tree hollow, then out again.
Then it went into a cave, only to run out again.
One minute it stood, the next it ran, then it lay down, then it jumped up… That jackal had mange.
When it stood the mange would eat into its skin, so it would run.
Running it was still uncomfortable, so it would lie down.
Then it would jump up again, running into the underbrush, the tree hollow, never staying still.
The Buddha said, “Monks, did you see that jackal this afternoon?
Standing it suffered, running it suffered, sitting it suffered, lying down it suffered.
In the underbrush, a tree hollow or a cave, it suffered.
It blamed standing for its discomfort, it blamed sitting, it blamed running and lying down; it blamed the tree, the underbrush and the cave.
In fact the problem was with none of those things.
That jackal had mange.
The problem was with the mange.
We monks are just the same as that jackal.
Our discontent is due to wrong view.
Because we don't exercise sense restraint we blame our suffering on externals.
Whether we live at Wat Pah Pong, in America or in London we aren't satisfied.
Going to live at Bung Wai or any of the other branch monasteries we're still not satisfied.
Why not?
Because we still have wrong view within us, just that!
Wherever we go we aren't content.
But just as that dog, if the mange is cured, is content wherever it goes, so it is for us.
I reflect on this often, and I teach you this often, because it's very important.
If we know the truth of our various moods we arrive at contentment.
Whether it's hot or cold we are satisfied, with many people or with few people we are satisfied.
Contentment doesn't depend on how many people we are with, it comes only from right view.
If we have right view then wherever we stay we are content.
But most of us have wrong view.
It's just like a maggot!
A maggot's living place is filthy, its food is filthy… but they suit the maggot.
If you take a stick and brush it away from its lump of dung, it'll struggle to crawl back into it.
It's the same when the Ajahn teaches us to see rightly.
We resist, it makes us feel uneasy.
We run back to our “lump of dung” because that's where we feel at home.
We're all like this.
If we don't see the harmful consequences of all our wrong views then we can't leave them, the practice is difficult.
So we should listen.
There's nothing else to the practice.
If we have right view wherever we go we are content.
I have practiced and seen this already.
These days there are many monks, novices and laypeople coming to see me.
If I still didn't know, if I still had wrong view, I'd be dead by now!
The right abiding place for monks, the place of coolness, is just right view itself.
We shouldn't look for anything else.
So even though you may be unhappy it doesn't matter, that unhappiness is uncertain.
Is that unhappiness your “self”?
Is there any substance to it?
Is it real?
I don't see it as being real at all.
Unhappiness is merely a flash of feeling which appears and then is gone.
Happiness is the same.
Is there a consistency to happiness?
Is it truly an entity?
It's simply a feeling that flashes suddenly and is gone.
There!
It's born and then it dies.
Love just flashes up for a moment and then disappears.
Where is the consistency in love, or hate, or resentment?
In truth there is no substantial entity there, they are merely impressions which flare up in the mind and then die.
They deceive us constantly, we find no certainty anywhere.
Just as the Buddha said, when unhappiness arises it stays for a while, then disappears.
When unhappiness disappears, happiness arises and lingers for a while and then dies.
When happiness disappears, unhappiness arises again… on and on like this.
In the end we can say only this — apart from the birth, the life and the death of suffering, there is nothing.
There is just this.
But we who are ignorant run and grab it constantly.
We never see the truth of it, that there's simply this continual change.
If we understand this then we don't need to think very much, but we have much wisdom.
If we don't know it, then we will have more thinking than wisdom — and maybe no wisdom at all!
It's not until we truly see the harmful results of our actions that we can give them up.
Likewise, it's not until we see the real benefits of practice that we can follow it, and begin working to make the mind “good.
If we cut a log of wood and throw it into the river, and that log doesn't sink or rot, or run aground on either of the banks of the river, that log will definitely reach the sea.
Our practice is comparable to this.
If you practice according to the path laid down by the Buddha, following it straightly, you will transcend two things.
What two things?
Just those two extremes that the Buddha said were not the path of a true meditator — indulgence in pleasure and indulgence in pain.
These are the two banks of the river.
One of the banks of that river is hate, the other is love.
Or you can say that one bank is happiness, the other unhappiness.
The “log” is this mind.
As it “flows down the river” it will experience happiness and unhappiness.
If the mind doesn't cling to that happiness or unhappiness it will reach the “ocean” of Nirvana.
You should see that there is nothing other than happiness and unhappiness arising and disappearing.
If you don't “run aground” on these things then you are on the path of a true meditator.
This is the teaching of the Buddha.
Happiness, unhappiness, love and hate are simply established in Nature according to the constant law of nature.
The wise person doesn't follow or encourage them, he doesn't cling to them.
This is the mind which lets go of indulgence in pleasure and indulgence in pain.
It is the right practice.
Just as that log of wood will eventually flow to the sea, so will the mind which doesn't attach to these two extremes inevitably attain peace.
…Do you know where it will end?
Or will you just keep on learning like this?… Or is there an end to it?… That's okay but it's the external study, not the internal study.
For the internal study you have to study these eyes, these ears, this nose, this tongue, this body and this mind.
This is the real study.
The study of books is just the external study, it's really hard to get it finished.
When the eye sees form what sort of things happens?
When ear, nose, and tongue experience sounds, smells and tastes, what takes place?
When the body and mind come into contact with touches and mental states, what reactions take place?
Are there still greed, aversion and delusion there?
Do we get lost in forms, sounds, smells, tastes, textures and moods?
This is the internal study.
It has a point of completion.
If we study but don't practice we won't get any results.
It's like a person who raises cows.
In the morning he takes the cow out to eat grass, in the evening he brings it back to its pen — but he never drinks the cow's milk.
Study is alright, but don't let it be like this.
You should raise the cow and drink it's milk too.
You must study and practice as well to get the best results.
Here, I'll explain it further.
It's like a person who raises chickens, but he doesn't get the eggs.
All he gets is the chicken dung!
This is what I tell people who raise chickens back home!
Watch out you don't become like that!
This means we study the scriptures but we don't know how to let go of defilements, we don't know how to “push” greed, aversion and delusion from our mind.
Study without practice, without this “giving up,” brings no results.
This is why I compare it to someone who raises chickens but doesn't collect the eggs, he just collects the dung.
It's the same thing.
Because of this, the Buddha wanted us to study the scriptures, and then to give up evil actions through body, speech and mind; to develop goodness in our deeds, speech and thoughts.
The real worth of mankind will come to fruition through our deeds, speech and thoughts.
But if we only talk well, without acting accordingly, it's not yet complete.
Or if we do good deeds but the mind is still not good, this is still not complete.
The Buddha taught to develop fine deeds, fine speech and fine thoughts.
This is the treasure of mankind.
The study and the practice must both be good.
The Eightfold Path of the Buddha, the path of practice, has eight factors.
These eight factors are nothing other than this very body: two eyes, two ears, two nostrils, one tongue and one body.
This is the path.
And the mind is the one who follows the path.
Therefore both the study and the practice exist in our body, speech and mind.
Have you ever seen scriptures which teach about anything other than the body, the speech and the mind?
The scriptures only teach about this; nothing else.
Defilements are born here.
If you know them they die right here.
So you should understand that the practice and the study both exist right here.
If we study just this much we can know everything.
It's like our speech: to speak one word of Truth is better than a lifetime of wrong speech.
Do you understand?
One who studies and doesn't practice is like a ladle of soup pot.
It's in the pot every day but it doesn't know the flavor of the soup.
If you don't practice, even if you study till the day you die, you won't know the taste of Freedom!
Venerable Ajahn Chah was born into a typical farming family in Bahn Gor village, in the province of Ubol Rachathani, N.E.
Thailand, in.
He lived the first part of his life as any other youngster in rural Thailand, and, following the custom, took ordination as a novice in the local village Wat for a number of years, where he learned to read and write, in addition to some basic Buddhist teachings.
After a number of years he returned to the lay life to help his parents, but, feeling an attraction to the monastic life, at the age of twenty he again entered a Wat, this time for higher ordination as a bhikkhu, or Buddhist monk.
He spent the first few years of his bhikkhu life studying scriptures and learning Pali, but the death of his father awakened him to the transience of life and instilled in him a desire to find the real essence of the Buddha's teaching.
He began to travel to other monasteries, studying the monastic discipline in detail and spending a very brief but significant time with Venerable Ajahn Mun, the most outstanding meditation Master of the ascetic, forest-dwelling tradition.
Following his time with Venerable Ajahn Mun, he spent a number of years traveling around Thailand, spending his time in forests and charnel grounds, ideal places for developing meditation practice.
At length he came within the vicinity of the village of his birth, and when word got around that he was in the area, he was invited to set up a monastery at the Pa Pong forest, a place at that time reputed to be the habitat of wild animals and ghosts.
Venerable Ajahn Chah's impeccable approach to meditation, or Dhamma practice, and his simple, direct style of teaching, with the emphasis on practical application and a balanced attitude, began to attract a large following of monks and laypeople.
In the first westerner came to stay at Wat Pa Pong, Venerable Sumedho Bhikkhu.
From that time on, the number of foreign people who came to Ajahn Chah began to steadily increase, until in, the first branch monastery for western and other non-Thai nationals, Wat Pa Nanachat, was set up with Venerable Ajahn Sumedho as the abbot.
In Venerable Ajahn Chah was invited to England together with Ajahn Sumedho, the outcome of which was eventually the establishment of the first branch monastery of Wat Pa Pong outside of Thailand.
Since then, further branch monasteries have been established in England, Switzerland, Australia, New Zealand and Italy.
In Venerable Ajahn Chah began to feel more acutely the symptoms of dizziness and memory lapse which he had been feeling for some years.
This led to an operation in, which, however, failed to reverse the onset of the paralysis which eventually rendered him completely bedridden and unable to speak.
However this did not stop the growth of monks and laypeople who came to practice at his monastery, for whom the teachings of Ajahn Chah are a constant guide and inspiration.
Modern man in his search for pleasure and affluence has exploited nature without any moral restraint to such an extent that nature has been rendered almost incapable of sustaining healthy life.
Invaluable gifts of nature, such as air and water, have been polluted with severely disastrous consequences.
Man is now searching for ways and means of overcoming the pollution problem as his health too is alarmingly threatened.
He also feels that it is irresponsible and morally wrong on his part to commit the future generations to a polluted planet.
If man is to act with a sense of responsibility to the natural world, to his fellow human beings and to unborn future generations, he has to find an appropriate environmental ethic today to prevent further aggravation of the present pollution problem.
Hence his search for wisdom and attitudes in a hitherto neglected area of knowledge, namely, religion.
Buddhism strictly limits itself to the delineation of a way of life designed to eradicate human suffering.
The Buddha refused to answer questions which did not directly or indirectly bear on the central problem of human suffering and its ending.
Furthermore, environmental pollution is a problem of the modern age, unheard of and unsuspected during the time of the Buddha.
Therefore it is difficult to find any specific discourse which deals with the topic we are interested in here.
Nevertheless, as Buddhism is a full-fledged philosophy of life reflecting all aspects of experience, it is possible to find enough material in the Pali canon to delineate the Buddhist attitude towards nature.
The word “nature” means everything in the world which is not organized and constructed by man.
The Pali equivalents which come closest to “nature” are loka and yathabhuta.
The former is usually translated as “world” while the latter literally means “things as they really are.” The words dhammata and niyama are used in the Pali canon to mean “natural law or way.
According to Buddhism changeability is one of the perennial principles of nature.
Everything changes in nature and nothing remains static.
This concept is expressed by the Pali term anicca.
Everything formed is in a constant process of change.
The world is therefore defined as that which disintegrates; the world is so called because it is dynamic and kinetic, it is constantly in a process of undergoing change.
In nature there are no static and stable “things”; there are only ever-changing, ever-moving processes.
Rain is a good example to illustrate this point.
Though we use a noun called “rain” which appears to denote a “thing,” rain is nothing but the process of drops of water falling from the skies.
Apart from this process, the activity of raining, there is no rain as such which could be expressed by a seemingly static nominal concept.
The very elements of solidity, liquidity, heat and mobility, recognized as the building material of nature, are all ever-changing phenomena.
Even the most solid looking mountains and the very earth that supports everything on it are not beyond this inexorable law of change.
One sutta explains how the massive king of mountains — Mount Sineru, which is rooted in the great ocean to a depth of, leagues and which rises above sea level to another great height of, leagues and which is very classical symbol of stability and steadfastness — also gets destroyed by heat, without leaving even ashes, with the appearance of multiple suns.
Thus change is the very essence of nature.
The world passes through alternating cycles of evolution and dissolution, each of which endures for a long period of time.
Though change is inherent in nature, Buddhism believes that natural processes are affected by the morals of man.
According to the Aggañña Sutta, which relates the Buddhist legend regarding the evolution of the world, the appearance of greed in the primordial beings — who at that time were self-luminous, subsisting on joy, and traversing in the skies — caused the gradual loss of their radiance and their ability to subsist on joy and to move about in the sky.
The moral degradation had effects on the external environment too.
At that time the entire earth was covered over by a very flavorsome fragrant substance similar to butter.
When beings started partaking of this substance with more and more greed, on the one hand their subtle bodies became coarser and coarser.
On the other hand the flavorsome substance itself started gradually diminishing.
With the solidification of bodies differences of form appeared; some were beautiful while others were homely.
Thereupon conceit manifested itself in those beings, and the beautiful ones started looking down upon the others.
As a result of these moral blemishes the delicious edible earth-substance completely disappeared.
In its place there appeared edible mushrooms and later another kind of edible creeper.
In the beings who subsisted on them successively sex differentiation became manifest and the former method of spontaneous birth was replaced by sexual reproduction.
Self-growing rice appeared on earth and through laziness to collect each meal man grew accustomed to hoarding food.
As a result of this hoarding habit, the growth rate of food could not keep pace with the rate of demand.
Therupon land had to be divided among families.
After private ownership of land became the order of the day, those who were of a more greedy disposition started robbing from others' plots of land.
When they were detected they denied that they had stolen.
Thus through greed vices such as stealing and lying became manifest in society.
To curb the wrong doers and punish them a king was elected by the people and thus the original simple society became much more complex and complicated.
It is said that this moral degeneration of man had adverse effects on nature.
The richness of the earth diminished and self-growing rice disappeared.
Man had to till the land and cultivate rice for food.
This rice grain was enveloped in chaff; it needed cleaning before consumption.
The point I wish to emphasize by citing this evolutionary legend is that Buddhism believes that though change is a factor inherent in nature, man's moral deterioration accelerates the process of change and brings about changes which are adverse to human well being and happiness.
The Cakkavattisihanada Sutta of the Digha Nikaya predicts the future course of events when human morals undergo further degeneration.
Gradually man's health will deteriorate so much that life expectancy will diminish until at last the average human life-span is reduced to ten years and marriageable age to five years.
At that time all delicacies such as ghee, butter, honey, etc.
will have disappeared from the earth; what is considered the poorest coarse food today will become a delicacy of that day.
Thus Buddhism maintains that there is a close link between man's morals and the natural resources available to him.
According to a discourse in the Anguttara Nikaya, when profligate lust, wanton greed, and wrong values grip the heart of man and immorality becomes widespread in society, timely rain does not fall.
When timely rain does not fall crops get adversely affected with various kinds of pests and plant diseases.
Through lack of nourishing food the human mortality rate rises.
Thus several suttas from the Pali canon show that early Buddhism believes there to be a close relationship between human morality and the natural environment.
This idea has been systematized in the theory of the five natural laws in the later commentaries.
According to this theory, in the cosmos there are five natural laws or forces at work, namely utuniyama, bijaniyama, cittaniyama, kammaniyama, and dhammaniyama.
They can be translated as physical laws, biological laws, psychological laws, moral laws, and causal laws, respectively.
While the first four laws operate within their respective spheres, the last-mentioned law of causality operates within each of them as well as among them.
This means that the physical environment of any given area conditions the growth and development of its biological component, i.e.
flora and fauna.
These in turn influence the thought pattern of the people interacting with them.
Modes of thinking determine moral standards.
The opposite process of interaction is also possible.
The morals of man influence not only the psychological makeup of the people but the biological and physical environment of the area as well.
Thus the five laws demonstrate that man and nature are bound together in a reciprocal causal relationship with changes in one necessarily bringing about changes in the other.
The commentary on the Cakkavattisihanada Sutta goes on to explain the pattern of mutual interaction further.
When mankind is demoralized through greed, famine is the natural outcome; when moral degeneration is due to ignorance, epidemic is the inevitable result; when hatred is the demoralizing force, widespread violence is the ultimate outcome.
If and when mankind realizes that large-scale devastation has taken place as a result of his moral degeneration, a change of heart takes place among the few surviving human beings.
With gradual moral regeneration conditions improve through a long period of cause and effect and mankind again starts to enjoy gradually increasing prosperity and longer life.
The world, including nature and mankind, stands or falls with the type of moral force at work.
If immorality grips society, man and nature deteriorate; if morality reigns, the quality of human life and nature improves.
Thus greed, hatred, and delusion produce pollution within and without.
Generosity, compassion, and wisdom produce purity within and without.
This is one reason the Buddha has pronounced that the world is led by the mind, cittena niyati loko.
Thus man and nature, according to the ideas expressed in early Buddhism, are interdependent.
For survival mankind has to depend on nature for his food, clothing, shelter, medicine, and other requisites.
For optimum benefits man has to understand nature so that he can utilize natural resources and live harmoniously with nature.
By understanding the working of nature — for example, the seasonal rainfall pattern, methods of conserving water by irrigation, the soil types, the physical conditions required for growth of various food crops, etc.
— man can learn to get better returns from his agricultural pursuits.
But this learning has to be accompanied by moral restraint if he is to enjoy the benefits of natural resources for a long time.
Man must learn to satisfy his needs and not feed his greeds.
The resources of the world are not unlimited whereas man's greed knows neither limit nor satiation.
Modern man in his unbridled voracious greed for pleasure and acquisition of wealth has exploited nature to the point of near impoverishment.
Ostentatious consumerism is accepted as the order of the day.
One writer says that within forty years Americans alone have consumed natural resources to the quantity of what all mankind has consumed for the last years.
The vast non-replenishable resources of fossil fuels which took millions of years to form have been consumed within a couple of centuries to the point of near exhaustion.
This consumerism has given rise to an energy crisis on the one hand and a pollution problem on the other.
Man's unrestrained exploitation of nature to gratify his insatiate greed reminds one of the traditional parable of the goose that laid the golden eggs.
Buddhism tirelessly advocates the virtues of non-greed, non-hatred and non-delusion in all human pursuits.
Greed breeds sorrow and unhealthy consequences.
Contentment is a much praised virtue in Buddhism.
The man leading a simple life with few wants easily satisfied is upheld and appreciated as an exemplary character.
Miserliness and wastefulness are equally deplored in Buddhism as two degenerate extremes.
Wealth has only instrumental value; it is to be utilized for the satisfaction of man's needs.
Hoarding is a senseless anti-social habit comparable to the attitude of the dog in the manger.
The vast hoarding of wealth in some countries and the methodical destruction of large quantities of agricultural produce to keep the market prices from falling, while half the world is dying of hunger and starvation, is really a sad paradox of the present affluent age.
Buddhism commends frugality as a virtue in its own right.
Once Ananda explained to King Udena the thrifty economic use of robes by the monks in the following order.
When new robes are received the old robes are used as coverlets, the old coverlets as mattress covers, the old mattress covers as rugs, the old rugs as dusters, and the old tattered dusters are kneaded with clay and used to repair cracked floors and walls.
Thus nothing is wasted.
Those who waste are derided as “wood-apple eaters.” A man shakes the branch of a wood-apple tree and all the fruits, ripe as well as unripe, fall.
The man would collect only what he wants and walk away leaving the rest to rot.
Such a wasteful attitude is certainly deplored in Buddhism as not only anti-social but criminal.
The excessive exploitation of nature as is done today would certainly be condemned by Buddhism in the strongest possible terms.
Buddhism advocates a gentle non-aggressive attitude towards nature.
According to the Sigalovada Sutta a householder should accumulate wealth as a bee collects pollen from a flower.
The bee harms neither the fragrance nor the beauty of the flower, but gathers pollen to turn it into sweet honey.
Similarly, man is expected to make legitimate use of nature so that he can rise above nature and realize his innate spiritual potential.
The well-known Five Precepts form the minimum code of ethics that every lay Buddhist is expected to adhere to.
Its first precept involves abstention from injury to life.
It is explained as the casting aside of all forms of weapons, being conscientious about depriving a living being of life.
In its positive sense it means the cultivation of compassion and sympathy for all living things.
The Buddhist layman is expected to abstain from trading in meat too.
The Buddhist monk has to abide by an even stricter code of ethics than the layman.
He has to abstain from practices which would involve even unintentional injury to living creatures.
For instance, the Buddha promulgated the rule against going on a journey during the rainy season because of possible injury to worms and insects that come to the surface in wet weather.
The same concern for non-violence prevents a monk from digging the ground.
Once a monk who was a potter prior to ordination built for himself a clay hut and set it on fire to give it a fine finish.
The Buddha strongly objected to this as so many living creatures would have been burnt in the process.
The hut was broken down on the Buddha's instructions to prevent it from creating a bad precedent for later generations.
The scrupulous nonviolent attitude towards even the smallest living creatures prevents the monks from drinking unstrained water.
It is no doubt a sound hygienic habit, but what is noteworthy is the reason which prompts the practice, namely sympathy for living creatures.
Buddhism also prescribes the practice of metta, “loving-kindness” towards all creatures of all quarters without restriction.
The Karaniyametta Sutta enjoins the cultivation of loving-kindness towards all creatures timid and steady, long and short, big and small, minute and great, visible and invisible, near and far, born and awaiting birth.
All quarters are to be suffused with this loving attitude.
Just as one's own life is precious to oneself, so is the life of the other precious to himself.
Therefore a reverential attitude must be cultivated towards all forms of life.
The Nandivisala Jataka illustrates how kindness should be shown to animals domesticated for human service.
Even a wild animal can be tamed with kind words.
Parileyya was a wild elephant who attended on the Buddha when he spent time in the forest away from the monks.
The infuriated elephant Nalagiri was tamed by the Buddha with no other miraculous power than the power of loving-kindness.
Man and beast can live and let live without fear of one another if only man cultivates sympathy and regards all life with compassion.
The understanding of kamma and rebirth, too, prepares the Buddhist to adopt a sympathetic attitude towards animals.
According to this belief it is possible for human beings to be reborn in subhuman states among animals.
The Kukkuravatika Sutta can be cited as a canonical reference which substantiates this view.
The Jatakas provide ample testimony to this view from commentarial literature.
It is possible that our own close relatives have been reborn as animals.
Therefore it is only right that we should treat animals with kindness and sympathy.
The Buddhist notion of merit also engenders a gentle non-violent attitude towards living creatures.
It is said that if one throws dish-washing water into a pool where there are insects and living creatures, intending that they feed on the tiny particles of food thus washed away, one accumulates merit even by such trivial generosity.
According to the Macchuddana Jataka the Bodhisatta threw his leftover food into a river in order to feed the fish, and by the power of that merit he was saved from an impending disaster.
Thus kindness to animals, be they big or small, is a source of merit — merit needed for human beings to improve their lot in the cycle of rebirths and to approach the final goal of Nibbana.
Buddhism expresses a gentle non-violent attitude towards the vegetable kingdom as well.
It is said that one should not even break the branch of a tree that has given one shelter.
Plants are so helpful to us in providing us with all necessities of life that we are expected not to adopt a callous attitude towards them.
The more strict monastic rules prevent the monks from injuring plant life.
Prior to the rise of Buddhism people regarded natural phenomena such as mountains, forests, groves, and trees with a sense of awe and reverence.
They considered them as the abode of powerful non-human beings who could assist human beings at times of need.
Though Buddhism gave man a far superior Triple Refuge in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, these places continued to enjoy public patronage at a popular level, as the acceptance of terrestrial non-human beings such as devatas and yakkhas did not violate the belief system of Buddhism.
Therefore among the Buddhists there is a reverential attitude towards specially long-standing gigantic trees.
They are vanaspati in Pali, meaning “lords of the forests.” As huge trees such as the ironwood, the sala, and the fig are also recognized as the Bodhi trees of former Buddhas, the deferential attitude towards trees is further strengthened.
It is well known that the ficus religiosa is held as an object of great veneration in the Buddhist world today as the tree under which the Buddha attained Enlightenment.
The construction of parks and pleasure groves for public use is considered a great meritorious deed.
Sakka the lord of gods is said to have reached his status as a result of social services such as the construction of parks, pleasure groves, ponds, wells, and roads.
The open air, natural habitats and forest trees have a special fascination for the Eastern mind as symbols of spiritual freedom.
The home life is regarded as a fetter that keeps man in bondage and misery.
Renunciation is like the open air, nature unhampered by man's activity.
The chief events in the life of the Buddha too took place in the open air.
He was born in a park at the foot of a tree in Kapilavatthu; he attained Enlightenment in the open air at the foot of the Bodhi tree in Bodhgaya; he inaugurated his missionary activity in the open air in the sala grove of the Malas in Pava.
The Buddha's constant advice to his disciples also was to resort to natural habitats such as forest groves and glades.
There, undisturbed by human activity, they could zealously engage themselves in meditation.
Environmental pollution has assumed such vast proportions today that man has been forced to recognize the presence of an ecological crisis.
He can no longer turn a blind eye to the situation as he is already threatened with new pollution-related diseases.
Pollution to this extent was unheard of during the time of the Buddha.
But there is sufficient evidence in the Pali canon to give us insight into the Buddhist attitude towards the pollution problem.
Several Vinaya rules prohibit monks from polluting green grass and water with saliva, urine, and feces.
These were the common agents of pollution known during the Buddha's day and rules were promulgated against causing such pollution.
Cleanliness was highly commended by the Buddhists both in the person and in the environment.
They were much concerned about keeping water clean, be it in the river, pond, or well.
These sources of water were for public use and each individual had to use them with proper public-spirited caution so that others after him could use them with the same degree of cleanliness.
Rules regarding the cleanliness of green grass were prompted by ethical and aesthetic considerations.
Moreover, grass is food for most animals and it is man's duty to refrain from polluting it by his activities.
Noise is today recognized as a serious personal and environmental pollutant troubling everyone to some extent.
It causes deafness, stress, and irritation, breeds resentment, saps energy, and inevitably lowers efficiency.
The Buddha's attitude to noise is very clear from the Pali canon.
He was critical of noise and did not hesitate to voice his stern disapproval whenever occasion arose.
Once he ordered a group of monks to leave the monastery for noisy behavior.
He enjoyed solitude and silence immensely and spoke in praise of silence as it is most appropriate for mental culture.
Noise is described as a thorn to one engaged in the first step of meditation, but thereafter noise ceases to be a disturbance as the meditator passes beyond the possibility of being disturbed by sound.
The Buddha and his disciples reveled in the silent solitary natural habitats unencumbered by human activity.
Even in the choice of monasteries the presence of undisturbed silence was an important quality they looked for.
Silence invigorates those who are pure at heart and raises their efficiency for meditation.
But silence overawes those who are impure with ignoble impulses of greed, hatred, and delusion.
The Bhayabherava Sutta beautifully illustrates how even the rustle of leaves by a falling twig in the forest sends tremors through an impure heart.
This may perhaps account for the present craze for constant auditory stimulation with transistors and cassettes.
The moral impurity caused by greed, avarice, acquisitive instincts, and aggression has rendered man so timid that he cannot bear silence which lays bare the reality of self-awareness.
He therefore prefers to drown himself in loud music.
Unlike classical music, which tends to soothe nerves and induce relaxation, rock music excites the senses.
Constant exposure to it actually renders man incapable of relaxation and sound sleep without tranquilizers.
As to the question of the Buddhist attitude to music, it is recorded that the Buddha has spoken quite appreciatively of music on one occasion.
When Pañcasikha the divine musician sang a song while playing the lute in front of the Buddha, the Buddha praised his musical ability saying that the instrumental music blended well with his song.
Again, the remark of an Arahant that the joy of seeing the real nature of things is far more exquisite than orchestral music shows the recognition that music affords a certain amount of pleasure even if it is inferior to higher kinds of pleasure.
But it is stressed that the ear is a powerful sensory channel through which man gets addicted to sense pleasures.
Therefore, to dissuade monks from getting addicted to melodious sounds, the monastic discipline describes music as a lament.
The psychological training of the monks is so advanced that they are expected to cultivate a taste not only for external silence, but for inner silence of speech, desire, and thought as well.
The sub-vocal speech, the inner chatter that goes on constantly within us in our waking life is expected to be silenced through meditation.
The sage who succeeded in quelling this inner speech completely is described as a muni, a silent one.
His inner silence is maintained even when he speaks!
It is not inappropriate to pay passing notice to the Buddhist attitude to speech as well.
Moderation in speech is considered a virtue, as one can avoid four unwholesome vocal activities thereby, namely, falsehood, slander, harsh speech, and frivolous talk.
In its positive aspect moderation in speech paves the path to self-awareness.
Buddhism commends speaking at the appropriate time, speaking the truth, speaking gently, speaking what is useful, and speaking out of loving-kindness; the opposite modes of speech are condemned.
The Buddha's general advice to the monks regarding speech is to be engaged in discussing the Dhamma or maintain noble silence.
The silence that reigned in vast congregations of monks during the Buddha's day was indeed a surprise even to the kings of the time.
Silence is serene and noble as it is conducive to the spiritual progress of those who are pure at heart.
Even Buddhist laymen were reputed to have appreciated quietude and silence.
Pañcangika Thapati can be cited as a conspicuous example.
Once Mahanama the Sakyan complained to the Buddha that he is disturbed by the hustle of the busy city of Kapilavatthu.
He explained that he experiences calm serenity when he visits the Buddha in the quiet salubrious surroundings of the monastery and his peace of mind gets disturbed when he goes to the city.
Though noise to the extent of being a pollutant causing health hazards was not known during the Buddha's day, we have adduced enough material from the Pali canon to illustrate the Buddha's attitude to the problem.
Quietude is much appreciated as spiritually rewarding, while noise condemned as a personal and social nuisance.
The Buddha and his disciples regarded natural beauty as a source of great joy and aesthetic satisfaction.
The saints who purged themselves of sensuous worldly pleasures responded to natural beauty with a detached sense of appreciation.
The average poet looks at nature and derives inspiration mostly by the sentiments it evokes in his own heart; he becomes emotionally involved with nature.
For instance, he may compare the sun's rays passing over the mountain tops to the blush on a sensitive face, he may see a tear in a dew drop, the lips of his beloved in a rose petal, etc.
But the appreciation of the saint is quite different.
He appreciates nature's beauty for its own sake and derives joy unsullied by sensuous associations and self-projected ideas.
The simple spontaneous appreciation of nature's exquisite beauty is expressed by the Elder Mahakassapa in the following words:
Again the poem of Kaludayi, inviting the Buddha to visit Kapilavatthu, contains a beautiful description of spring:
The long poem of Talaputa is a fascinating soliloquy.
His religious aspirations are beautifully blended with a profound knowledge of the teachings of the Buddha against the background of a sylvan resort.
Many more poems could be cited for saintly appreciation of nature, but it is not necessary to burden the essay with any more quotations.
Suffice it to know that the saints, too, were sensitive to the beauties and harmony of nature and that their appreciation is colored by spontaneity, simplicity, and a non-sensuous spirituality.
In the modern age man has become alienated from himself and nature.
When science started opening new vistas of knowledge revealing the secrets of nature one by one, man gradually lost faith in theistic religions.
Consequently, he developed scanty respect for moral and spiritual values as well.
With the advent of the Industrial Revolution and the acquisition of wealth by mechanical exploitation of natural resources, man has become more and more materialistic in his attitudes and values.
The pursuit of sense pleasures and the acquisition of possessions have become ends in themselves.
Man's sense faculties dominate him to an unrelenting degree and man has become a slave to his insatiable passions.
Thus man has become alienated from himself as he abandoned himself to the influence of sense pleasures and acquisitive instincts.
In his greed for more and more possessions he has adopted a violent and aggressive attitude towards nature.
Forgetting that he is a part and parcel of nature, he exploits it with unrestrained greed, thus alienating himself from nature as well.
The net result is the deterioration of man's physical and mental health on the one hand, and the rapid depletion of non-replenishable natural resources and environmental pollution on the other.
These results remind us of the Buddhist teachings in the suttas discussed above, which maintain that the moral degeneration of man leads to the decrease of his life-span and the depletion of natural resources.
Moral degeneration is a double-edged weapon, it exercises adverse effects on man's psycho-physical well being as well as on nature.
Already killer diseases such as heart ailments, cancer, diabetes, AIDS, etc., are claiming victims on an unprecedented scale.
In the final analysis these can all be traced to man's moral deterioration.
Depletion of vast resources of fossil fuels and forests has given rise to a very severe energy crisis.
It cannot be emphasized too strongly that such rapid depletion of non-renewable natural resources within less than two centuries, an infinitesimal fraction of the millions of years taken for them to form, is due to modern man's inordinate greed and acquisitiveness.
A number of simple ancient societies had advanced technological skills, as is evident by their vast sophisticated irrigation schemes designed to feed the fundamental needs of several millions.
Yet they survived in some countries over years without such problems as environmental pollution and depletion of natural resources.
This was no doubt due to to validity of the philosophy which inspired and formed the basis of these civilizations.
In the present ecocrisis man has to look for radical solutions.
“Pollution cannot be dealt with in the long term on a remedial or cosmetic basis or by tackling symptoms: all measures should deal with basic causes.
These are determined largely by our values, priorities, and choices.” Man must reappraise his value system.
The materialism that has guided his lifestyle has landed him in very severe problems.
Buddhism teaches that mind is the forerunner of all things, mind is supreme.
If one acts with an impure mind, i.e.
a mind sullied with greed, hatred and delusion, suffering is the inevitable result.
If one acts with a pure mind, i.e.
with the opposite qualities of contentment, compassion, and wisdom, happiness will follow like a shadow.
Man has to understand that pollution in the environment has been caused because there has been psychological pollution within himself.
If he wants a clean environment he has to adopt a lifestyle that springs from a moral and spiritual dimension.
Buddhism offers man a simple moderate lifestyle eschewing both extremes of self-deprivation and self-indulgence.
Satisfaction of basic human necessities, reduction of wants to the minimum, frugality, and contentment are its important characteristics.
Each man has to order his life on normal principles, exercise self-control in the enjoyment of the senses, discharge his duties in his various social roles, and conduct himself with wisdom and self-awareness in all activities.
It is only when each man adopts a simple moderate lifestyle that mankind as a whole will stop polluting the environment.
This seems to be the only way of overcoming the present ecocrisis and the problem of alienation.
With such a lifestyle, man will adopt a non-exploitative, non-aggressive, gentle attitude towards nature.
He can then live in harmony with nature, utilizing its resources for the satisfaction of his basic needs.
The Buddhist admonition is to utilize nature in the same way as a bee collects pollen from the flower, neither polluting its beauty nor depleting its fragrance.
Just as the bee manufactures honey out of pollen, so man should be able to find happiness and fulfillment in life without harming the natural world in which he lives.
All Pali texts referred to are editions of the Pali Text Society, London.
Abbreviations used are as follows:
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
”…The Dhamma is just like this, talking in similes, because the Dhamma doesn't have anything.
It isn't round, doesn't have any corners.
There's no way to get acquainted with it except through comparisons like this.
If you understand this, you understand the Dhamma.
“Don't think that the Dhamma lies far away from you.
It lies right with you; it's about you.
Take a look.
One minute happy, the next minute sad, satisfied, then angry at this person, hating that person: It's all Dhamma… Venerable Ajahn Chah was a master at using the apt and unusual simile to explain points of Dhamma.
Sometimes he would make an abstract point clear with a vivid and simple image; sometimes he'd tease out the implications of an image in a way that suggested many layers of meaning, offering food for continued thought.
In other words, some of his similes provided answers, whereas others provoked questions.
Since his death, several collections of similes have been drawn from his Dhamma talks.
The present translation is based primarily on a collection compiled by one of his Thai students, Ajahn Jandee, in the early years of this decade.
I say “primarily” because I have introduced the following changes:
Ajahn Jandee transcribed his collection directly from recordings of Ajahn Chah's talks with minimal editing, and I have tried to follow his example by giving as full and accurate translation as I can.
The unpolished nature of some of the similes is precisely what reveals unexpected layers of meaning, making them so provocative, and I hope that this translation succeeds in conveying some of the same unfinished, thought-provoking quality in English as well.
Several people have looked over the original manuscript and have provided helpful recommendations for improving it.
In particular, I would like to thank Ajahn Pasanno, Ginger Vathanasombat, and Michael Zoll.
May all those who read this translation realize Ajahn Chah's original intention in explaining the Dhamma in such simple and graphic terms.
Your external home isn't your real home.
It's your supposed home, your home in the world.
As for your real home, that's peace.
The Buddha has us build our own home
by letting go till we reach peace.
The streams, lakes, and rivers that flow down to the ocean, when they reach the ocean, all have the same blue color, the same salty taste.
The same with human beings: It doesn't matter where they're from — when they reach the stream of the Dhamma, it's all the same Dhamma.
The Buddha is the Dhamma; the Dhamma is the Buddha.
The Dhamma the Buddha awakened to is something always there in the world.
It hasn't disappeared.
It's like groundwater.
Whoever digs a well down to the level of the groundwater will see water.
It's not the case that that person created or fashioned the water into being.
All he's done is to put his strength into digging the well so that it's deep enough to reach the water already there.
So if we have any discernment, we'll realize that we're not far from the Buddha at all.
We're sitting right in front of him right now.
Whenever we understand the Dhamma, we see the Buddha.
Those who are intent on practicing the Dhamma continuously — wherever they sit, stand, or walk — are sure to hear the Buddha's Dhamma at all times.
The Buddha is the Dhamma; the Dhamma is the Buddha.
He didn't take away the knowledge he awakened to.
He left it right here.
To put it in simple terms, it's like the teachers in schools.
They haven't been teachers from birth.
They had to study the course of study for teachers before they could be teachers, teaching in school and getting paid.
After a while, they'll die away — away from being teachers.
But you can say that in a way the teachers don't die.
The qualities that make people into teachers remain right here.
It's the same with the Buddha.
The noble truths that made him the Buddha still remain right here.
They haven't run off anywhere at all.
Training the mind well is a useful activity.
You can see this even in draft animals, like elephants, oxen, and water buffaloes.
Before we can put them to work, we have to train them.
Only when they're well trained can we use their strength and put it to different purposes.
All of you know this.
A mind well trained is of many times greater value.
Look at the Buddha and his noble disciples.
They changed their status from being run-of-the-mill people to being noble ones, respected by people all over.
And they've benefited us in more wide-ranging ways than we could ever determine.
All of this comes from the fact that they've trained their minds well.
A mind well trained is of use in every occupation.
It enables us to do our work with circumspection.
It makes us reasonable instead of impulsive, and enables us to experience a happiness appropriate to our station in life.
We're like a tree with roots, a base, and a trunk.
Every leaf, every branch, depends on the roots to absorb nutrients from the soil and send them up to nourish the tree.
Our body, plus our words and deeds, our senses of sight, hearing, smell, taste, and feeling, are like the branches, leaves, and trunk.
The mind is like the roots absorbing nutrients and sending them up the trunk to the leaves and branches so that they flower and bear fruit.
It's as if you leave home and lose your wallet.
It fell out of your pocket onto the road away back there, but as long as you don't realize what happened you're at ease — at ease because you don't yet know what this ease is for.
It's for the sake of dis-ease at a later time.
When you eventually see that you've really lost your money: That's when you feel dis-ease — when it's right in your face.
The same holds true with our bad and good actions.
The Buddha taught us to acquaint ourselves with these things.
If we aren't acquainted with these things, we'll have no sense of right or wrong, good or bad.
The cycle of rebirth is like a wagon wheel.
An ox is pulling the wagon.
If it keeps on pulling the wagon without stop, the wagon tracks will keep on erasing the ox tracks without stop.
The wagon wheels aren't long, but they're round.
You could say that they're long, but their length is round.
We see their roundness but we don't see their length.
As long as the ox pulls without stopping, the wagon wheels turn without stopping.
On a later day the ox stops.
It's tired.
It drops the yoke.
The ox then goes its way, the wagon goes its way.
The wagon wheels stop of their own accord.
If you leave them there a long time, they disintegrate into earth, water, wind, and fire, turning back into grass and dirt.
It's the same with people who are still making kamma: They don't come to closure.
People speaking the truth don't come to closure.
People with wrong views don't come to closure.
If you place a large block of ice out in the open sun, you can see it deteriorate — in the same way the body ages — bit by bit, bit by bit.
After only a few minutes, only a few hours, it will all melt into water.
This is called khaya-vaya: ending, deterioration.
The deterioration of fabricated things has been going on for a long time, ever since the world came into being.
When we're born, we take on these things as well.
We don't discard them anywhere.
When we're born, we take on illness, aging, and death.
We gather them up at the same time.
Look at the ways it deteriorates, this body of ours.
Every part deteriorates.
Hair of the head deteriorates; hair of the body deteriorates; fingernails and toenails deteriorate; skin deteriorates.
Everything, no matter what, deteriorates in line with its nature.
A gun shoots its children — its bullets — outward.
We shoot ours inward, into our heart.
When they're good, we're shot in the heart.
When they're bad, we're shot in the heart.
They're an affair of kamma, our children.
There are good ones, there are bad ones, but both the good and bad are our children all the same.
When they're born, look at us: The worse off they are, the more we love them.
If one of them comes down with polio and gets crippled, that's the one we love the most.
When we leave the house we tell the older ones, “Look after your little sister.
Look after this one” — because we love her.
When we're about to die we tell them, “Look after her.
Look after my child.” She's not strong, so you love her even more.
We human beings don't want suffering.
We want nothing but pleasure.
But actually, pleasure is nothing but subtle suffering.
Pain is blatant suffering.
To put it in simple terms, suffering and pleasure are like a snake.
Its head is suffering; its tail is pleasure.
Its head contains poison.
Its mouth contains poison.
If you get near its head, it'll bite you.
If you catch hold of its tail it seems safe, but if you hold onto its tail without letting go, it can turn around and bite you just the same.
That's because both the head of the snake and the tail of the snake are on the same snake.
Both happiness and sadness come from the same parents: craving and delusion.
That's why there are times when you're happy but still restless and ill at ease — even when you've gotten things you like, such as material gain, status, and praise.
When you get these things you're happy, but your mind isn't really at peace because there's still the sneaking suspicion that you'll lose them.
You're afraid they'll disappear.
This fear is the cause that keeps you from being at peace.
Sometimes you actually do lose these things and then you really suffer.
This means that even though these things are pleasant, suffering lies fermenting in the pleasure.
We're simply not aware of it.
Just as when we catch hold of a snake: Even though we catch hold of its tail, if we keep holding on without letting go, it can turn around and bite us.
So the head of the snake and the tail of the snake, evil and goodness: These form a circle that keeps turning around.
That's why pleasure and pain, good and bad are not the path.
We live like a chicken who doesn't know what's going on.
In the morning it takes its baby chicks out to scratch for food.
In the evening, it goes back to sleep in the coop.
The next morning it goes out to look for food again.
Its owner scatters rice for it to eat every day, but it doesn't know why its owner is feeding it.
The chicken and its owner are thinking in very different ways.
The owner is thinking, “How much does the chicken weigh?” The chicken, though, is engrossed in the food.
When the owner picks it up to heft its weight, it thinks the owner is showing affection.
We too don't know what's going on: where we come from, how many more years we'll live, where we'll go, who will take us there.
We don't know this at all.
The King of Death is like the owner of the chicken.
We don't know when he'll catch up with us, for we're engrossed — engrossed in sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas.
We have no sense that we're growing older.
We have no sense of enough.
When we're born we're already dead, you know.
Aging and death are the same thing.
It's like a tree.
Part of it's the base; part of it's the end at the tip.
When there's a base, there's an end.
When there's an end, there's a base.
When there's no base, there's no end.
When there's an end, there has to be a base.
An end without a base: That can't be.
That's how it is.
So it's kind of amusing.
When a person dies, we're sad and upset.
We sit and cry, grieving — all kinds of things.
That's delusion.
It's delusion, you know.
When a person dies we sob and cry.
That's the way it's been since who knows when.
We don't stop to examine this carefully.
Actually — and excuse me for saying this — it appears to me that if you're going to cry when a person dies, it'd be better to cry when a person is born.
But we have it all backwards.
When a child is born, people beam and laugh from happiness.
But actually birth is death.
Death is birth.
The beginning is the end; the end is the beginning.
When we sit in a quiet forest when there's no wind, the leaves are still.
When the wind blows, the leaves flutter.
The mind is the same sort of thing as leaves.
When it makes contact with an object, it vibrates in line with its nature.
The less you know of the Dhamma, the more the mind vibrates.
When it feels pleasure, it dies with the pleasure.
When it feels pain, it dies with the pain.
It keeps flowing on in this way.
Our heart, when it's at normalcy, is like rainwater.
It's clean water, clear, pure, and normal.
If we put green coloring in the water, yellow coloring in the water, the color of the water turns to green, turns to yellow.
The same with our mind: When it meets with an object it likes, it's happy.
When it meets with an object it doesn't like, it gets murky and uncomfortable — just like water that turns green when you add green coloring to it, or yellow when you add yellow coloring.
It keeps on changing its color.
Our mind, when there's no one looking after it, is like a child without parents to look after it — an orphaned child, a child with no protector.
A person without a protector suffers, and it's the same with the mind.
If it's not trained, if its views aren't straightened out into right views, it's put to a lot of difficulties.
When suffering arises, you have to see that it's suffering, and to see what this suffering arises from.
Will you see anything?
If we look at things in an ordinary way, there's no suffering.
For example, while we're sitting here, we're at ease.
But at another moment we want this spittoon, so we lift it up.
Now things are different.
They're different from when we hadn't yet lifted up the spittoon.
When we lift the spittoon, we sense that we're more weighed down.
There's a reason for it.
Why do we feel weighed down if it's not from having lifted the spittoon?
If we don't lift it, there's nothing.
If we don't lift it, we feel light.
So what's the cause and what's the result?
All you have to do is observe just this much and you know.
You don't have to go off studying anywhere else.
When we grasp onto something, that's the cause of suffering.
When we let go there's no suffering.
…This is suffering.
Ordinary suffering is one thing; suffering above and beyond the ordinary is something else.
The regular pains of this bodily fabrication — pains when you're standing, pains when you're sitting down, pains when you're lying down: This sort of thing is ordinary suffering, the regular suffering of these bodily fabrications.
The Buddha experienced feelings like these.
He felt pleasures like these, pains like these, but he realized that they were ordinary.
All these ordinary pleasures and pains he was able to bring to stillness because he understood them.
He understood ordinary suffering: It was just the way it was.
It wasn't all that strong.
Instead, he kept a look-out for visiting suffering, suffering above and beyond the ordinary.
It's like when we're sick and go to the doctor for a shot.
The hypodermic needle gets inserted through our skin and into our flesh.
It hurts a little, but that's an ordinary thing.
No big deal.
This is the way it has to be for everybody.
The suffering above and beyond the ordinary is the suffering of upadana, or clinging.
It's like bathing a hypodermic needle in poison and sticking it into the body.
This doesn't hurt in just an ordinary way; this isn't just ordinary suffering.
It hurts enough to kill you.
Sensual desire is something hard to escape from.
It's no different from eating meat and getting a piece of meat stuck in your teeth.
Boy, does it hurt!
Even before you finish the meal, you have to take a toothpick to get it out.
Once it's out you feel relieved for a while and you don't want to eat meat anymore.
But when more meat comes your way, another piece gets stuck in your teeth.
You take it out again and you feel relieved again.
That's all there is to sensual desire: nothing more than a piece of meat stuck in your teeth.
You feel agitated and unsettled, and then you get it out of your system in whatever the way.
You don't understand what it's all about.
It's crazy.
It's like a man with a strong thirst from having traveled a long way.
He asks for water, but the person with the water tells him, “You can drink this water if you want.
Its color is good, its smell is good, its flavor is good, but it's poisonous, I want you to know.
It can poison you to death or give you pains like death.” But the thirsty man won't listen because he's so thirsty.
Or like a person after surgery.
He's been told by the doctors not to drink water, but he asks for water to drink.
A person thirsty for sensuality is like this: thirsty for sights, thirsty for sounds, for smells, for tastes, all of which are poisonous.
The Buddha tells us that sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas are poisonous.
They're traps.
But we don't listen to him.
Like the man thirsty for water who won't listen to the warning because his thirst is so great: No matter how much trouble or pain he'll get into, all he asks is for water to drink.
He doesn't care if, after he drinks the water, he'll die or suffer pains like death.
As soon as he gets his hand on a glass, he keeps on drinking.
A person thirsty for sensuality drinks in sights, drinks in sounds, drinks in smells, drinks in tastes, drinks in tactile sensations, drinks in ideas.
They seem delicious, so he keeps on drinking them in.
He can't stop.
He'll drink them in until he dies — caught in the act, right in the middle of sensuality.
Sensuality is like taking a stick and using it to poke a big red ants' nest.
The more we poke it, the more the red ants come falling on us, onto our face, into our eyes, stinging our ears and eyes.
But we don't see the drawbacks of what we're doing.
It's all good as far as we can see.
Understand that if you don't see the drawbacks of these things you'll never work your way free of them.
Animals caught in traps and snares suffer.
They're tied down, strapped down tight.
All they can do is wait for the hunter to come and get them.
Like a bird caught in a snare: The snare pulls at its neck, and no matter how much it struggles it can't get free.
It keeps struggling, thrashing back and forth, but it's trapped.
All it can do is wait for the hunter.
When the hunter comes, that's it.
That's Mara.
Birds are afraid of him; all animals are afraid of him because they can't get away.
Our snares are sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas.
They tie us down.
When we're attached to sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas, we're like a fish on a hook, waiting for the fisherman to come.
No matter how much we struggle we can't get away.
Actually, we're worse off than a fish on a hook.
We're more like a frog on a hook — for when a frog swallows a hook, it goes all the way down to its gut.
When a fish swallows a hook, it goes only as far as its mouth.
The Buddha's teachings are direct, straightforward, and simple, but hard for someone who's starting to practice them because his knowledge can't reach them.
It's like a hole: People by the hundreds and thousands complain that the hole is deep because they can't reach to its bottom.
There's hardly anybody who will say that the problem is that his arm is short.
The Buddha taught us to abandon evil of every kind.
We skip over this part and go straight to making merit without abandoning evil.
It's the same as saying the hole is deep.
Those who say their arms are short are rare.
I once saw a dog who couldn't eat all the rice I had given it, so he lay down and kept watch over the rice right there.
He was so full he couldn't eat any more, but he still lay keeping watch right there.
He would drift off and get drowsy, and then suddenly glance over at the food that was left.
If any other dog came to eat, no matter how big or how small, he'd growl at it.
If chickens came to eat the rice, he'd bark: Rowf!
Rowf!
Rowf!
His stomach was ready to burst, but he couldn't let anyone else eat.
He was stingy and selfish.
People can be the same way.
If they don't know the Dhamma, if they have no sense of their duties to their superiors and inferiors, if their minds are overcome by the defilements of greed, anger, and delusion, then even when they have lots of wealth they're stingy and selfish.
They don't know how to share it.
They have a hard time even giving donations to poor children or old people who have nothing to eat.
I've thought about this and it's struck me how much they're like common animals.
They don't have the virtues of human beings at all.
The Buddha called them manussa-tiracchano: human-common-animals.
That's the way they are because they lack good will, compassion, empathetic joy, and equanimity.
…This is like a dog lying on a pile of unhusked rice.
Its stomach is gurgling — jawk, jawk — and it lies there thinking, “Where can I get something to eat?” Its stomach is hungry, so it jumps off the pile of unhusked rice and goes looking for some garbage.
There's food right there in the pile, but it doesn't realize it.
It doesn't see the rice.
It can't eat unhusked rice.
Knowledge exists, but if we don't practice it, we don't understand it.
We're as stupid as the dog on the pile of unhusked rice.
It's really a pity.
Edible rice is there, but it's hidden by the husks — in the same way that release is here, but it's hidden by our suppositions.
The Buddha said, “Monks, did you see the jackal running around here in the evening?
Did you see him?
Standing still it suffered.
Running around it suffered.
Sitting down it suffered.
Lying down it suffered.
Going into the hollow of a tree, it suffered.
Going into a cave, it felt ill at ease.
It suffered because it thought, 'Standing here isn't good.
Sitting isn't good.
Lying down isn't good.
This bush isn't good.
This tree hollow isn't good.
This cave isn't good.' So it kept running all the time.
Actually, that jackal has mange.
Its discomfort doesn't come from the bush or the tree hollow or the cave, from sitting, standing, or lying down.
It comes from the mange.
You monks are the same.
Your discomfort comes from your wrong views.
You hold onto ideas that are poisonous and so you're tormented.
You don't exert restraint over your senses, so you blame other things.
You don't know what's going on inside you.
When you stay here at Wat Nong Pah Pong, you suffer.
You go to America and suffer.
You go to London and suffer.
You go to Wat Bung Wai and suffer.
You go to every branch monastery and suffer.
Wherever you go, you suffer.
This comes from the wrong views that still lie within you.
Your views are wrong and you hold onto ideas that are poisonous in your hearts.
Wherever you go you suffer.
You're like that jackal.
Once you recover from your mange, though, you can be at ease wherever you go: at ease out in the open, at ease in the wild.
I think about this often and keep teaching it to you because this point of Dhamma is very useful.
When we give rise to right view in our hearts, we can be at ease wherever we are.
It's because we still have wrong views, still hold onto ideas that are poisonous, that we're not at ease.
Holding on in this way is like being a maggot.
Where it lives is filthy; its food is filthy.
Its food isn't fit to be food — but it seems fitting to the maggot.
Try taking a stick and flicking it out of the excrement where it's feeding, and see what happens.
It'll wiggle and wriggle, eager to get back to the pile of excrement where it was before.
Only then does it feel right.
It's the same with you monks and novices.
You still have wrong views.
Teachers come and advise you on how to have right view, but it doesn't feel right to you.
You keep running back to your pile of excrement.
Right view doesn't feel right because you're used to your old pile of excrement.
As long as the maggot doesn't see the filth in where it's living, it can't escape.
It's the same with us.
As long as we don't see the drawbacks of those things, we can't escape from them.
They make it difficult to practice.
It's like rivers that flow down to the lowlands.
They flow down in line with their nature.
The Ayutthaya River, the Muun River — whatever the river: They all flow downhill.
None of them flow uphill.
That's the way they ordinarily are.
Suppose there were a man standing on the bank of a river, watching its current flow swiftly downhill, but his thinking is wrong.
He wants the river to flow uphill.
He's going to have to suffer.
He won't find any peace.
Sitting, standing, walking, lying down, he won't find any peace.
Why is that?
Because his thinking is wrong.
Two people see a chicken and a duck.
The first person wants the chicken to be a duck, and the duck to be a chicken, but it simply can't be.
Throughout their life, it can't happen.
If the first person doesn't stop thinking in this way, he'll have to suffer.
The second person sees the chicken as a chicken, and the duck as a duck.
That way there's no problem.
When your views are right, there's no suffering.
The same holds here.
Anicca — things that are inconstant — we want to make constant.
As long as they're inconstant, we're sad.
The person who sees that inconstant things are simply inconstant can be at ease.
There's no problem.
Ever since the day of our birth we've been running away from the truth.
We don't want things to be the way they are, but we can't stop them from being that way.
That's just the way they are.
They can't be any other way.
It's like trying to make a duck be the same as a chicken.
It'll never be the same.
It's a duck.
Or like trying to make a chicken be the same as a duck: It'll never be the same.
It's a chicken.
Whoever thinks that he wants to change things like this will have to suffer.
But if you think, “Oh, that's just the way it is,” you gain strength — for no matter how much you try, you can't make the body permanent or lasting.
A monk who claimed to be a meditator once came and asked to live here with me.
He asked about the way we practice, and I told him, “If you live with me, you can't keep money or stored up things.
I follow the Vinaya.
He said that he practiced non-attachment.
I said, “I don't know what you mean.
So he asked, “If I use money but without attachment, can I stay here?
So I said, “Sure.
If you can eat salt but it doesn't taste salty, then you can.
If you simply claim to be unattached because you don't feel like observing these bothersome rules, then it would be difficult to stay here.
But if you can eat salt without its tasting salty, then I'll believe you.
Can you really eat a half-bushel of salt without its tasting salty?
This business of non-attachment isn't something you can just talk about or guess about.
If you talk like this, you can't live with me.
So he left.
Whatever there is in the mind: If our reasons aren't yet good enough, we can't let it go.
In other words, there are two sides: this side here and that side there.
People tend to walk along this side or along that side.
There's hardly anybody who walks along the middle.
It's a lonely path.
When there's love, we walk along the path of love.
When there's hatred, we walk along the path of hatred.
If we try to walk by letting go of love and hatred, it's a lonely path.
We aren't willing to follow it.
Things are simply the way they are.
They don't give us suffering.
Like a thorn: Does a sharp thorn give us suffering?
No.
It's simply a thorn.
It doesn't give suffering to anybody.
If we step on it, we suffer immediately.
Why do we suffer?
Because we stepped on it.
So the suffering comes from us.
“Letting go” actually means this: It's as if we're carrying a heavy rock.
As we carry it, we feel weighed down but we don't know what to do with it, so we keep on carrying it.
As soon as someone tells us to throw it away, we think, “Eh?
If I throw it away, I won't have anything left.” So we keep on carrying it.
We aren't willing to throw it away.
Even if someone tells us, “Come on.
Throw it away.
It'll be good like this, and you'll benefit like that,” we're still not willing to throw it away because we're afraid we won't have anything left.
So we keep on carrying it until we're so thoroughly weak and tired that we can't carry it anymore.
That's when we let it go.
Only when we let it go do we understand letting go.
We feel at ease.
And we can sense within ourselves how heavy it felt to carry the rock.
But while we were carrying it, we didn't know at all how useful letting go could be.
The Buddha teaches us to escape through discernment.
It's like having a tiny splinter or thorn in our foot.
As we walk along, there are times when it hurts and times when it doesn't.
If we ram it into a stump, it hurts.
So we feel around on our foot but don't feel the splinter, so we let the matter go.
After a while, we're walking along and we stub our toe on a bump, and the splinter starts hurting again.
This keeps happening over and over again.
Why?
Because the splinter or thorn is still in our foot.
It hasn't yet come out.
The pain keeps coming back.
When it hurts, we feel for the splinter but we can't find it, so we let the matter go.
After a while it hurts again, so we feel for it again.
This keeps happening again and again.
When pain arises, we have to determine what it is.
We don't have to just let it go.
When our foot hurts: “Oh.
That damned thorn is still there.
When the pain comes, the desire to take out the thorn comes along with it.
If we don't take it out, the pain will keep coming back and back and back.
Our interest in getting the thorn out is still there all the time.
Eventually the day will come when we decide, no matter what, that we've got to get it out because it hurts.
Our determination to put energy into the practice has to be like this.
Wherever there's interference, wherever there's discomfort, we have to examine things right there, solve the problem right there — solve the problem of the thorn in our foot by digging it right out.
…As long as you don't see the dangers of these things enough to let them go, don't see the rewards that will come when you do, your work won't achieve any purpose.
It's as if you're just playing around with these things, scratching at them with your fingernails.
If we see their drawbacks clearly, see the rewards that come from letting it go clearly — Ah!
It's like when you go trapping fish with a basket.
You keep at it until you sense there's something in your basket.
You can hear the noise as it bangs against the side of the basket.
You think it's a fish so you put your hand into your basket and grope around, but what you catch hold of isn't a fish.
It's something else that lives in the water.
Your eyes can't see what it is.
Part of you thinks it might be an eel; part of you thinks it might be a snake.
You'd regret letting it go if it actually was an eel.
But if it's a snake and you keep holding on, it's going to bite you.
Understand?
You're in doubt because things aren't clear.
Your desire is so strong that you hold onto it in case it's an eel.
As you pull it up out of the water and see the pattern on the back of its neck, you immediately let go.
There's nobody there to tell you, “That's a snake!
Let go!
Let go!” Nobody tells you.
The mind tells itself — even more clearly than if someone else were to tell it.
Why is that?
Because you see the danger: The snake can bite.
Who needs to tell this mind?
If you train it until it knows in this way, it won't hold on.
About anatta: In simple terms this means “not-self.” But it depends on there being a sense of self; it depends on there being a sense of atta.
That's why there's anatta.
And it's a correct anatta, too.
When there's no atta, anatta doesn't appear.
For example: You don't have this spittoon in your house, so the affairs of this spittoon don't bother you.
Whether it breaks or gets cracked or gets stolen by thieves, none of these things bother your heart — because there's no cause, no condition.
How is that?
Because there's no spittoon in your house.
If there's a spittoon in your house, that's a sense of self arising.
When the spittoon breaks, it hits you.
When it gets lost, it hits you — because the spittoon now has an owner.
That's called atta.
That's the state it has.
As for the state of anatta, it means that there's no spittoon in your house, so there's no mind state that has to keep watch over the spittoon and protect it, no fear that thieves will steal it.
Those states are no longer there.
These things are called state-phenomena.
There are causes and conditions, but they're simply there, that's all.
I'll give you a simple comparison.
Suppose you've bought a banana or a coconut in the market and you walk along carrying it.
Someone asks you, “Why did you buy the banana?
“I bought it to eat it.
“But do you have to eat the peel, too?
“No.
“I don't believe you.
If you're not going to eat the peel, why are you carrying it too?
Or suppose you're carrying a coconut:
“Why are you carrying the coconut?
“I'm carrying it home to make a curry.
“And you're going to curry the husk too?
“No.
“Then why are you carrying it?
So.
How are you going to answer his question?
Through desire.
If there's no desire, you can't give rise to ingenuity, to discernment.
That's the way it is as we make an effort in our meditation.
Even though we do this through letting go, it's like the banana or the coconut: Why are you carrying the peel or the husk?
Because the time hasn't come yet to throw it away.
It's still protecting the inner flesh.
The time hasn't come yet to throw it away, so you hold onto it for the time being.
The same with our practice: Suppositions and release have to be mixed together, just as the coconut has a husk mixed together with a shell and the flesh, so you carry them all together.
If they accuse us of eating the coconut husk, so what?
We know what we're doing.
The Dhamma is like doing math.
There's multiplication, division, addition, and subtraction.
If we can think in this way, we'll be intelligent.
We know the right time and place for things.
We subtract when we should subtract, multiply when we should multiply, divide when we should divide, add together when we should add together.
If we multiply every time, our hearts will die from the burden.
In other words, we have no sense of enough.
No sense of enough means no sense that we're growing old.
Anyone with a sense of growing old is a person with a sense of enough.
When there's enough, the words, “Okay, that's plenty,” can make their way up.
If there's not enough, that “okay” can't make its way up because we keep on wanting to take.
We've never thrown anything away, let anything go, put anything down.
We're always taking.
If we can “okay,” we're at ease.
That's enough.
You may say, “Don't break my glass!” But you can't prevent something breakable from breaking.
If it doesn't break now, it'll break later on.
If you don't break it, someone else will.
If someone else doesn't break it, one of the chickens will!
The Buddha says to accept this.
He penetrated all the way to seeing that this glass is already broken.
This glass that isn't broken, he has us know as already broken.
Whenever you pick up the glass, put water in it, drink from it, and put it down, he tells you to see that it's already broken.
Understand?
The Buddha's understanding was like this.
He saw the broken glass in the unbroken one.
Whenever its conditions run out, it'll break.
Develop this attitude.
Use the glass; look after it.
Then one day it slips out of your hand: “Smash!” No problem.
Why no problem?
Because you saw it as broken before it broke.
See?
But usually people say, “I've taken such good care of this glass.
Don't ever let it break.” Later on the dog breaks it, and you hate the dog.
If your child breaks it, you hate him, too.
You hate whoever breaks it — because you've dammed yourself up so that the water can't flow.
You've made a dam without a spillway.
The only thing the dam can do is burst, right?
When you make a dam, you have to make a spillway, too.
When the water rises up to a certain level, it can flow off safely to the side.
When it's full to the brim, it can flow out the spillway.
You need to have a spillway like this.
Seeing inconstancy is the Buddha's spillway.
When you see things this way, you can be at peace.
That's the practice of the Dhamma.
If you do merit for the sake of putting an end to suffering, you have to make merit and develop skillful qualities in the mind at the same time.
If you don't develop skillful qualities, no discernment will arise.
Merit on its own is like raw meat or raw fish.
If you just let it sit out like that, it goes rotten.
But if you salt it, it'll last for a long time.
Or the same if you put it in the refrigerator.
Once we've abandoned doing evil, then even when we make merit only a bit at a time, there's still hope that our perfections will grow full.
Like a basin set upright out in the open: Even if rain falls only a drop at a time, there's a chance that the basin will get full.
But if we make merit without abandoning evil, it's like putting a basin upside-down out in the open.
When the rain falls it still lands on the bottom of the basin, but on the outside bottom, not on the inside.
There's no way the water will fill the basin.
If we do evil and then try to plug the leak by doing good, it's like plugging a leak in the bottom of a pot and pouring water in.
Or like plugging a leak in the bottom of a basin and pouring water in.
The bottom of the pot, the bottom of the basin, isn't in good shape.
Our abandoning of evil isn't yet in good shape.
If you pour water in, it all still seeps out and the basin goes dry.
Even if you pour water in all day, it still seeps out bit by bit, and eventually there's no water left.
You don't gain the benefits from it that you wanted.
When no forms of evil are in our hearts, all our troubles disappear.
A sense of coolness arises because we look after ourselves.
The mind becomes virtuous.
When it grows still, it becomes concentrated.
When it's still, it starts to bloom into discernment.
We know how to make the mind clear and bright.
Whatever's evil, we let go.
Whatever's wrong, we put aside.
We contemplate and put things aside, let them go.
It's kind of like water in a jar.
We take out a dipperful and then throw it away.
Take out a second dipperful and throw it away — keep on taking out water and throwing it away.
The water in the jar will eventually go dry.
The mind that enters into the practice is like that.
But if we don't see things in this way, it's like adding water to the jar and then taking it out, adding water and then taking it out.
Merit, evil, merit, evil; wrong, right, wrong, right; good, bad, good, bad: at ease for a moment, and then we suffer.
You schoolteachers are a mold for forming people, so you should turn toward the direction of the Dhamma and practice the Dhamma.
Behave yourselves in a way that can be an example for others.
You're like a mold for making Buddha amulets.
Have you ever seen one?
Just a single mold: They carve it well, carving the face, the eyebrows, the chin so that they aren't crooked or missing anything, so that the Buddha amulets they stamp out of it will come out beautiful.
And when they come out they really are beautiful because of that one good mold.
It's the same with schoolteachers, who are molds for their students and for people at large.
You have to make yourselves beautiful in terms of the personal qualities of a good teacher.
You always have to behave in line with your ethical discipline and the pattern of a leader and guide.
Abandon all forms of intoxication and unskillful behavior.
Try to restore high standards of morality.
You have to be a good example to the children.
Children are like vines.
Wherever a vine sprouts up, it has to look for a tree to climb up.
If one tree is centimeters away and another meters away, which tree do you think the vine will climb up?
It'll climb up the nearest tree.
It's probably not going to climb up the tree meters away because that one is too far off.
In the same way, schoolteachers are the people closest to their students.
They're the people who children are most likely to take as examples.
So it's essential that you schoolteachers have good manners and standards of behavior — in terms of what you should do and should abandon — for children to see.
Don't teach them just with your mouths.
The way you stand, the way you walk, the way you sit — your every movement, your every word — you have to make into a teaching for the children.
They'll follow your example because children are quick to pick things up.
They're quicker than adults.
Lots of people come here with a high position in society and views about things: about themselves, about the practice of meditation, about the Buddha's teachings.
Some of them are wealthy merchants, some have degrees, some are teachers or government officials.
Their brains are full of views about all kinds of things.
They're too clever to listen to other people.
It's like water in a cup.
If the cup is full of dirty water, it can't be used for anything.
Only when you pour out the water can the cup be put to use.
You have to empty your mind of views before you can learn.
Our practice steps beyond both cleverness and stupidity.
If you think, “I'm smart.
I'm rich.
I'm important.
I understand all the Buddha's teachings clearly,” you'll never see the truth of anatta, or not-self.
You'll have nothing but self — me and mine.
But the Buddha's teachings are the abandoning of self.
Emptiness.
Freedom from suffering.
Total disbanding.
That's nibbana.
If a mango is five meters off the ground and we want it, we can't use a ten-meter picking pole to pick it, because it's too long.
We can't use a two-meter picking pole either, because it's too short.
Don't go thinking that a person with a PhD.
has an easy time practicing the Dhamma because he knows so much.
Don't go thinking that way.
Sometimes people with a PhD.
are too long.
The teachings I've given you today: If listening to this Dhamma has made your mind empty and still, that's good enough.
You don't have to memorize anything.
Some of you may not believe this.
If you make your mind still and then allow whatever you hear to pass by, pass by, but you keep on contemplating, you're like a tape recorder.
Whenever it's open like this, turned on like this, it's all right here.
Don't be afraid that there won't be anything.
Every time you open your recorder, turn on your recorder, everything's right there.
External recorders can run down.
After you've bought them, they can run down.
But your inner recorder, when things go straight to the heart: Oh, it's really good.
It's there all the time, and it doesn't use up your batteries.
In the Buddha's time, there were those who broke through to the highest level of Dhamma while sitting and listening to the Dhamma.
They were fast.
Like a balloon: The air in the balloon has the force to push itself out.
As soon as you prick it just a little bit with a needle, it all comes gushing out at once.
It's the same here.
When you hear Dhamma in line with your propensities, it turns your views upside down, from this to that, and you can break through to the genuine Dhamma.
An ox that's been pulling a loaded wagon a long way — the closer the sun lowers to the horizon and evening comes on, the faster it walks, because it wants to reach its destination quickly.
It misses its home.
We human beings, the older we get, the sicker we get, the closer we are to dying: That's the time when you have to practice.
You can't make old age and illness an excuse not to practice, or else you'll just be worse than an ox.
Each of us here is the same.
We're no different from one another.
We have no teacher at present — for if you're going to awaken to the Dhamma, the heart has to teach itself.
If it doesn't teach itself, then no matter how much you have other people teach you, it won't listen, it won't understand.
The heart itself has to be the teacher.
It's not easy for us to see ourselves.
It's hard.
So think about this a little bit.
We've all done evil.
Now that we're old, we should stop.
Make it lighter.
Make it less.
There's really nothing else.
This is all there is.
Turn your minds in the direction of virtue.
Water is different from oil, just as smart people are different from stupid people.
The Buddha lived with sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas, but he was an arahant, so he saw these things as “just that,” that's all.
He kept on letting go, ever since he saw that the heart was just that — the heart, that's all; thoughts were just that — thoughts, that's all.
He didn't mix them together.
If you can think in this way, if you can feel in this way, you can keep these things separate.
Thoughts and feelings are on one side, the heart is on another side, just as water and oil in the same bottle stay separate.
Once you've been ordained in the Buddha's teachings, you've been supposed into being a monk.
But you're not yet a genuine monk, you know.
You're a monk as far as your body: the shaved head, the yellow robes.
You're a monk on the level of supposition.
It's the same as when they carve wood, sculpt cement, or mold bronze to be a Buddha on the level of supposition.
It's not the genuine Buddha.
Those who are still monks just on the level of supposition — in other words, they still have greed, anger, and delusion in their hearts: These things keep us fenced into states of becoming and birth.
The reason we can't reach peace is because of greed, anger, and delusion.
If you take the greed, anger, and delusion out of your heart, you'll reach purity.
You'll reach genuine monk-ness — which means being a monk in your heart.
It's good to make the mind pure and at peace, but it's hard.
You have to start with the externals — your bodily actions and words — and work your way in.
The path that leads to purity, to being a contemplative, is a path that can wash away greed, anger, and delusion.
You have to exercise restraint and self-control, which is why it's hard — but so what if it's hard?
It's like taking wood to make a table or make a chair.
It's hard, but so what if it's hard?
The wood has to go through that process.
Before it can become a table or a chair, we have to go through the coarse and heavy stages.
It's the same with us.
We have to become skillful where we aren't yet skillful, admirable where we aren't yet admirable, competent where we aren't yet competent.
When lots of us come to live together, it's easy to practice if our views are correct and in line with one another.
When we're willing to bend and abandon our pride in the same way, we all come together at the level of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha.
You can't say that having a lot of monks interferes with your practice.
It's kind of like a millipede.
A millipede has lots of legs.
When you look at it, you think that it's sure to get all confused with so many legs.
But it walks.
It walks back and forth, and there's really no confusion.
It has its rhythm, its order.
It's the same with the Buddha's teachings: If you practice like a disciple of the Buddha, it's easy.
In other words, you practice rightly, practice straightforwardly, practice to gain release from suffering, and practice correctly.
Even if there are hundreds of us, thousands of us, however many of us, it doesn't matter.
We can all fall into the same current.
Our routines give us lots of strength.
Wherever in the monastery you can do them — regardless of whether it's your own hut or someone else's: If it's dirty or messy, straighten it out.
You don't have to do it for anyone's sake.
You don't have to do it to impress anyone.
You do it for the sake of your practice.
When we sweep our huts, sweep our buildings, it's as if we sweep all the dirty things out of our hearts, because we're people who practice.
I want each of us to have this attitude in our hearts.
Then we won't have to ask for harmony or cooperation.
It'll already be there.
The Buddha our Teacher said that the way things go is up to them.
If we stick with our effort in the practice, we can't control whether it'll go quickly or slowly.
It's like planting a pepper tree.
The tree knows what it's doing.
If we want it to grow fast, we have to know that that's an affair of delusion.
If we want it to grow slowly, we have to know that that's an affair of delusion.
Only when we actually plant it will we get the fruit that we want.
When we plant a pepper tree, our duty is to dig the hole, give the tree water, give it fertilizer, get rid of the insects for it.
That's all.
That's what depends on us, depends on our conviction.
As for whether the peppers will appear or not, that's up to the tree.
It's not up to us.
We can't pull on the tree to make it grow.
Virtue, concentration, and discernment: These three things the Buddha called a path.
The path isn't the religion, and it's not what the Buddha really wanted, but they're the way we get there.
It's the same as your coming from Bangkok to Wat Nong Pah Pong.
You didn't want the road coming here.
You wanted to reach the monastery instead.
But the road was needed for you to get here.
The road coming here isn't the monastery.
It's just the road to the monastery.
You have to follow the road to get to the monastery.
Virtue, concentration, and discernment are the road to peace, which is what we really want.
…It's like a doctor handing a bottle of medicine to a patient with a fever.
On the outside of the bottle is a label telling the different diseases the medicine can cure.
As for the medicine that cures the diseases, it's inside the bottle.
If the patient spends all his time reading the label — even if he reads it a hundred times, a thousand times — he'll end up dying and never get any benefit out of the medicine.
He'll then go around making a big fuss, complaining that the doctor is bad, the medicine can't cure the diseases it's claimed to cure, even though he never opened the cap on the bottle to take the medicine.
The practice is like a man rubbing fire sticks together.
He's heard people say, “Take two pieces of bamboo and rub them together, and you'll get fire.” So he takes two pieces of bamboo and rubs them together.
But his heart is impatient.
After rubbing them together a bit he wants there to be fire.
His heart keeps pushing for the fire to come quickly, but the fire just won't come.
He starts getting lazy, so he stops to rest.
Then he tries rubbing the sticks together again for a little bit, and then stops to rest.
Whatever warmth there was disappears, because the warmth isn't connected.
If he keeps acting like this, stopping whenever he gets tired — although just being tired isn't so bad: His laziness gets mixed in too, so the whole thing goes to pieces.
He decides that there is no fire, he doesn't want fire after all, so he gives up.
He stops.
He won't rub the sticks anymore.
Then he goes about announcing, “There is no fire.
You can't get it this way.
There is no fire.
I've already tried.
Practice is like a key, the key of meditation.
It doesn't matter what the lock is like, for we have the key to the lock in our hand.
We don't care how tight the lock may be, for whenever we turn the key to open the lock we accomplish our purpose.
If the lock doesn't have a key, we can't accomplish our purpose.
Whatever's locked in the box, we can't get it out.
…It's the same as wherever fire is burning, wherever it's hot, that's where it goes out.
Wherever it's hot, you make it cool right there.
In the same way, nibbana lies in the same place as samsara, the round of wandering-on; samsara lies in the same place as nibbana.
Just as hot and cold lie in the same place: Cold lies where it's hot.
When it gets hot, the cold disappears.
When it the cold disappears, it gets hot…
To practice is to go against the flow: against the flow of the currents in our heart, against the flow of defilement.
Anything that goes upstream against the flow is bound to be hard.
If you row a boat upstream, it's hard.
To build goodness and virtue is a little bit hard because we people have defilements.
We don't want to do it.
We don't want to be bothered.
We don't want to build endurance.
We want for the most part to let things flow in line with our moods.
Like water: It flows in line with its ways.
If we let things flow in line with the water, it's easy but it's not practice.
With practice you have to resist.
You have to resist defilement, resist your own heart, force your own heart, increase your powers of endurance.
That's when your practice will go against the flow.
Defilements are like cats.
If you give a cat something to eat whenever it wants, it'll keep coming back more and more often.
But the day will come when it'll scratch you if you don't feed it.
So you don't have to feed it.
It'll keep meowing and meowing, but if you don't feed it for a day or two, it'll stop coming back.
It's the same with the defilements.
If you don't feed them, they won't bother you.
Your mind can then settle down and be still.
Some people come and practice to get nothing but pleasure.
But what does pleasure come from?
What is its cause?
All forms of pleasure have to come following from pain.
Only then can there be pleasure.
Whatever we do: We have to work first before we get the wages to buy things, don't we?
We have to work in the fields before we get rice to eat.
Everything has to go through pain and suffering first.
Have you ever eaten sugarcane?
When you eat from the tip to the base, what is it like?
The closer you get to the base, the sweeter it becomes — to the point where even when there's only an inch left, you don't want to throw it away.
It seems such a waste.
The ants want to eat it but you won't let them have it.
So let your practice be like that.
Practice the Dhamma like a person eating sugarcane.
As for the practice, start out by establishing your powers of endurance and then contemplate.
Contemplate your activities, your comings and goings.
Contemplate what you're up to.
Whatever arises, the Buddha has us know all around.
Whatever direction things come in from, he has us know all around.
If we know all around, whatever comes in this way, we see it.
Whatever comes in that way, we see it.
Right we know.
Wrong we know.
Happy we know.
Glad we know.
We know all around.
But our minds, when they contemplate, aren't yet all around.
We know just this side but leave that side wide open.
It's like putting a fence around a field or around a house but it doesn't go all around.
If we put it up just on that side, thieves will come in this side, the side that the fence hasn't gone around.
Why is that?
We haven't closed the gate.
Our fence isn't yet good.
So it's normal that they'll have to come through that opening.
So we contemplate again, adding more fence, closing things off, continually.
Putting up a fence means establishing mindfulness and always being alert.
If we do this, the Dhamma won't go anywhere else.
It'll come right here.
Good and bad, the Dhamma we should see and should know, will arise right here.
In practicing, don't think that you have to sit in order for it to be meditation, that you have to walk back and forth in order for it to be meditation.
Don't think like that.
Meditation is simply a matter of practice.
Whether you're giving a sermon, sitting here listening, or going away from here, keep up the practice in your heart.
Be alert to what's proper and what's not.
Don't decide that it's okay to observe the ascetic practices during the Rains retreat and then drop them when the retreat is over.
It's not okay.
Things don't balance out in that way.
It's like clearing a field.
We keep cutting away, cutting away, and then stop to rest when we're tired.
We put away our hoe and then come back a month or two later.
The weeds are now all taller than the stumps.
If we try to clear away the area we cleared away before, it's too much for us.
Ajaan Mun once said that we have to make our practice the shape of a circle.
A circle never comes to an end.
Keep it going continually.
Keep the practice going continually without stop.
I listened to him and I thought, “When I've finished listening to this talk, what should I do?
The answer is to make your alertness akaliko: timeless.
Make sure that the mind knows and sees what's proper and what's not, at all times.
The Buddha taught that this is the way the mind and body are.
This is the way they'll continue to be.
They won't be any other way.
In other words, at first they arise, then they grow old, then they hurt, and then they die.
This is such a genuine truth, grandma, that you're experiencing in the present.
It's a noble truth.
So look at it with discernment in order to see it, that's all.
Even if fire burns your house, even if water floods your home, have it go only as far as the house, only as far as your home.
If fire burns, don't let it burn your heart.
If water floods, don't let it flood your heart.
Let it flood just the house.
Let it burn just the house, which is something that lies outside your body.
As for your heart, have it let go, for now's the proper time.
It's time to let go.
Practice by letting go.
Don't hold on.
Or if you hold on, don't hold on tight.
Do you understand not holding on?
This glass here: We hold on to it to pick it up and look at it.
When we know all about it, we put it down.
That's called not holding on — in other words, holding on but not holding on tight.
You hold on to take a look and to know, and then you put it down.
You're at ease.
It's the same with this…
I came to live in a monastery, ordained as a novice, when I was nine.
I kept trying to practice, but I didn't understand much of anything in those days.
I came to understand only when I was ordained as a monk.
Oho!
I saw the fear in everything.
I looked at the sensuality with which people live, and instead of seeing it as fun as they did, I saw it more as suffering.
It's like a custard banana.
When we eat it, it's nice and sweet.
We know the sweetness of its taste.
But if we know that someone put poison in that banana, we don't care how sweet it is if we know that we'll die when we eat it, right?
That's the way my views always were.
As I was about to eat, I'd always see the poison placed inside it.
That's how I kept pulling further and further away, to the point where I've stayed ordained for these many years.
Once you see, that sort of thing doesn't tempt you to eat.
There have been some scholarly monks who've researched in the texts, who have studied a lot.
I tell them to give the meditation a try.
This matter of going by the book: When you study, you study in line with the texts, but when you go into battle, you have to go outside of the texts.
If you simply fight in line with the texts, you'll be no match for the enemy.
When things get serious, you have to go outside of the texts.
Those who study the texts and those who practice the Dhamma tend to misunderstand each other.
Those who study the texts tend to say, “Monks who do nothing but practice simply speak in line with their views.” They say that without any evidence of any kind.
There's actually a way in which both sides are the same thing, which helps us to understand things better.
It's like the palm of your hand and the back of your hand.
When you stick your hand out straight ahead of you, it's as if the palm has disappeared.
But actually it hasn't disappeared anywhere.
It's just hidden underneath.
In the same way, when you turn your hand palm-up, the back of your hand disappears.
But actually it hasn't disappeared anywhere.
It's just underneath.
You should remember this when you contemplate practicing.
If you think that your practice has dwindled away, you stop studying and set your hopes on getting results.
But no matter how much you've studied the Dhamma, you won't understand because you don't yet know in line with the truth.
Once you understand the true nature of the Dhamma, you begin to let go.
This is a willingness to strip away attachments, where you don't hold on to anything anymore.
Or if you do hold on, it'll gradually grow less and less.
This is the difference between study and practice.
Stop.
Put your scholarly knowledge in a bundle or a trunk.
Don't bring it out to speak.
You can't bring that kind of knowledge into here.
Here it's a new kind of knowledge.
When things actually arise, it's not the same sort of thing.
It's like writing the word, “greed.” When greed arises in the heart, it's not the same as the written word.
The same when you're angry: When you write “anger” on the blackboard, it's one thing.
It's letters.
When it arises in the heart, it's too fast for you to read anything.
It comes up in the heart all at once.
This is important.
Very important.
…It's the same with dependent co-arising.
“Ignorance is the condition for fabrications.
Fabrications are the condition for consciousness.
Consciousness is the condition for name and form.” We've studied this and memorized it, and it's true, the way the Buddha has divided things up like this for students to study.
But when these things actually arise, they're too fast for you to count.
It's like falling from the top of a tree — thump!
— to the ground.
We don't know which branches we've passed.
The moment the mind is struck by a good object, if it's something it likes, it goes straight to “good.” It doesn't know the connecting steps in between.
They follow in line with the texts, but they also go outside of the texts.
They don't say, “Right here is ignorance.
Right here is fabrication.
Right here is consciousness.
Right here is name and form.” They don't have signs for you to read.
It's like falling out of a tree.
The Buddha talks about the mental moments in full detail, but I use the comparison with falling out of a tree.
When you slip out of a tree — thump!
— you don't measure how many feet and inches you've fallen.
All you know is you've crashed to the ground and are already hurting.
Exercising the body to strengthen it and exercising the mind to strengthen it are the same sort of thing, but the methods are different.
In exercising the body, you have to move the different parts, but in exercising the mind you make it stop and rest, as when you do concentration.
Try to get the mind to let go of everything.
Don't let it think about this, that, or anything at all.
Get it to stay with one object.
It'll then gain strength.
Discernment will arise.
It's like having a knife that you've kept well sharpened.
If you just keep on using it to cut stones, cut bricks, cut grass, cut without choosing, the knife will lose its edge.
Make sure you practice every day, every day.
When you feel lazy, keep doing it.
When you feel diligent, keep doing it.
Practice the Dhamma whether it's day or night.
When the mind is at peace, keep doing it.
When it isn't at peace, keep doing it.
It's like when you were a child learning how to write.
At first the letters didn't look pretty.
Their bodies were too long; their legs were too long.
You wrote like a child.
With time, though, the letters looked better because you practiced.
Concentration and discernment have to go together.
In the first stage, the mind will go into peace and quiet through the methods of concentration.
The mind will be able to stay quiet only when you sit with your eyes closed.
That's tranquility.
You have to depend on concentration as a foundation to help give rise to discernment or insight in the end.
Then the mind will stay quiet whether you're sitting with your eyes closed or walking in the middle of a frenzied city.
It's the same as this: Once you were a child.
Now you're an adult.
The child and the adult are the same person.
In the same way, you could say that tranquility and insight are separate things.
Or like food and excrement: You can say that they're the same thing, but looking from another angle you can say that they're different.
Meditation is like a stick.
Insight lies on this end of the stick.
Tranquility lies on that end of the stick.
If you lift this stick up, will one end of the stick come up with it, or will both ends come up?
If you lift it up, both ends will come up with it.
Whatever's insight, whatever's tranquility, it's all this mind.
Success in the practice is connected with discernment: insight meditation, where discernment and the mind stay together.
Some people don't have to do very much and yet these things come together on their own.
People with discernment don't have to do much at all.
Concentration is like being an artist.
You look at something and you understand it.
You understand it until it stays there in your heart.
You can paint a picture out of what's in your heart.
You don't have to sit right there in front of it and paint it from sight.
The person who doesn't understand is the one who has to sit there sketching until it seeps into his heart.
With discernment you don't have to sit there and sketch.
You look and you understand.
You can paint straight from your understanding.
That's the way it is.
The object of your tranquility meditation, if it's not in line with your character, won't give rise to dispassion or chastened dismay.
The object in line with your character is the one you find yourself thinking about often.
We don't usually notice this, but we should notice this to get some benefit out of it.
It's like lots of different foods arranged on a tray.
You taste the food from each bowl, each type of food, and you'll know for yourself which ones you like, which ones you don't.
The ones you like you'll say are more delicious than the others.
Here I'm speaking about the food.
You can compare it to your meditation.
Whichever object is in line with your character will feel comfortable.
The way to focus your mind on an object, to catch hold of the object, is to acquaint yourself with your mind and to acquaint yourself with your objects.
It's like the way men catch a lizard.
The lizard lies inside the hollow of a termite's nest with six holes.
The men close off five of the holes, leaving just one hole for the lizard to come out.
Then they sit there watching that one hole.
When the lizard comes out, they can catch it.
You focus on the mind in just the same way.
Close off your eyes, close off your ears, close off your nose, close off your tongue, close off your body, and leave just the mind open.
In other words, exercise restraint over your senses and focus just on the mind.
Meditation is like men catching a lizard.
You focus your mind on the breath, being mindful and careful to be aware.
Whatever you're doing, be alert to what you're doing.
The feeling that arises in the mind at that moment is that you're alert to what you're doing.
That feeling is what makes you aware.
Start out by contemplating your own mind.
Always be careful to look after your five precepts.
If you make a mistake, stop, come back, and start over again.
Maybe you'll go astray and make another mistake.
When you realize it, come back, start over again, each and every time.
Your mindfulness will gain a higher frequency, like water poured from a kettle.
If we tilt the kettle just a little, the water comes out in drops: glug… glug… glug.
There are breaks in the flow.
If we tilt the kettle a little bit more, the drops become more frequent: glug-glug-glug.
If we tilt the kettle even further the glugs disappear and the water turns into a continuous stream.
There are no more drops, but they didn't go anywhere.
They're so frequent that they've turned into a continuous stream of water.
They've become so frequent that they're beyond frequency.
They meld into one another in a stream of water.
…It's the same with the practice.
When we keep watch over our mind, when awareness keeps watch over its own mind, whoever keeps track of the mind will escape from Mara's snares.
It's like keeping herd on a water buffalo:
one, rice plants;
two, buffalo;
three, buffalo's owner.
The buffalo wants to eat the rice plants.
The rice plants are what the buffalo wants to eat.
The mind is like the buffalo.
Its objects are like the rice plants.
Awareness is like the buffalo's owner.
When we keep herd on a buffalo, we have to follow it to make sure it doesn't eat the rice plants.
We let it loose, but we try to keep watch over it.
If it gets near the rice plants, we yell at it.
When the buffalo hears us, it'll back off.
But we can't be complacent.
At the very least, don't take a nap in the middle of the day.
If you take a nap in the middle of the day, the rice plants will be all gone for sure.
The mind is like the buffalo.
Its objects are like the rice plants.
Awareness is like the buffalo's owner.
What do you do when you keep herd on a buffalo?
You let the buffalo loose, but you try to keep watch over it.
If it gets near the rice plants, you yell at it.
When the buffalo hears you, it'll back off.
But you can't be complacent.
If it's stubborn and won't listen to you, you have to take a heavy stick and really beat it.
And then where do you think it'll go?
…So in this practice we're told to sit.
That's the practice of sitting.
And then you keep watching.
There will be good moods and bad moods all mixed together in line with their normal nature.
Don't simply praise your mind; don't simply punish it.
Have a sense of time and place with it.
When the time comes to praise it, give it a little praise — just enough, don't spoil it.
It's like teaching a child.
Sometimes you have to spank it.
Take a small switch and spank it.
You can't not spank it.
In other words, you have to punish it sometimes.
But you can't keep punishing it all the time.
If you punish it all the time, it'll simply go astray.
If you keep on giving it pleasure, keep on giving it rewards, it won't be able to get anywhere.
The standard way to sit in concentration is to sit with your legs crossed, right leg on top of the left leg, right hand on top of the left hand.
Sit up straight.
Some people say you can do it walking, you can do it sitting, so can you do it kneeling?
Sure — but you're beginning students.
When you learn how to write, you have to practice making clear letters first, with all their parts.
Once you understand your letters and you're writing just for yourself to read, you can write in a scrawl if you want.
It's not wrong.
But you have to learn the standard form first.
Sit watching your in-and-out breath.
Stay relaxed and comfortable, but don't let yourself get distracted.
If you're distracted, stop.
Look to see where the mind went and why it isn't following the breath.
Go looking for it and bring it back.
Get it to keep running along with the breath, and one of these days you'll come across something good.
But keep on doing what you're doing.
Do it as if you're not expecting to get anything from it, nothing will happen, you don't know who's doing it — but you keep on doing it.
It's like taking rice from the granary and sowing it on the ground.
It looks like you're throwing it away.
You scatter it all over the ground as if you're not interested in it.
But it'll turn into sprouts and plants.
You put the plants in the paddies, and in return you get to eat rice treats.
That's just how it goes.
Sometimes the breath isn't right.
It's too long, too short, and it puts you in a frenzy.
That's because you're fixing your mind too strongly on it, you're squeezing it too much.
It's like teaching a child how to sit.
If you beat it every time, will it become intelligent?
You're controlling it too much.
It's the same here.
Think about it: When you walk from your house to your orchard, or from your house to your workplace, why aren't you irritated by the breath?
Because you don't grab hold of it.
You leave it alone in line with its affairs.
The parts of the body that hurt are because you focus and fix your mind on them too strongly.
Watch the breath.
Focus on the breath.
Gather the mind at the breath.
In other words, make it aware at the breath in the present.
You don't have to be aware of a lot of things.
Focus on inclining the mind, inclining the mind, to get more and more refined, more and more refined, continually, continually, until the feeling of the breath is very subtle, and the mind is extremely awake.
Any pains that arise in the body will gradually grow still, gradually grow still.
Eventually you'll be watching the breath like a relative who's come to visit you.
You go with him to send him off at the bus station or the boat dock.
You accompany him to the bus, to the boat.
Once they start up the motor, the bus or boat goes running off, and you stand there watching it go off into the distance.
When your relative has gone, you go back home.
It's the same with watching the breath.
When the breath is coarse, we know.
When it's refined, we know.
As it gets more and more refined, we keep watching, watching, following it, inclining the mind, inclining the mind, making the mind more and more awake, letting the breath grow more and more refined.
Eventually the breath will grow so subtle that there's no more in-and-out breath.
There's just a sense of “awake.
If you're forgetful for a minute, you're crazy for a minute.
If your mindfulness lapses two minutes, you're crazy for two minutes.
If it lapses for half a day, you're crazy for half a day.
That's how it is.
Mindfulness means keeping something in mind.
When you do or say anything, you have to remember to be alert.
When you're doing something, you're alert to what you're doing.
Keeping this in mind is like having things for sale in your house.
You keep watch over your things, over the people coming to buy your things, and over the thieves coming to steal your things.
If you always keep track of these things, you'll know what each person is coming for.
When you keep your weapon in your hands like this — in other words, you keep watching — then when thieves see you, they won't dare do anything to you.
It's the same with the objects of the mind.
If you're mindful and alert, they won't be able to do anything to you.
You know: A good object like this won't put you in a good mood forever.
It's not for sure.
It can disappear at any time.
So why should you hold onto it?
“I don't like this”: It's not for sure.
When this is the case, objects are simply null and void, that's all.
We keep teaching ourselves this way, we keep being mindful, we keep looking after ourselves continually: by day, by night, whatever the time.
Make your mind aware and awake.
Keep looking after it.
If anyone comes to visit, wave them away.
There's no place for them to sit, for there's only one seat.
Try to sit here receiving visitors all day long.
This is what's meant by “buddho.” Stay firmly right here.
Keep this awareness going so that it can look after the mind.
As you sit right here, all the visitors that have been coming to visit since way back when — when you were born little and tiny — will come right here where you “buddho” all by yourself.
As for the guests, the visitors that come wandering by, fabricating all kinds of different things, you let them go along in line with their own issues.
The act of the mind's going along with them is called a cetasika.
Whatever it is, wherever it's going, who cares?
Just acquaint yourself with the visitors who want to come and stay.
You have only one seat to receive them, so you put one person there all the time.
The others will have no place to sit.
Now when they come here and talk to you, they don't get to sit down anymore.
The next time they come, whenever they come, they keep finding the person sitting here who never goes away.
How many more times will they keep on coming if all they get to do is talk to you?
You'll get to know them all, all those who've been coming since way back when you were first aware of things.
They'll all come to visit.
When mindfulness and the mind in charge come together, there's a kind of feeling.
If the mind is ready to be at peace, it'll be caged in a peaceful place, like a chicken we've put into a cage.
The chicken doesn't leave the cage but it can walk back and forth in the cage.
Its walking back and forth is no problem, for it's walking back and forth in the cage.
The feelings of the mind when we use mindfulness to keep it at peace, the feelings in that peaceful place, aren't anything that will stir us up.
In other words, when it feels, when it thinks, let it feel within the peace.
It's no problem.
It's as if a mischievous child is having some fun, irritating us until we have to yell at it and spank it.
We have to understand that that's simply the nature of the child.
When you understand this, you can let the child go ahead and play.
Your sense of bother and irritation will disappear because you're willing to accept the nature of the child.
That's how your feelings about the matter change.
When we accept the nature of things, we can let them go, leave them alone.
Our mind can be peaceful and cool.
This means that we understand correctly.
We have right view.
That's the end of the problems we have to solve.
Remember this: All the objects of the mind, regardless of whether they're things you like or things you don't like, are like poisonous cobras.
If they attack and bite you, you can die.
Objects are like cobras whose poison is fierce.
The objects we like have lots of poison.
The objects we don't like have lots of poison.
They can keep the mind from being free.
They can make it go astray from the principles of the Buddha's Dhamma.
Objects and moods of the mind are like cobras whose poison is fierce.
If nothing gets in the way of the cobra, it slithers along in line with its nature.
Even though it contains poison, it doesn't show it.
It doesn't cause us any danger because we don't get near it.
The cobra just goes along in line with its cobra affairs.
It keeps going that way.
If you're intelligent, you leave everything alone.
You leave good things alone; you leave bad things alone; you leave the things you like alone, in the same way you leave a poisonous cobra alone.
You let it slither along on its way.
It slithers along even though it contains poison.
Try to see these things clearly in yourself: That's called paccattam.
Whatever outside object comes in and makes contact, it'll always be paccattam without stop.
To put it in simple terms, it's like firing charcoal or bricks.
Have you ever seen a kiln for firing charcoal or bricks?
They build a fire about a meter outside the mouth of the kiln, and the kiln draws the smoke and the fire inside itself.
Look at it in that way.
It's clear in that way.
This is a comparison.
If you build your kiln for firing charcoal or bricks in the right way, to the right specifications, you build a fire about a meter or a meter and a half outside the mouth of the kiln.
When the smoke starts coming up, it'll all get drawn into the kiln, without any left outside.
The heat goes in, builds up in the kiln, and doesn't escape outside.
The heat goes in and burns things very quickly.
That's the way it is.
The same with the feelings of a person who practices: There's a feeling that everything gets drawn into being right view.
The eye sees forms, the ear hears sounds, the nose smells aromas, the tongue tastes flavors, and all of them get drawn into being right view.
There will be a contact that gives rise to discernment that way continually at all times.
Use your stillness to contemplate sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas that make contact, regardless of whether they're good or bad, happy or sad.
It's as if a person has climbed a mango tree and is shaking it so that the mangoes fall to the ground.
We're under the tree, gathering up the mangoes.
We don't take the ones that are rotten.
We take only the ones that are good.
It doesn't waste our strength because we haven't climbed the mango tree.
We just pick up what's on the ground.
I got a good example from watching spiders.
A spider makes a web like a net.
It weaves its web and spreads it at different openings.
I once sat and contemplated one.
It hung up its web like a movie screen, and when it was done it curled itself up quietly right in the middle of the web.
It didn't run around.
As soon as a fly or another insect flew into its web, the web would vibrate.
As soon as the web vibrated, the spider came running out of its place and caught the insect for food.
When it was finished, it curled itself up in the middle of the web as before.
It didn't matter what kind of insect got caught in its web, a bee or whatever: As soon as the web vibrated, the spider ran out to catch it.
Then it would go back and hold on, quiet in the middle of the web where no one could see it, every time.
Seeing the spider act in this way, I came to an understanding.
The six sense spheres are the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
The mind stays in the middle.
The eye, ear, nose, tongue, and body are spread out like a net.
Sense objects are like insects.
As soon as a sight comes to the eye, or a sound to the ear, an aroma to the nose, a taste to the tongue, or a tactile sensation to the body, the mind is what knows.
Things vibrate right to the mind.
Just this is enough to give rise to an understanding.
We can live by curling up inside, just as the spider curls up on its web.
We don't have to go anywhere.
When insects run into the net and it vibrates to the heart, then as soon as we're aware we go out and catch the insects.
Then we return to our original place
After watching the spider, you can apply what you've learned to your mind.
It's the same sort of thing.
If the mind sees inconstancy, stress, and not-self, it's spread wide open.
It's no longer the owner of happiness, no longer the owner of suffering, for it sees clearly in this way.
It gets the point.
Whatever you do, you're at ease.
You don't want anything else anymore.
Your meditation can do nothing but progress.
I'll give you a simple example.
It's like wild chickens.
We all know what wild chickens are like.
There's no animal in the world more wary of human beings.
When I first came to this forest, I taught the wild chickens.
I observed them and learned many lessons from them.
At first only one of them would come past me while I was doing walking meditation.
When it came close, I didn't look in its direction.
Whatever it did, I didn't look in its direction.
I didn't make any movement that would startle it.
After a while I tried stopping still and looking at it.
As soon as my eyes hit it, it ran right off.
When I stopped looking at it, it would start scratching in the dirt, looking for food as before.
But every time I looked at it, it would run right away.
After a little while it probably came to notice how quiet I was, so it let down its guard.
But as soon as I tossed some rice in its direction, it ran right off.
But I didn't care.
I just kept tossing some rice out for it.
After a while it would come back, but it didn't dare eat the rice.
It didn't know what it was.
It thought I was planning to kill it and curry it.
But I didn't care whether it ate or not.
After a while it started scratching around in the dirt right there.
It probably began to get a sense of what the rice was.
The next day it came back to the same place and got to eat rice again.
When the rice was gone, I tossed out some more for it.
It ran off again.
But when I kept doing this again and again, it got so that it would walk off only a little way and then come right back and eat the rice.
That's when it understood.
At first the chicken saw the rice as an enemy because it wasn't acquainted with it.
It didn't see it clearly.
That's why it kept running off.
But as it grew more tame, it came back to see what the rice actually was.
That's when it knew, “This is rice.
This isn't an enemy.
It's not dangerous.” That's how the wild chickens here came to eat rice from that day up to the present.
In this way I learned a lesson from the wild chickens.
We're just like them.
Sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas are means for giving us knowledge of the Dhamma.
They give lessons to anyone who practices.
If we see them clearly in line with the truth, we'll see that that's how they are.
If we don't see them clearly, they'll always be our enemies, and we'll keep running away from them all the time.
Let me give you an example.
Suppose you have a pet monkey at home.
It doesn't sit still.
It likes to jump around and grab hold of this and that — all kinds of things.
That's how monkeys are.
Now you come to the monastery.
We have a monkey here too, and this monkey doesn't stay still either.
It jumps around and grabs things just the same, but it doesn't irritate you, does it?
Why?
Because you've had a monkey.
You know what monkeys are like.
“The one at my home is just like your monkey here at the monastery.
Your monkey is just like my monkey.
They're the same monkey.” If you know just one monkey, no matter how many provinces you go to, no matter how many monkeys you see, they don't irritate you, right?
That's someone who understands monkeys.
If we understand monkeys then we won't become monkeys.
If you don't understand monkeys, then as soon as you see a monkey, you become a monkey yourself, right?
When you see it grabbing this and that, you think, “Grrr!” You get angry and irritated.
“That damned monkey!” That's someone who doesn't understand monkeys.
Someone who understands monkeys sees that the monkey at home and the monkey at Wat Tham Saeng Phet are the same monkey, so why should they irritate you?
When you see that that's what monkeys are like, that's enough.
You can be at peace.
If the monkey runs around, it's only the monkey running.
You don't become a monkey too.
You're at peace.
If it jumps in front of you and behind you, you don't get irritated by the monkey.
Why?
Because you understand monkeys, and so you don't become a monkey.
If you don't understand monkeys, you get irritated.
When you get irritated, you become a monkey — understand?
This is how things grow calm.
When we know sense objects, observe sense objects: Some are likable, some are not, but so what?
That's their business.
That's what they're like.
Just like monkeys.
All monkeys are the same monkey.
We understand sense objects.
Sometimes they're likable, sometimes they're not.
That's what they're like.
We have to get acquainted with them.
When we're acquainted with them, we let them go.
Sense objects aren't for sure.
They're all inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
We keep looking at them in that way.
When the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind receive objects coming in, we know them, just like seeing monkeys.
This monkey is just like the monkey at home.
Then we can be at peace.
Craving and desire lead us to suffering.
But if we contemplate, our contemplation leans out from craving.
It contemplates craving, and it pulls on the craving, shakes it up, so that it goes away or lessens on its own.
It's like a tree.
Does anyone tell it what to do?
Does anyone give it hints?
You can't tell it what to do.
You can't make it do anything.
But it leans over and pulls itself down.
When you look at things in this way, that's Dhamma.
Mindfulness and alertness are like two people lifting a heavy log.
A third person is watching and when he sees that the log is heavy, he comes to help.
When it's heavy like that, he can't not help.
He has to help.
The person helping here is discernment.
It can't stay still.
When there's mindfulness and alertness, discernment has to run in and join them.
It's like putting water in a bottle and giving it to someone to drink.
Once he's finished drinking it, he'll have to come back and ask for more — for the water isn't water in a spring.
It's water in a bottle.
But if you show the spring to the person and tell him to get water there, he can sit there and keep on drinking water and won't ask you for any more, for the water never runs out.
It's the same when we see inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
It goes deep, for we really know, we know all the way in.
Ordinary knowledge doesn't know all the way in.
If we know all the way in, it never grows stale.
Whatever arises, we know it correctly — and things disband.
We know correctly without stop.
Have you ever seen flowing water?
Have you ever seen still water?
If your mind is peaceful, it's like still, flowing water.
Have you ever seen still, flowing water?
There!
You've only seen flowing water and still water.
You've never seen still, flowing water.
Right there, right where your thinking can't take you: where the mind is still but can develop discernment.
When you look at your mind, it'll be like flowing water, and yet still.
It looks like it's still, it looks like it's flowing, so it's called still, flowing water.
That's what it's like.
That's where discernment can arise.
It's like cutting a log, throwing it into a canal, and letting it flow along with the water in the canal.
If it doesn't get worm-eaten, doesn't rot, doesn't get smashed, doesn't get snagged on this bank or that bank, it'll keep flowing down the canal.
I'm convinced that it'll ultimately reach the ocean.
It's the same with us.
If we practice in line with the Lord Buddha's way, if we follow the path he taught, if we correctly follow the current, we have to avoid two things.
Which two?
The two extremes that the Buddha said contemplatives shouldn't get seriously involved with.
The first is sensual indulgence.
The second is self-torment.
These are the two banks of the canal, of the river.
The log flowing down the river, following the current of the water, is our mind.
Suffering and mental stress aren't for sure.
They're inconstant.
Keep this point in mind.
When these things arise, we know them right now and we let them go.
This strength of mind will gradually see more and more.
When it's grown more resilient, it can suppress defilements extremely fast.
As time passes, whatever arises right here disbands right here, like waves on the sea coming ashore.
As soon as they reach the shore they simply dissolve.
A new wave comes and it dissolves too.
It can't go beyond the shore.
Inconstancy, stress, and not-self are the shore of the sea.
As for the sense objects that come passing in, that's all there is to them.
…But when the mind sees and knows everything, it doesn't carry the Dhamma along with it.
Like this saw: They're going to use it to cut wood.
When all the wood is cut and everything is done, they put the saw away.
They don't need to use it anymore.
The saw is the Dhamma.
We have to use the Dhamma to practice the paths leading to the fruitions.
When the job is done, we put the Dhamma that's there away.
Like a saw used to cut wood: They cut this piece, cut that piece.
When they're finished cutting, they put the saw away here.
When that's the case, the saw has to be the saw; the wood has to be the wood.
This is called reaching the point of stopping, the point that's really important.
That's the end of cutting wood.
We don't have to cut wood, for we've cut enough.
We take the saw and put it away.
From time immemorial, man has been preoccupied with the pursuit of happiness in life, from the cradle to the grave.
He works and struggles very hard to attain happiness, very often without knowing exactly what happiness means because of his ignorance of the nature of life.
Although all religions provide advice and guidelines for their adherents to practice in order to attain happiness in life, more often than not, these advices and guidelines are ignored owing to man's craving, hatred and illusion.
Many people who experienced frustrations and sufferings hope and pray to find happiness for present life and here after; others, though enjoying a large measure of happiness on earth, are still not contented and crave for eternal bliss in heaven after leaving this world.
For the ordinary man, as for the child, it is difficult to make a distinction between happiness and pleasure.
To him, that which gives pleasure give happiness, and to be happy is to experience pleasure.
Very often, we consider childhood days to be a period of happiness.
In reality, as children we do not understand what happiness is.
Under the protection of our parents, we pass our days in a perpetual round of enjoyment which undoubtedly gives us pleasure.
As we enter adolescence, changes take place in the mind and physical body causing us to become aware of the existence of the opposite sex and we begin to experience a new kind of attraction giving rise to disturbing emotions.
At the same time, curiosity drives us to find out about the facts of life, through peer discussion and book reading.
Before long, we find ourselves on the threshold of adulthood, the crucial time in our life when we look for a suitable life-partner to begin a relationship that will put to the test all the qualities that we have acquired earlier in life.
Love, sex, and marriage then become matters of great importance that will determine the quality of the married life we will have.
Young people today are exposed to a large variety of “Western” influences which are disseminated through the mass media such as books and magazines, television, video cassettes and movies, resulting in the acquisition of distorted ideas regarding love, sex, and marriage.
The age-old “Eastern” moral virtues and values are being gradually eroded in the face of these influences.
Practices unheard of and never carried out by the older generation have become common place among young people today.
Are the “Western” influences really responsible for this state of affairs or should the parents be blamed for the misdeeds of their children for not exercising proper control and supervision over them?
In this book, it is explained that most television programs and movies do not represent the way most decent people in the West think or behave and that there is a vast “silent majority” of decent couples who are as deeply religious and “conservative” about love, sex and marriage as any “Eastern” couple.
If young people want to ape the West, they are advised to ape this “silent majority” who are no different from their decent neighbor who lives next door to them.
Modern life is fraught with all kinds of tension and stress.
Doubtless, very often it is tension and stress that creates problems in many a marriage.
If a proper analysis is made into the root causes of such social problems as pre-marital sex, teenage pregnancies, unhappy marriages and divorces, child-abuse and wife-battering, we inevitably discover that it is due mainly to selfishness and lack of patience, tolerance and mutual understanding.
In the Sigalovada Sutta, the Buddha gives good advice on how to maintain peace and harmony in the home between husband and wife in order to achieve a happy married life.
Parental responsibilities for children and the children's duties toward parents are also clearly mentioned in the Sutta as useful guidelines for the attainment of a happy home.
In this book, the Ven.
Author stresses the important point that marriage is a partnership of two individuals and that this partnership is enriched and enhanced when it allows the personalities involved to grow.
In the Buddhist perspective, marriage means understanding and respecting each other's beliefs and privacy.
The present time is most opportune for a book of this nature to be published to provide the followers of the Buddhist religion, in particular the young, with a clear understanding of life's important matters like love, sex and marriage which will not only help them to live a happy married life but also assist them to lead peaceful and contented lives.
On behalf of the Buddhist Missionary Society I wish to express our sincere gratitude and appreciation to many of our devoted members for all the help and services rendered in the preparation of this book.
Our special thanks are due to: Mr.
Vijaya Samarawickrama for undertaking the editorial work, Mr.
Teh Thean Choo, Miss Quah Pin Pin and Mrs.
Chong Hong Choo for their valuable assistance and Mr.
Paw Oo Thett of Burma for the cover design.
From the Buddhist point of view, marriage is neither holy nor unholy.
Buddhism does not regard marriage as a religious duty nor as a sacrament that is ordained in heaven.
A cynic has said that while some people believe that marriage is planned in heaven, others say that it is recorded in hell also!
Marriage is basically a personal and social obligation, it is not compulsory.
Man and woman must have freedom either to get married or to remain single.
This does not mean that Buddhism is against marriage.
Nobody in this world would say that marriage is bad and there is no religion which is against marriage.
Practically all living things come into being as a result of sex life.
Among human beings, the institution of marriage has come about so that society guarantees the perpetuation of the human species and also ensures that the young would be cared for.
This is based on the argument that children born through the pleasure of sex must be the responsibility of the partners involved, at least until they have grown up.
And marriage ensures that this responsibility is upheld and carried out.
A society grows through a network of relationships which are mutually inter-twined and inter-dependent.
Every relationship is a whole-hearted commitment to support and to protect others in a group or community.
Marriage plays a very important part in this strong web of relationships of giving support and protection.
A good marriage should grow and develop gradually from understanding and not impulse, from true loyalty and not just sheer indulgence.
The institution of marriage provides a fine basis for the development of culture, a delightful association of two individuals to be nurtured and to be free from loneliness, deprivation and fear.
In marriage, each partner develops a complementary role, giving strength and moral courage to one another, each manifesting a supportive and appreciative recognition of the other's skill in caring and providing for a family.
There must be no thought of either man or woman being superior — each is complementary to the other; marriage is a partnership of equality, gentleness, generosity, calm and dedication.
In Buddhism, one can find all the necessary advice which can help one to lead a happy married life.
One should not neglect the advice given by the Enlightened Teacher if one really wants to lead a happy married life.
In His discourses, the Buddha gave various kinds of advice for married couples and for those who are contemplating marriage.
The Buddha has said, “If a man can find a suitable and understanding wife and a woman can find a suitable and understanding husband, both are fortunate indeed.
There are different kinds of love, and these are variously expressed as motherly love, brotherly love, sensual love, emotional love, sexual love, selfish love, selfless love, and universal love.
If people develop only their carnal or selfish love towards each other, that type of love cannot last long.
In a true love relationship, one should not ask how much one can get, but how much one can give.
When beauty, complexion and youth start to fade away, a husband who considers only the physical aspects of love may think of acquiring another young one.
That type of love is animal love or lust.
If a man really develops love as an expression of human concern for another being, he will not lay emphasis only on the external beauty and physical attractiveness of his partner.
The beauty and attractiveness of his partner should be in his heart and mind, not in what he sees.
Likewise, the wife who follows Buddhist teachings will never neglect her husband even though he has become old, poor or sick.
“I have a fear that the modern girl loves to be Juliet, to have a dozen Romeos.
She loves adventure…..
The modern girl dresses not to protect herself from wind, rain and sun, but to attract attention.
She improves upon nature by painting herself and looking extraordinary.
— Gandhi
Sex by itself is not “evil,” although the temptation and craving for it invariably disturbs the peace of mind, and hence is not conducive to spiritual development.
In the ideal situation, sex is the physical culmination of a deeply satisfying emotional relationship, where both partners give and take equally.
The portrayal of love by commercial groups through the mass media in what we call “western” culture is not “real” love.
When an animal wants to have sex, it shows its “love,” but after having experienced sex, it just forgets about love.
For animals, sex is just an instinctive drive necessary for procreation.
But a human being has much more to offer in the concept of love.
Duties and responsibilities are important ingredients to maintain unity, harmony and understanding in a relationship between human beings.
Sex is not the most important ingredient for happiness in a married life.
Those who have become slaves to sex would only ruin love and humanity in marriage.
Apart from that, a woman must cease to consider herself as the object of a man's lust.
The remedy is more in her hand than in a man's.
She must refuse to adorn herself simply to please a man, even if he is her husband.
If she wants to be an equal partner with a man, she should dress so that her dignity is enhanced, and she does not become a sex symbol.
Marriage for the satisfaction of the sexual appetite is no marriage.
It is concupiscence.

Love may indeed be a product of sex, but the reverse is likewise true: sex is an expression of love.
In the ideally happy married life, both love and sex are inseparable.
We can study the Buddha's teaching regarding the feelings that man and woman have for each other.
The Buddha says that he had never seen any object in this world which attracts man's attention more than the figure of a woman.
At the same time the main attraction for the woman is the figure of a man.
It means that by nature, woman and man give each other worldly pleasure.
They cannot gain happiness of this kind from any other object.
When we observe very carefully, we notice that among all the things which provide pleasure, there is no other object that can please all the five senses at the same time beside the male and female figures.
The ancient Greeks knew this when they said that originally man and woman were one.
They were separated and the two parts that were divided are constantly seeking to be re-united as man and woman.
Young people by nature like to indulge in worldly pleasures which can include both good and bad things.
Good things, like the enjoyment of music, poetry, dance, good food, dress and similar pursuits do no harm to the body.
They only distract us from seeing the fleeting nature and uncertainty of existence and thereby delay our being able to perceive the true nature of the self.
The faculties and senses of young people are very fresh and alert; they are very keen to satisfy all the five senses.
Almost everyday, they plan and think out ways and means to experience some form of pleasure.
By the very nature of existence, one will never be completely satisfied with whatever pleasure one experiences and the resultant craving in turn only creates more anxieties and worries.
When we think deeply about it, we can understand that life is nothing but a dream.
In the end, what do we gain from attachment to this life?
Only more worries, disappointments and frustrations.
We may have enjoyed brief moments of pleasure, but in the final analysis, we must try to find out what the real purpose of our lives is.
When one ceases to crave for sensual pleasure and does not seek to find physical comfort in the company of others, the need for marriage does not arise.
Suffering and worldly enjoyment are both the outcome of craving, attachment and emotion.
If we try to control and suppress our emotions by adopting unrealistic tactics we create disturbances in our mind and in our physical body.
Therefore we must know how to handle and control our human passion.
Without abusing or misusing this passion, we can tame our desires through proper understanding.
John J.
Robinson in his book Of Suchness gives the following advice on love, sex and married life.
“Be careful and discreet; it is much easier to get married than unmarried.
If you have the right mate, it's heavenly; but if not, you live in a twenty-four-hour daily hell that clings constantly to you, it can be one of the most bitter things in life.
Life is indeed strange.
Somehow, when you find the right one, you know it in your heart.
It is not just an infatuation of the moment.
But the powerful urges of sex drive a young person headlong into blind acts and one cannot trust his feelings too much.
This is especially true if one drinks and get befuddled; the most lousy slut in a dark bar can look like a Venus then, and her charms become irresistible.
Love is much more than sex though; it is the biological foundation between a man and a woman; love and sex get all inter-twined and mixed up.
Almost everyday we hear people complaining about their marriages.
Very seldom do we hear stories about a happy marriage.
Young people reading romantic novels and seeing romantic films often conclude that marriage is a bed of roses.
Unfortunately, marriage is not as sweet as one thinks.
Marriage and problems are interrelated and people must remember that when they are getting married, they will have to face problems and responsibilities that they had never expected or experienced hitherto.
People often think that it is a duty to get married and that marriage is a very important event in their lives.
However, in order to ensure a successful marriage, a couple has to harmonize their lives by minimizing whatever differences they may have between them.
Marital problems prompted a cynic to say that there can only be a peaceful married life if the marriage is between a blind wife and a deaf husband, for the blind wife cannot see the faults of the husband and a deaf husband cannot hear the nagging of his wife.
One of the major causes of marital problems is suspicion and mistrust.
Marriage is a blessing but many people make it a curse due to lack of understanding.
Both husband and wife should show implicit trust for one another and try not to have secrets between them.
Secrets create suspicion, suspicion leads to jealously, jealousy generates anger, anger causes enmity and enmity may result in separation, suicide or even murder.
If a couple can share pain and pleasure in their day-to-day life, they can console each other and minimize their grievances.
Thus, the wife or husband should not expect to experience only pleasure.
There will be a lot of painful, miserable experiences that they will have to face.
They must have the strong will power to reduce their burdens and misunderstandings.
Discussing mutual problems will give them confidence to live together with better understanding.
Man and woman need the comfort of each other when facing problems and difficulties.
The feelings of insecurity and unrest will disappear and life will be more meaningful, happy and interesting if there is someone who is willing to share another's burden.
When two people are in love, they tend to show only the best aspects of their nature and character to each other in order to project a good impression of themselves.
Love is said to be blind and hence people in love tend to become completely oblivious of the darker side of each other's natures.
In practice, each will try to highlight his or her sterling qualities to the other, and being so engrossed in love, they tend to accept each other at “face value” only.
Each lover will not disclose the darker side of his or her nature for fear of losing the other.
Any personal shortcomings are discreetly swept under the carpet, so to speak, so as not to jeopardize their chances of winning each other.
People in love also tend to ignore their partner's faults thinking that they will be able to correct them after marriage, or that they can live with these faults, that “love will conquer all.
However, after marriage, as the initial romantic mood wears off, the true nature of each other's character will be revealed.
Then, much to the disappointment of both parties, the proverbial veil that had so far been concealing the innermost feelings of each partner is removed to expose the true nature of both partners.
It is then that disillusion sets in.
Love by itself does not subsist on fresh air and sunshine alone.
The present world is a materialistic world and in order to meet your material needs, proper financing and budgeting is essential.
Without it, no family can live comfortably.
Such a situation aptly bears out the saying that “when poverty knocks at the door, love flies through the window.” This does not mean that one must be rich to make a marriage work.
However, if one has the basic necessities of life provided through a secure job and careful planning, many unnecessary anxieties can be removed from a marriage.
The discomfort of poverty can be averted if there is complete understanding between the couple.
Both partners must understand the value of contentment.
Both must treat all problems as “our problems” and share all the “ups” and “downs” in the true spirit of a long-standing life partnership.
The Anguttara Nikaya contains some valuable advice which the Buddha gave to young girls prior to their marriage.
Realizing that there could be difficulties with the new in-laws, the girls were enjoined to give every respect to their mothers-in-law and fathers-in-law, serving them lovingly as their own parents.
They were expected to honor and respect their husband's relatives and friends, thus creating a congenial and happy atmosphere in their new homes.
They were also advised to study and understand their husbands' natures, ascertain their activities, characters and temperaments, and to be useful and cooperative at all times in their new homes.
They should be polite, kind and watchful of their husbands' earnings and see to it that all household expenditures were properly administered.
The advice given by the Buddha more than twenty five centuries ago is still valid even today.
In view of what has been said about “birth and suffering,” some people have criticized Buddhism saying that is against married life.
They are wrong.
The Buddha never spoke against married life.
However, he pointed out all the problems, difficulties and worries that people would have to face when they take on the responsibility of marriage.
Just because he warned one against problems in marriage does not mean that the Buddha condemned marriage.
The act of marriage itself implies that a person is still more attached to the physical world and since our mental faculties are influenced by craving, attachment and human emotions, it is but natural that problems would arise.
This happens when we have to consider the need of others and to give in to what others need.
A deep analysis of the nature of self is important to help us to understand the origin of our problems, worries, miseries and how to overcome them.
Here, religious advice is important for maintaining a tranquil life.
However, a man should not become a slave to any religion.
Man is not for religion, religion is for man.
That means man must know how to make use of religion for his betterment and for his happiness in a respectable way.
Simply by following certain religious vows, precepts or commandments with blind faith or by force, thinking that we are duty-bound to observe them will not develop proper understanding.
One important aspect of Buddhism is that the Buddha did not impose any religious laws or commandments.
The Buddha was a unique teacher who had set out a number of disciplinary codes for us to uphold according to our way of life.
Those who follow the precepts observe them voluntarily but not as obligatory religious laws.
It is up to us to follow the advice through our own understanding and experience of what is good for us and for others.
Through trial and error, we will learn to follow the advice which will give us just peace and happiness.
One should try to understand the nature of the worldly life.
By knowing that you have to face problems, you will be able to strengthen your mind and be more prepared to face the problems that could arise if you get married.
Religion is important to help you overcome your problems.
Whatever you learned about religious principle when you were young can be adopted to avoid misunderstanding, disappointment and frustration.
At the same time, certain good qualities such as patience and understanding which we learned through religion are important assets to help us to lead a peaceful married life.
Normally, it is due to a lack of mutual understanding that many married couples lead miserable lives.
The result of this is that their innocent children also have to suffer.
It is better to know how to handle your problems in order to lead a happy married life.
Religion can help you to do this.
One of the causes of greatest concern among those who do not belong to the non-semitic religions is the problem of conversion before marriage.
While Buddhists and Hindus never demand that a couple must belong to the same religion before a marriage can be solemnized, many others tend to take advantage of this tolerance.
Marriage, contrary to what many romantic novels say, does not mean the total and absolute merging of two people to the extent that each loses his or her own identity.
When a religion demands that both partners must have the same religious label, it denies the basic human right of an individual to believe what he or she wants.
Societies throughout history have proved that “Unity in Diversity” is not only possible but desirable.
Out of diversity comes greater respect and understanding.
This should apply to marriage also.
There are many living examples all over the world where the husband and wife maintain their own beliefs and yet are able to maintain their happy married life without confronting each other.
Buddhists do not oppose the existence of other religions even within the same household.
Unfortunately this generous attitude has been exploited by unscrupulous religionists who are out to gain converts by all means.
Intelligent Buddhists must be aware of this stratagem.
No self-respecting intelligent human being who really understands what he believes according to his own conviction should give up his beliefs merely to satisfy the man-made demands of another religion.
Buddhists do not demand that their partners embrace Buddhism.
Neither should they surrender their own beliefs.
When young people are in love, they are prepared to make many sacrifices so long as they can get married.
But after a few years, when the real task of building a successful marriage begins, frustrations begin to set in.
When a partner who had given up his deep-seated religious beliefs for “love” begins to regret having done so, unnecessary misunderstandings arise.
These provide added tensions at a period when there is boredom in a marriage.
There will be quarrels.
And normally, one of the main causes of these quarrels will be the question of which religion the children should belong to.
Therefore, it is most important for one to know that if there is a process of conversion involved, it must be based on true conviction and not mere convenience or compulsion.
Buddhists maintain the freedom of the individual to choose.
This principle should be respected by all.
There is no specific Buddhist ritual or procedure to conduct a marriage.
Buddhism recognizes the traditions and cultures practiced by people in different countries.
Hence, Buddhist religious ceremonies differ from one country to another.
In general practice, a religious service for blessing and to give advice to the couple is customarily performed either in the temple or at home to give a greater significance to the marriage.
Nowadays, in many countries, besides the blessing service, religious organizations also have been given the authority to solemnize and register marriages together with the issuance of legal marriage certificates.
By and large, the most important point is that the couple should be utterly sincere in their intention to cooperate with and understand each other not only during times of happiness but also whenever they face difficulties.
In the past, there was no such thing as a legal registration of marriages.
A man and woman mutually decided to accept each other as husband and wife and thereafter they lived together.
Their marriage was carried out in the presence of the community, and separation was rare.
The most Important thing was that they developed real love and respected their mutual responsibilities.
A legal registration of marriage is important today to ensure security and to safeguard property and children.
Due to the sense of insecurity, a couple performs legal marriages to ensure that they are legally bound not to neglect their duties and not to ill-treat each other.
Today, some couples even draw up a legal contract on what would happen to their property if they are divorced!
According to Buddhist teaching, in a marriage, the husband can expect the following qualities from his wife:
In return, the wife's expectation from husband is:
Apart from these emotional and sensual aspects, the couple will have to take care of day-to-day living conditions, family budget and social obligations.
Thus, mutual consultations between the husband and wife on all family problems would help to create an atmosphere of trust and understanding in resolving whatever issues that may arise.
In advising women about their role in married life, the Buddha appreciated that the peace and harmony of a home rested largely on a woman.
His advice was realistic and practical when he explained a good number of day-to-day characteristics which a woman should or should not cultivate.
On diverse occasions, the Buddha counseled that a wife should:
In the days of the Buddha, other religious teachers also spoke on the duties and obligations of a wife towards her husband — stressing particularly on the duty of a wife bearing an off-spring for the husband, rendering faithful service and providing conjugal happiness.
Some communities are very particular about having a son in the family.
They believe that a son is necessary to perform their funeral rites so that their after-life will be a good one.
The failure to get a son from the first wife, gives a man the liberty to have another wife in order to get a son.
Buddhism does not support this belief.
According to what the Buddha taught about the law of Karma, one is responsible for one's own action and its consequences.
Whether a son or a daughter is born is determined not by a father or mother but the karma of the child.
And the well-being of a father or grandfather does not depend upon the action of the son or grandson.
Each is responsible for his own actions.
So, it is wrong for men to blame their wives or for a man to feel inadequate when a son is not born.
Such Enlightened Teachings help to correct the views of many people and naturally reduce the anxiety of women who are unable to produce sons to perform the “rites of the ancestors.
Although the duties of a wife towards the husband were laid down in the Confucian code of discipline, it did not stress the duties and obligations of the husband towards the wife.
In the Sigalovada Sutta, however, the Buddha clearly mentioned the duties of a husband towards the wife and vice versa.
The Buddha, in reply to a householder as to how a husband should minister to his wife declared that the husband should always honor and respect his wife, by being faithful to her, by giving her the requisite authority to manage domestic affairs and by giving her befitting ornaments.
This advice, given over twenty five centuries ago, still stands good for today.
Knowing the psychology of the man who tends to consider himself superior, the Buddha made a remarkable change and uplifted the status of a woman by a simple suggestion that a husband should honor and respect his wife.
A husband should be faithful to his wife, which means that a husband should fulfill and maintain his marital obligations to his wife thus sustaining the confidence in the marital relationship in every sense of the word.
The husband, being a bread-winner, would invariably stay away from home, hence he should entrust the domestic or household duties to the wife who should be considered as the keeper and the distributor of the property and the home economic-administrator.
The provision of befitting ornaments to the wife should be symbolic of the husband's love, care and attention showered on the wife.
This symbolic practice has been carried out from time immemorial in Buddhist communities.
Unfortunately it is in danger of dying out because of the influence of modern civilization.
In the past, since the social structure of most communities was different from that we find today, a husband and wife were interdependent on each other.
There was mutual understanding, and the relationship was stable because each knew exactly what his or her role was in the partnership.
The “love” that some husbands and wives try to show others by embracing each other in public does not necessarily indicate true love or understanding.
In the past, although married couples did not express their love or inner feeling publicly, they had a deep even unspoken understanding and mutual respect for each other.
The ancient customs which people had in certain countries that the wife must sacrifice her life after her husband's death and also the custom which prevents a widow from remarrying is foreign to Buddhism.
Buddhism does not regard a wife as being inferior to a husband.
Some women feel that for them to concentrate on the upbringing of the family is degrading and conservative.
It is true that in the past women had been treated very badly, but this was due more to the ignorance on the part of men than the inherent weakness in the concept of depending on women to bring up children.
Women have been struggling for ages to gain equality with men in the field of education, the professions, politics and other avenues.
They are now at par with men to a great extent.
The male generally tends to be aggressive by nature and the female more emotional.
In the domestic scene, particularly in the East, the male is more dominant as head of the family whilst the female tends to remain as passive partner.
Please remember, “passive” here does not mean “weak.” Rather it is a positive quality of “softness” and “gentleness.” If man and woman maintain their masculine and feminine qualities inherited from nature and recognize their respective strengths, then, that attitude can contribute towards a congenial mutual understanding between the sexes.
Gandhi's remarks:
“I believe in the proper education of woman.
But I do believe that woman will not make her contribution to the world by mimicking or running a race with man.
She can run the race, but she will not rise to the great heights she is capable of by mimicking man.
She has to be the complement of man.
The basis of all human society is the intricate relationship between parent and child.
A mother's duty is to love, care and protect the child, even at extreme cost.
This is the self-sacrificing love that the Buddha taught.
It is practical, caring and generous and it is selfless.
Buddhists are taught that parents should care for the child as the earth cares for all the plants and creatures.
Parents are responsible for the well-being and up-bringing of their children.
If the child grows up to be a strong, healthy and useful citizen, it is the result of parents' efforts.
If the child grows up to be a delinquent, parents must bear the responsibility.
One must not blame others or society if children go astray.
It is the duty of parent to guide children on the proper path.
A child, at its most impressionable age, needs the tender love, care and attention of parents.
Without parental love and guidance, a child will be handicapped and will find the world a bewildering place to live in.
However, showering parental love, care and attention does not mean pandering to all the demands of the child, reasonable or otherwise.
Too much pampering would spoil the child.
The mother, in bestowing her love and care, should also be strict and firm in handling the tantrums of a child.
Being strict and firm does not mean being harsh to the child.
Show your love, but temper it with a disciplined hand — the child will understand.
Unfortunately, amongst present-day parents, parental love is sadly lacking.
The mad rush for material advancement, the liberation movements and the aspiration for equality have resulted in many mothers joining their husbands, spending their working hours in offices and shops, rather than remaining at home tending to their off-spring.
The children, left to the care of relations or paid servants, are bewildered on being denied tender motherly love and care.
The mother, feeling guilty about her lack of attention, tries to placate the child by giving in to all sorts of demands from the child.
Such an action spoils the child.
Providing the child with all sorts of modern toys such as tanks, machine guns, pistols, swords and such like equipment as an appeasement is not psychologically good.
Loading a child with such toys is no substitute for a mother's tender love and affections.
Devoid of parental affection and guidance, it will not be surprising if the child subsequently grows up to be a delinquent.
Then, who is to be blamed for bringing up a wayward child?
The parents of course!
The working mother, especially after a hard day's work in an office to be followed by household chores, can hardly find time for the child that is yearning for her care and attention.
Parents who have no time for their children should not complain when these same children have no time for them when they are old.
Parents who claim that they spend a lot of money on their children but are too busy should not complain when their “busy” children in turn leave them in expensive Homes for the Aged!
Most women work today so that the family can enjoy more material benefits.
They should seriously consider Gandhi's advice for men to seek freedom from greed rather than freedom from need.
Of course, given today's economic set-up we cannot deny that some mothers are forced to work.
In such a case, the father and mother must make extra sacrifices of their time to compensate for what their children miss when they are away.
If both parents spend their non-working hours at home with their children, there will be greater understanding between parents and children.
In his discourses, the Buddha has listed certain primary duties and functions as essential guidelines for parents to observe.
One of the primary guidelines is, by precept, practice and action, to lead the children away from things that are evil and through gentle persuasion, to guide them to do all that is good for the family, for society and for the country.
In this connection, parents would have to exercise great care in dealing with their children.
It is not what the parents profess but what they really are and do, that the child absorbs unconsciously and lovingly.
The child's entry to the world is molded by emulating parental behavior.
It follows that good begets good and evil begets evil.
Parents who spend much time with their children will subtly transmit their characteristics to their offspring.
It is the duty of parents to see to the welfare of their children.
In fact the dutiful and loving parents shoulder the responsibilities with pleasure.
To lead children on the right path, parents should first set the example and lead ideal lives.
It is almost impossible to expect worthy children from unworthy parents.
Apart from the Karmic tendencies children inherit from previous births, they invariably inherit the defects and virtues of parents too.
Responsible parents should take every precaution not to transmit undesirable tendencies to their progeny.
According to the Sigalovada Sutta, there are five duties that should be performed by parents:
Home is the first school, and parents are the first teachers.
Children usually take elementary lessons in good and evil from their parents.
Careless parents directly or indirectly impart an elementary knowledge of lying, cheating, dishonesty, slandering, revenge, shamelessness and fearlessness for evil and immoral activities to their children during childhood days.
Parents should show exemplary conduct and should not transmit such vices into their children's impressionable minds.
Parents are the teachers at home; teachers are the parents in school.
Both parents and teachers are responsible for the future well-being of the children, who become what they are made into.
They are, and they will be, what the adults are.
They sit at the feet of the adults during their impressionable age.
They imbibe what they impart.
They follow in their footsteps.
They are influenced by their thoughts, words and deeds.
As such it is the duty of the parents to create the most congenial atmosphere both at home and in the school.
Simplicity, obedience, cooperation, unity, courage, self-sacrifice, honesty, straightforwardness, service, self-reliance, kindness, thrift, contentment, good manners, religious zeal and other kindred virtues should be inculcated in their juvenile minds by degrees.
Seeds so planted will eventually grow into fruit-laden trees.
A decent education is the best legacy that parents can bequeath to their children.
A more valuable treasure there is not.
It is the best blessing that parents could confer on their children.
Education should be imparted to them, preferably from youth, in a religious atmosphere.
This has far-reaching effects on their lives.
Marriage is a solemn act that pertains to the whole lifetime; this union should be one that cannot be dissolved easily.
Hence, marriage has to be viewed from every angle and in all its aspects to the satisfaction of all parties before the wedding.
According to Buddhist culture, duty supersedes rights.
Let both parties be not adamant, but use their wise discretion and come to an amicable settlement.
Otherwise, there will be mutual cursing and other repercussions.
More often than not the infection is transmitted to progeny as well.
Parents not only love and tend their children as long as they are still in their custody, but also make preparations for their future comfort and happiness.
They hoard up treasures at personal discomfort and ungrudgingly give them as a legacy to their children.
Buddhism is the religion of compassion, and the parents should never forget to present it to the children as such.
The Buddha taught the Dhamma out of compassion for the world.
Parents should practice the “Four Sublime States of Mind” taught by the Buddha in raising their children.
They are:
These four states, well practiced will help parents remain calm throughout the difficult period of child-rearing.
This is the right or ideal way of conduct towards living beings.
These four attitudes of mind provide the framework for all situations arising from social contact.
They are the great removers of tension, the great peacemakers in social conflict, the great healers of wounds suffered in the struggle for existence; levelers of social barriers, builders of harmonious communities, awakeners of slumbering magnanimity long forgotten, revivers of joy and hope long abandoned, promoters of human brotherhood against the forces of egotism.
Perhaps the greatest challenge that a married couple has to face is the proper upbringing of a child.
This is another aspect which distinguishes us from animals.
While an animal does care for its offspring with great devotion, a human parent has a greater responsibility, which is the nurturing of the mind.
The Buddha has said that the greatest challenge a man faces is to tame the mind.
Ever since a child is born, from infancy through adolescence to maturity, a parent is primarily responsible for the development of a child's mind.
Whether a person becomes a useful citizen or not depends mainly on the extent to which its mind has been developed.
In Buddhism, a good parent can practice four great virtues to sustain him or her and to overcome the great frustrations which are so closely related with parenthood.
When a child is yet a toddler, unable to express its needs, it is quite prone to indulge in tantrums and crying.
A parent who practices the first virtue of loving kindness can maintain peace within herself or himself to continue to love the child while it is being so difficult.
A child who enjoys the effects of this loving kindness will himself learn to radiate it spontaneously.
As the child becomes more mature as an adolescent, parents should practice karuna or Compassion towards him.
Adolescence is a very difficult time for children.
They are coming to terms with adulthood and therefore are rebellious, with a great deal of their anger and frustrations directed at their parents.
With the practice of Compassion, parents will understand that this rebelliousness is a natural part of growing up and that children do not mean to hurt their parents willfully.
A child who has enjoyed loving kindness and compassion will himself become a better person.
Having not had hate directed at him, he will only radiate love and compassion towards others.
Just before he becomes an adult, a child will probably meet with some success in examinations and other activities outside the home.
This is the time for parents to practice sympathetic joy.
Too many parents in modern society use their children to compete with their associates.
They want their children to do well for selfish reasons; it is all because they want others to think well of them.
By practicing sympathetic joy, a parent will rejoice in the success and happiness of his or her child with no ulterior motive.
He is happy simply because his child is happy!
A child who has been exposed to the effects of sympathetic joy will himself become a person who does not envy others and who is not overly competitive.
Such a person will have no room in his heart for selfishness, greed or hatred.
When a child has reached adulthood and has a career and family of his own, his parents should practice the last great virtue of equanimity.
This is one of the most difficult things for Asian parents to practice.
It is hard for them to allow their children to become independent in their own right.
When parents practice equanimity, they will not interfere with the affairs of their children and not be selfish in demanding more time and attention than the children can give.
Young adults in the modern society have many problems.
An understanding parent of a young couple should not impose extra burdens by making unnecessary demands on them.
Most importantly, elderly parents should try not to make their married children feel guilty by making them feel that they have neglected their filial obligations.
If parents practice equanimity they will remain serene in their old age and thereby earn the respect of the younger generation.
When parents practice these four virtues towards their children, the children will respond favorably and a pleasant atmosphere will prevail at home.
A home where there is loving kindness, compassion, sympathetic joy and equanimity will be a happy home.
Children who grow up under such an environment will grow up to be understanding, compassionate, willing workers and considerate employers.
This is the greatest legacy any parent can give to his child.
One of the saddest things about modern society is the lack of parental love which children in highly industrialized countries suffer from.
When a couple gets married, they usually plan to have a number of children.
And once the child is born, parents are morally obliged to care for him to the best of their ability.
Parents are responsible to see that a child is not only satisfied materially; the spiritual and psychological aspects are very important too.
The provision of material comfort is of secondary importance when compared to the provision of parental love and attention.
We know of many parents from the not-so-well-to-do families who have brought up their children well and with plenty of love.
On the other hand, many rich families have provided every material comfort for their children but have deprived them of parental love.
Such children will just grow up devoid of any psychological and moral development.
A mother should consider carefully whether she should continue to be a working mother of a housewife giving all the affection and care for the well-being of her child.

The modern trend and attitude of working mothers towards their children also tends to erode the time-honored filial piety which children are expected to shower on their parents.
The replacement of breast-feeding by bottle feeding could also be another factor which has contributed to the erosion of the affection between mother and child.
When mothers breast-feed and cuddle babies in their arms, the tender affection between mother and child is much greater and the influence the mother had on the child for its well-being, is much more pronounced.
Under such circumstances, filial piety, family cohesion and obedience are invariably present.
These traditional traits are for the good and well-being of the child.
It is up to the parents, especially the mother, to provide them.
The mother is responsible for the child's being good or wayward.
Mothers can reduce delinquency!
Many parents try to keep their married children under their control.
They do not give due freedom to them and tend to interfere with a young married couple's life.
When parents try to control their married son or married daughter and want them to follow their way of life strictly, this will create a lot of misunderstanding between the two generations as well as unhappiness between the couple.
Parents may be doing it in good faith due to love and attachment towards the children, but in so doing, they are inviting more problems to themselves and to the children.
Parents must allow their children to shoulder the responsibilities of their own lives and families.
For example: if some seeds are dropped under a tree, plants might grow after sometime.
But if you want those plants to grow healthy and independent you must transplant them to open ground somewhere else to grow separately, so that they are not hampered by the shade of the parent tree.
Parents should not neglect the ancient wisdom based on advice given by religious teachers, wise people and elders who have developed a knowledge of the world through their own trial and errors.
Divorce is a controversial issue among the followers of different religions.
Some people believe that marriage is already recorded in heaven, thus it is not right to grant a divorce.
But, if a husband and wife really cannot live together, instead of leading a miserable life and harboring more jealousy, anger and hatred, they should have the liberty to separate and live peacefully.
However, the separation of the couple must be done in an atmosphere of understanding by adopting reasonable solutions and not by creating more hatred.
If a couple has children, they should try to make the divorce less traumatic for the children and help them to adjust to the new situation.
And it is most important to ensure that their future and welfare will be taken.
care of.
It is an inhuman attitude if the couple desert their children and allow them to lead a miserable life.
In Buddhism, there is no law stating that a husband and wife should not be separated if they cannot live together harmoniously.
But, if people follow the advice given by the Buddha to fulfill their duties towards each other, then, such unfortunate occurrences like divorce or separation will never happen in the first place.
In the past, where religious values were highly respected, there were greater efforts on the part of married couples — in the east as well as in west — to reach an amicable understanding to develop happy relationships based on respect, love, and regard for one another.
Couples developed and made their marriages an important feature which they cherished in their hearts.
Divorce cases were very rare, and were considered a disgrace because they indicated the selfishness of one party or the other.
It is a fact that until recently divorce cases were still rather rare in Buddhist countries.
This is mainly because couples considered their duties and obligations towards each other, and also basically divorce is not approved by the community as a whole.
In many cases, when married couples were in trouble, the community elders usually rallied round and played an important role to improve the situation.
Unfortunately, in the modern society of today, divorce has become such a common practice.
In certain countries it has even become fashionable.
Instead of regarding divorce as shameful or a failure to order their lives, some young couples seem to be proud of it.
The main cause of the failure in marriage in modern society is the abuse of freedom and too much independence and individualism on the part of the partners.
There must be a limit to their independent lives, or else both husband and wife will go astray very easily.
To the question of whether Buddhists can keep more than one wife, the direct answer is not available in the Buddha's teaching, because as mentioned earlier, the Buddha did not lay down any religious laws with regard to married life although he has given valuable advice on how to lead a respectable married life.
Tradition, culture and the way of life as recognized by the majority of a particular country must also be considered when we practice certain things pertaining to our lives.
Some religions say that a man can have only one wife whilst others say a man can have more than one wife.
Although the Buddha did not mention anything regarding the number of wives a man could have, he explicitly mentioned in His discourses that should a married man go to another woman out of wedlock, that could become the cause of his own downfall and he would have to face numerous other problems and disturbances.
The Buddha's way of teaching is just to explain the situation and the consequences.
People can think for themselves as to why certain things are good and certain things are bad.
The Buddha did not lay down rules about how many wives a man should or should not have which people are forced to follow.
However, if the laws of a country stipulate that marriages must be monogamous, then such laws must be complied with, because the Buddha was explicit about His followers respecting the laws of a country, if those laws were beneficial to all.
Some religions are not in favor of family planning.
They say it is against the will of God.
Buddhism does not interfere in this personal choice.
Man is at liberty to follow any method in order to prevent conception.
According to Buddhism, certain physical and mental conditions must be present for conception to take place.
When any one of these conditions is absent, no conception takes place, therefore a life does not come into being.
But after conception, abortion is NOT acceptable in Buddhism because it means taking away a life that is already present in the form of fetus.
Some people are interested in the moral implication or religious attitude with regard to test-tube babies.
If a woman is unable to conceive a baby in the normal way, and if she is anxious to have a baby by adopting modern medical methods, there is no ground in Buddhism to say that it is either immoral or irreligious.
Religions must give due credit to man's intelligence and to accommodate new medical discoveries if they are harmless and beneficial to mankind.
As was mentioned earlier, so long as the conditions are right, conception can be allowed to take place, naturally or artificially.
Premarital sex is a problem which is much discussed in modern society.
Many young people would like to know the opinion regarding this sensitive issue.
Some religionists say it can be considered as committing adultery, while others say it is immoral and unjustifiable.
In the past, young boys and girls were not allowed by their parents to move around freely until they were married.
Their marriages were also arranged and organized by the parents.
Of course, this did cause unhappiness in some cases when parents chose partners on the basis of money, social status, family obligations and related issues.
But generally, the majority of parents did try very hard to choose partners who would be acceptable to their children.
Today, young people are at the liberty to go out and find their own partners.
They have a lot of freedom and independence in their lives.
This is not a bad thing in itself, but some of these people are just too young and too immature to see the difference between sexual attraction and true compatibility.
That is why the problem of pre-marital sex arises.
Too much laxity in matters concerning sex has also given rise to social problems in modern society.
The sad part is that some societies do not express liberal attitudes towards unmarried mothers, illegitimate children and the divorcees while they are quite liberal about free sex.
As a result, young people are being punished by the same society which encourages free mixing of the sexes.
They become social outcasts and suffer much shame and humiliation.
Many young girls have become victims of their own freedom and have ruined their future by violating age-old traditions which were valued in the east as well as in the west.
Pre-marital sex is a modern development which has come about as a result of excessive social freedom prevalent amongst present day young people.
Whilst Buddhism holds no strong views either for or against such action, it is thought that all Buddhists, particularly people of both sexes in love and contemplating marriage, should adhere to the age-old traditional concept that they maintain chastity until the nuptial date.
The human mind is unstable and forever changing, with the result that any illicit action or indiscretion may cause undue harm to either party if the legal marriage does not take place as expected.
It must be remembered that any form of sexual indulgence before a proper marriage is solemnized will be looked down upon by the elders who are the guardians of the young people.
Laymen are advised in the Buddha's Teaching to avoid sexual misconduct.
That means, if one wants to experience sex, he must do so without creating any violence or by using any kind of force, threat or causing fear.
A decent sex life which respects the other partner is not against this religion; it accepts the fact that it is a necessity for those who are not yet ready to renounce the worldly life.
According to Buddhism, those who are involved in extra-marital sex with someone who is already married, who has been betrothed to someone else, and also with those who are under the protection of their parents or guardians are said to be guilty of sexual misconduct, because there is a rupture of social norms, where a third party is being made to suffer as a result of the selfishness of one or the other partner.
The Buddha also mentioned the consequences that an elderly man would have to face if he married without considering the compatibility of age of the other party.
According to the Buddha, irresponsible sexual behavior can become the cause of one's downfall in many aspects of life.
All the nations of the world have clearly defined laws concerning the abuse of sex.
Here again, Buddhism advocates that a person must respect and obey the law of the country if the laws are made for the common good.
The following are extracts from a book by the celebrated Japanese author, Dr.
Nikkyo Niwano.
In his book The Richer Life, Dr.
Niwano deals with matters relating to love and marriage, both from the Eastern and Western points of view.
“In the West, marriage on the basis of romantic love has often been considered natural and sometimes ideal.
In Asia, in recent years, the number of young people who abandon the traditional arranged marriage and select partners out of romantic consideration has been growing.
But in some cases, romantic marriages lead to separation and unhappiness within a short time, whereas the arranged marriage often produces a couple who live and work together in contentment and happiness.
In spite of its emotional appeal, all romantic marriages cannot be called unqualified successes.
Romantic love is like the bright flame of a wood-fire that leaps up and burns clear, but lasts only a short time.
Love between man and wife burns quietly and slowly like the warming fire of burning coal.
Of course, bright flaming Love can — and ideally ought to — eventually become the calm, enduring fire of mature affection.
But too often the flame of romantic love is quickly extinguished, leaving nothing but ashes, which are a poor foundation for a successful married life!
“Young people in love think of nothing but their emotions.
They see themselves only in the light of the feeling of the moment.
Everything they think and do is romantic and has little bearing on the practical affairs of the life they must lead after marriage.
If the lovers are fortunate enough to have compatible personalities, to have sound and similar ideas about life, to share interests, to enjoy harmonious family relations on both sides and to be financially secure even after the first passion has calmed down, they will still have a basis for a good life together.
If they are not so blessed, they may face marital failure.
“When the time of dates, emotional pictures, dances, and parties has passed, the young married couples will have to live together, share meals, and reveal to each other their defects as well as their merits.
They will have to spend more than half of their life each day together; this kind of living makes demands that are different from the less exacting needs of dating and first love.
“Family relations become very important in married life.
It is necessary to think about the personalities of the mother and father of the prospective marriage partner.
Young people sometimes think that the strength of their love will enable them to get along well with the most quarrelsome, difficult in-laws; but this is not always true.
In short, romance is a matter of a limited time and does not become rooted in actualities and must be regulated to conform to the needs of work and environment in order to bind the couple together in lasting devotion.
The two kinds of love are different.
To mistake one for the other invites grave trouble.
“Giving serious, dispassionate thought to the nature of the person one contemplates marrying, lessens the likelihood of failure.
To prevent romance from vanishing after marriage, mutual understanding between the couple is indispensable.
But the percentage of successful marriages is higher among young people whose choice of a partner agrees with the opinions of their parents.
To live peacefully, it is necessary to realize the difference between romance and married love.
Celibacy is refraining from the pleasure of sexual activity.
Some critics of Buddhism say that The Teaching goes against Nature and they claim that sex life is natural and therefore necessary.
Buddhism is not against sex, it is a natural sensual pleasure and very much a part of the worldly life.
One may ask, why then did the Buddha advocate celibacy as a precept?
Is it not unfair and against Nature?
Well, the observance of celibacy for spiritual development was not a new religious precept at the time of the Buddha.
All the other existing religions in India at that time also had introduced this practice.
Even today, some other religionists, like the Hindus and Catholics do observe this as a vow.
Buddhists who have renounced the worldly life voluntarily observe this precept because they are fully aware of the commitments and disturbances which come along if one commits oneself to the life of a family person.
The married life can affect or curtail spiritual development when craving for sex and attachment occupies the mind and temptation eclipses the peace and purity of the mind.
People tend to ask, “If the Buddha did not preach against married life, why then did He advocate celibacy as one of the important precepts to be observed and why did He advise people to avoid sex and renounce the worldly life?
One must remember that renunciation is not compulsory in Buddhism.
It is not obligatory to renounce the worldly life totally in order to practice Buddhism.
You can adjust your way of life according to your understanding by practicing certain religious principles and qualities.
You can develop your religious principles according to the needs of a lay life.
However, when you have progressed and attained greater wisdom and realize that the layman's way of life is not conducive for the ultimate development of spiritual values and purification of the mind, you may choose to renounce the worldly life and concentrate more on spiritual development.
The Buddha recommended celibacy because sex and marriage are not conducive to ultimate peace and purity of the mind, and renunciation is necessary if one wishes to gain spiritual development and perfection at the highest level.
But this renunciation should come naturally, and must never be forced.
Renunciation should come through a complete understanding of the illusory nature of the self, of the unsatisfactory nature of all sense pleasures.
The Buddha experienced his worldly life as a prince, husband and a father before his Renunciation and he knew what married life entailed.
People may question the Buddha's renunciation by saying that he was selfish and cruel and that it was not fair for him to desert his wife and child.
In actual fact, the Buddha did not desert his family without a sense of responsibility.
He never had any misunderstanding with his wife.
He too had the same love and attachment towards his wife and child as any normal man would have, perhaps even greater.
The difference was that his love was not mere physical and selfish love; he had the courage and understanding to detach that emotional and selfish love for a good cause.
His sacrifice is considered all the more noble because he set aside his personal needs and desires in order to serve all of mankind for all time.
The main aim of his renunciation was not only for his own happiness, peace or salvation but for the sake of mankind.
Had he remained in the royal palace, his service would have been confined to only his own family or his kingdom.
That was why he decided to renounce everything m order to maintain peace and purity to gain Enlightenment and then to enlighten others who were suffering in ignorance.
One of the Buddha's earliest tasks after gaining his Enlightenment was to return to his palace to enlighten the members of his family.
In fact, when his young son, Rahula asked the Buddha for his inheritance, the Buddha said that Rahula was heir to the richest wealth, the treasure of the Dhamma.
In this way, the Buddha served his family, and he paved the way for their salvation, peace and happiness.
Therefore, no one can say that the Buddha was a cruel or selfish father.
He was in fact more compassionate and self-sacrificing than anybody else.
With his high degree of spiritual development, the Buddha knew that marriage was a temporary phase while Enlightenment was eternal and for the good of all mankind.
Another important fact was that the Buddha knew that his wife and son would not starve in his absence.
During the time of the Buddha it was considered quite normal and honorable for a young man to retire from the life of a householder.
Other members of the family would willingly look after his dependents.
When he gained his enlightenment, he was able to give them something no other father could give — the freedom from slavery to attachment.
Marriage is a partnership of two individuals and this partnership is enriched and enhanced when it allows the personalities involved to grow.
Many marriages fail because one partner tries to “swallow” another or when one demands total freedom.
According to Buddhism, marriage means understanding and respecting each other's belief and privacy.
A successful marriage is always a two-way path: “humpy, bumpy” — it is difficult but it is always a mutual path.
Young people in this country and elsewhere sometimes think that “old fashioned ideas” are not relevant to modern society.
They should be reminded that there are some eternal truths which can never become out-of-date.
What was true during the time of Buddha still remains true today.
The so-called modern ideas we receive through the highly glamourous television programs do not represent the way most decent people in the west think or behave.
There is a vast “silent majority” of decent couples who are as deeply religious and “conservative” about marriage as any Eastern couple.
They do not behave in the manner that the mass media has portrayed them.
Not all the people in the west run off to get a divorce or abortion after their first quarrel or dispute.
Decent people all over the world are the same; they are unselfish and care deeply about those whom they love.
They make enormous sacrifices and develop love and understanding to ensure happy and stable marriages.
So, if you want to ape the west ape the “silent majority”: they are no different from your decent neighbor who lives next door to you.
Young people must also listen to their elders because their own understanding about married life is not mature.
They should not make hasty conclusions regarding, marriages and divorces.
They must have a lot of patience, tolerance and mutual understanding.
Otherwise, their life can become very miserable and problematic.
Patience, tolerance and understanding are important disciplines to be observed and practiced by all people in marriage.
A feeling of security and contentment comes from mutual understanding which is the SECRET of a HAPPY MARRIED LIFE.
In the Buddhist Jataka story — Sonadanda, the Bodhisatta sings the virtues of a mother in the following strain:
— Jataka translation Vol.
V pp., 
The most important element of the Buddhist reform has always been its social and moral code.
That moral code taken by itself is one of the most perfect which the world has ever known.
On this point all testimonials from hostile and friendly quarters agree; philosophers there may have been, religious preachers, subtle metaphysicists, disputants there may have been, but where shall we find such an incarnation of love, love that knows no distinction of caste and creed or color, a love that overflowed even the bounds of humanity, that embraced the whole of sentient beings in its sweep, a love that embodied as the gospel of universal “Maitri” and “Ahimsa.
— Prof.
Max Muller, A German Buddhist Scholar
Buddhist morality is based on freedom, i.e., on individual development.
It is therefore relative.
In fact there cannot be any ethical principle if there is compulsion or determination from an agent outside ourselves.
— Anagarika B.
Govinda, A German Buddhist Scholar
In Buddhism there can be no real morality without knowledge, no real knowledge without morality; both are bound up together like heat and light in a flame.
What constitutes “Bodhi” is not mere intellectual, enlightenment, but humanity.
The consciousness of moral excellence is of the very essence of “Bodhi.
— Bhikkhu Dhammapala, A Netherland Buddhist Scholar
Now, Grandma, set your heart on listening respectfully to the Dhamma, which is the teaching of the Buddha.
While I'm teaching you the Dhamma, be as attentive as if the Buddha himself were sitting right in front of you.
Close your eyes and set your heart on making your mind one.
Bring the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha into your heart as a way of showing the Buddha respect.
Today I haven't brought you a gift of any substance, aside from the Dhamma of the Buddha.
This is my last gift to you, so please accept it.
You should understand that even the Buddha — with all his virtues and perfections — couldn't avoid the weakening that comes with aging.
When he reached the age you are, he let go.
He let go of the fabrications of life.
“Letting go” means that he put these things down.
Don't carry them around.
Don't weigh yourself down.
Accept the truth about the fabrications of the body, whatever they may be: You've relied on them since you were born, but now it's enough.
Now that they're old, they're like the utensils in your home — the cups, the saucers, and the plates — that you've held onto all these years.
When you first got them they were bright and clean, but now they're wearing out.
Some of them are broken, some of them are lost, while the ones remaining have all changed.
They haven't stayed the same.
That's just the way things are.
The same holds true with the parts of your body.
From the time of birth and on through your childhood and youth, they kept changing.
Now they're called “old.” So accept the fact.
The Buddha taught that fabrications aren't us, they aren't ours, whether they're inside the body or out.
They keep changing in this way.
Contemplate this until it's clear.
This body of yours, lying here and decaying, is the truth of the Dhamma.
This truth is a teaching of the Buddha that's certain and sure.
He taught us to look at it, to contemplate it, to accept what's happening.
And it's something you should accept, regardless of what's happening.
The Buddha taught, when we're imprisoned, to make sure that it's only the body that's imprisoned.
Don't let the mind be imprisoned.
And the same thing applies here.
When the body wears out with age, accept it.
But make sure that it's only the body that's wearing out.
Make sure that the affairs of the mind are something else entirely.
This gives your mind energy and strength, because you see into the Dhamma that this is the way things are.
This is the way they have to be.
As the Buddha taught, this is the way the body and mind are of their own accord.
They can't be any other way.
As soon as the body is born, it begins to age.
As it ages, it gets sick.
After it's sick, it dies.
This truth is so true, this truth you're encountering today.
It's the truth of the Dhamma.
Look at it with your discernment so that you see.
Even if fire were to burn your house, or water were to flood it, or whatever the danger that would come to it, make sure that it's only the house that gets burned.
Make sure your heart doesn't get burned along with it.
If water floods your house, don't let it flood your heart.
Make sure it floods only the house, which is something outside the body.
As for the mind, get it to let go and leave things be — because now is the proper time, the proper time to let go.
You've been alive for a long time now, haven't you?
Your eyes have had the chance to see all kinds of shapes, colors, and lights.
The same with your other senses.
Your ears have heard lots of sounds, all kinds of sounds — but they were no big deal.
You've tasted really delicious foods — but they were no big deal.
The beautiful things you've seen: They were no big deal.
The ugly things you've seen: They were no big deal.
The alluring things you've heard were no big deal.
The ugly and offensive things you've heard were no big deal.
The Buddha thus taught that whether you're rich or poor, a child or an adult — even if you're an animal or anyone born in this world: There's nothing in this world that's lasting.
Everything has to change in line with its condition.
The truth of these conditions — if you try to fix them in a way that's not right — won't respond at all.
But there is a way to fix things.
The Buddha taught us to contemplate this body and mind to see that they aren't us, they aren't ours, they're just suppositions.
For example, this house of yours: It's only a supposition that it's yours.
You can't take it with you.
All the belongings that you suppose to be yours are just an affair of supposition.
They stay right where they are.
You can't take them with you.
The children and grandchildren that you suppose to be yours are just an affair of supposition.
They stay right where they are.
And this isn't just true for you.
This is the way things are all over the world.
Even the Buddha was this way.
Even his enlightened disciples were this way.
But they differed from us.
In what way did they differ?
They accepted this.
They accepted the fact that the fabrications of the body are this way by their very nature.
They can't be any other way.
This is why the Buddha taught us to contemplate this body from the soles of the feet on up to the top of the head, and from the top of the head on down to the soles of the feet.
These are the parts of your body.
So look to see what all is there.
Is there anything clean?
Anything of any substance?
These things keep wearing down with time.
The Buddha taught us to see that these fabrications aren't us.
They're just the way they are.
They aren't ours.
They're just the way they are.
What other way would you have them be?
The way they are is already right.
If you're suffering from this, then your thinking is wrong.
When things are right but you see them wrong, it throws an obstacle across your heart.
It's like the water in a river that flows downhill to the lowlands.
It flows in line with its nature.
The Ayutthaya River, the Muun River, whatever the river, they all flow downhill.
They don't flow uphill.
That's their nature.
Suppose a man were to stand on the bank of a river, watching the current flowing downhill, but his thinking is wrong.
He wants the river to flow uphill.
He's going to suffer.
He won't have any peace of mind.
Whether he's sitting, standing, walking, or lying down, he won't find any peace.
Why?
Because his thinking is wrong.
His thinking goes against the flow.
He wants the water to flow uphill, but the truth of the matter is that the water can't flow uphill.
It's not appropriate.
The nature of the water is that it has to flow along with the flow.
That's its nature.
When this is the case, the man is upset.
Why is he upset?
Because his thinking is wrong, his ideas are wrong, all because of his wrong view.
Right view sees that water has to flow downhill.
This is a truth of the Dhamma that we can contemplate and see that it's true.
When that man sees this truth, he can let go — he can let the water flow along with its flow.
The problem that was eating away at his heart disappears.
When the problem disappears, there's no more problem.
When there's no problem, there's no suffering.
It's the same here.
The water flowing downhill is like the life of your body.
After it's young, it's old.
When it's old, it flows along in its way.
Don't think that you don't want it to be that way.
Don't think like that.
We don't have the power to fix it.
The Buddha looked at things in line with their conditions, that they simply have to be that way.
So we let them go, we leave them be.
Take your awareness as your refuge.
Meditate on the word buddho, buddho.
Even though you're really tired, put your mind with the breath.
Take a good long out-breath.
Take a good long in-breath.
Take another good long out-breath.
Focus your mind again if you wander off.
Focus on the breath: buddho, buddho.
The more tired you feel, the more refined you have to keep focusing on in every time.
Why?
So that you can contend with pain.
When you feel tired, stop all your thoughts.
Don't think of anything at all.
Focus the mind in at the mind, and then keep the mind with the breath: buddho, buddho.
Let go of everything outside.
Don't get fastened on your children.
Don't get fastened on your grandchildren.
Don't get fastened on anything at all.
Let go.
Let the mind be one.
Gather the mind in to one.
Watch the breath.
Focus on the breath.
Gather the mind at the breath.
Just be aware at the breath.
You don't have to be aware of anything else.
Keep making your awareness more and more refined until it feels very small, but extremely awake.
The pains that have arisen will gradually grow calm.
Ultimately, we watch the breath in the same way that, when relatives have come to visit us, we see them off to the boat dock or the bus station.
Once the motor starts, the boat goes whizzing right off.
We watch them until they're gone, and then we return to our home.
We watch the breath in the same way.
We get acquainted with coarse breathing.
We get acquainted with refined breathing.
As the breathing gets more and more refined, we watch it off.
It gets smaller and smaller, but we make our mind more and more awake.
We keep watching the breath get more and more refined until there's no more breath.
There's just awareness, wide awake.
This is called meeting with the Buddha.
We stay aware, awake.
This is what buddho means: what's aware, awake, serene.
When that's the case, we're living with the Buddha.
We've met with awareness.
We've met with brightness.
We don't send the mind anywhere else.
It gathers in here.
We've reached our Buddha.
Even though he's already passed away, that was just the body.
The real Buddha is awareness that's serene and bright.
When you meet with this, that's all you have to know.
Let everything gather right here.
Let go of everything, leaving just this singular awareness.
But don't get deluded, okay?
Don't lose track.
If a vision or a voice arises in the mind, let it go.
Leave it be.
You don't need to take hold of anything at all.
Just take hold of the awareness.
Don't worry about the future; don't worry about the past.
Stay right here.
Ultimately you get so that you can't say that you're going forward, you can't say that you're going back, you can't say that you're staying in place.
There's nothing to be attached to.
Why?
Because there's no self there, no you, no yours.
It's all gone.
This is the Buddha's teaching: He tells us to be “all gone” in this way.
He doesn't have us grab hold of anything.
He has us be aware like this — aware and letting go.
This is your duty right now, yours alone.
Try to enter into the Dhamma in this way.
This is the path for gaining release from the round of wandering-on.
Try to let go, to understand, to set your heart on investigating this.
Don't be worried about this person or that.
Your children, your grandchildren, your relatives, everybody: Don't be worried about them.
Right now they're fine.
In the future they'll be just like this: like you are right now.
Nobody stays on in this world.
That's the way it has to be.
This is a condition, a truth, that the Buddha taught.
All the things that don't have any truth to them, he has us leave them be.
When you leave them be, you can see the truth.
If you don't leave them be, you won't see the truth.
That's the way things are.
Everybody in the world has to be this way.
So don't be worried.
Don't fasten onto things.
If the mind is going to think, let it think, but think using discernment.
Think with discernment.
Don't think with foolishness.
If you think about your grandchildren, think about them with discernment, not with foolishness.
Whatever there is, you can think about it, you can be aware of it, but think with discernment, be aware with discernment.
If you're really aware with discernment, you have to let go.
You have to leave things be.
If you think with discernment and are aware with discernment, there's no suffering, no stress.
There's just happiness, peace, and respite, all in one.
The mind gathers like this.
All you need to hold onto in the present is the breath.
This is your duty now.
It's not the duty of anyone else.
Leave their duties to them.
Your duty is your duty.
And your duty right now is to keep your awareness at your mind, making sure it doesn't get stirred up.
Your duty is to know how your mind is doing.
Is it worried about anything?
Is it concerned about anything?
Examine the mind while you're lying here sick.
Don't take on the duties of your children.
Don't take on the duties of your grandchildren.
Don't take on the duties of anyone else.
Don't take on any outside duties at all.
They're none of your business.
Now's the time for you to let go, to leave things be.
When you let go in this way, the mind will be at peace.
This is your duty now, right here in the present.
When you're sick like this, gather the mind into oneness.
This is your duty.
Let everything else go its own way.
Sights, sounds, smells, tastes, whatever: Let them go their own way.
Just stay focused on your duty.
If any preoccupation comes in to bother the mind, just say in your heart: “Leave me alone.
Don't bother me.
You're no affair of mine.” If any critical thoughts come up — fear for your life, fear that you'll die, thinking of this person, thinking of that person — just say in your heart, “Don't bother me.
You're no affair of mine.
This is because you see all the Dhammas that arise.
What are Dhammas?
Everything is a Dhamma.
There's nothing now that isn't a Dhamma.
What's the world?
The world is any preoccupation that gets you stirred up, that disturbs you right now.
“How is that person going to be?
How is this person going to be?
When I die will anyone look after them?” All of this is the world.
Whatever we think up — fear of death, fear of aging, fear of illness, whatever the fear — it's all world.
Drop the world — it's just world.
That's the way the world is.
If it arises in the mind, make yourself understand: The world is nothing but a preoccupation.
Preoccupations obscure the mind so that it can't see itself.
Whatever arises in the mind, tell yourself: “This isn't any affair of mine.
It's an affair of inconstancy, an affair of stress, an affair of not-self.
If you think that you'd like to keep on living a long time, it makes you suffer.
If you think that you'd like to die right now and get it all over with, that's not the right way either, you know.
It makes you suffer, too, because fabrications aren't yours.
You can't fix them up.
They're just the way they are.
You can fix them up a little bit, as when you fix up the body to make it look pretty or clean.
Or like children: They paint their lips and let their nails grow long to make them look pretty.
But that's all there is to it.
When they get old, they all end up in the same bucket.
They fix up the outside, but can't really fix things.
That's the way it is with fabrications.
The only thing you can fix is your heart and mind.
This house you're living in: You and your husband built it.
Other people can build houses, too, making them large and lovely.
Those are outer homes, which anyone can build.
The Buddha called them outer homes, not your real home.
They're homes only in name.
Homes in the world have to fall in line with the way of the world.
Some of us forget.
We get a big home and enjoy living in it, but we forget our real home.
Where is our real home?
It's in the sense of peace.
Our real home is peace.
This home you live in here — and this applies to every home — is lovely, but it's not very peaceful.
First this, then that; you're worried about this, you're worried about that: This isn't your real home.
It's not your inner home.
It's an outer home.
Someday soon you'll have to leave it.
You won't be able to live here anymore.
It's a worldly home, not yours.
This body of yours, that you still see as you and yours, is a home that stays with you a while.
You think that it's you and yours, but it's not.
It, too, is a worldly home.
It's not your real home.
People prefer to build outer homes; they don't like to build inner homes.
You rarely see any homes where people can really stay and be at peace.
People don't build them.
They build only outer homes.
Think about it for a minute.
How is your body right now?
Think about it from the day you were born all the way up to the present moment.
We keep running away from progress.
We keep running until we're old, running until we're sick.
We don't want things to be that way, but we can't prevent it.
That's just the way things are.
They can't be any other way.
It's like wanting a duck to be like a chicken, but it can't because it's a duck.
If you want a chicken to be like a duck, it can't, because it's a chicken.
If you want ducks to be like chickens, and chickens to be like ducks, you simply suffer — because these things are impossible.
If you think, “Ducks have to be the way they are, and chickens the way they are; they can't be any other way,” then that kind of thinking gives you energy and strength.
No matter how much you want this body to stay stable and permanent, it can't be that way.
It's just the way it is.
The Buddha called it a fabrication.
This fabrication — this body-and-mind — is inconstant.
It's not dependable.
It's here and then it's not.
It's born and then it passes away.
But we human beings want it to be constant.
That's the thinking of a fool.
Just look at your breath.
It goes out and then it comes in.
It comes in and then it goes out.
That's the nature of breath.
It has to be that way.
It has to change, to go back and forth.
The affairs of fabrication depend on change.
You can't have them not change.
Just look at your breath.
Can you keep it from coming in?
Does it feel comfortable?
If you draw in a breath and then don't let it go out, is that any good?
Even if you want it to be constant, it can't be constant.
It's impossible.
It goes out and then it comes in.
It comes in and then it goes out.
It's such a normal thing.
We're born and then we age; we age and then we get sick and die.
It's so normal.
But we don't like it.
It's as if we wanted the breath to come in and not go out; or to go out and not come in.
When it comes in and out, out and in, we can live.
Human beings and animals have been living right up to the present because fabrications follow their duty in line with their conditions.
That's their truth.
So we have to see their truth in line with their truth.
As with the affair of birth, aging, illness, and death: Once we're born, we're already dead.
Birth and death are all the same thing.
One part is the beginning, and one part the end.
Just like a tree: When it has a base, it has an upper tip.
When it has an upper tip, it has a base.
When there's no base, there's no upper tip.
There's no upper tip without a base.
That's the way things are.
It's kind of funny, you know.
We human beings, when somebody dies, get all sad and upset.
We cry and grieve — all kinds of things.
It's delusion.
It's delusion, you know, to cry and lament when somebody dies.
That's the way we've been since who knows when.
We hardly ever reflect to see things clearly.
In my opinion, and you'll have to forgive me for saying this, but if you're going to cry when somebody dies, it'd be better to cry when somebody's born.
But we have things all backwards.
If somebody's born we laugh; we're happy and glad.
But really, birth is death, and death is birth.
The beginning is the end, and the end is the beginning.
When someone dies or is about to die, we cry.
That's foolishness.
If you're going to cry, it'd be better to cry from the very beginning.
For birth is death.
Without birth, there's no death.
Do you understand?
Death is birth, and birth is death.
Don't think in a way that puts you in a turmoil.
Just let things be the way they are.
This is your duty now.
No one else can help you.
Your children can't help you; your grandchildren can't help you; your wealth can't help you.
The only thing that can help you is if you correct your sense of things right now.
Don't let it waver back and forth.
Let go.
Let go.
Even if we don't let things go, they're already ready to go.
The parts of your body are trying to run away.
Do you see this?
When you were young, your hair was black.
Now it's gray.
This is how it's already running away.
When you were young, your eyes were bright and clear, but now they're blurry.
Do you see this?
They're already running away.
They can't hold out any longer, so they have to run away.
This is no longer their place to stay.
Every part of your body has started running away.
When you were young, were your teeth solid and sturdy?
Now they're loose.
You may have put in false teeth, but they're something new, not the original ones.
The original ones have run away.
Every part of your body — of everybody's body — is trying to run away.
Your eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and body: All of these things are trying to run away.
Why?
Because this isn't their place to stay.
They're fabrications, so they can't stay.
They can stay for only a while and then they have to go.
And it's not just you.
Every part of the body — hair of the head, hair of the body, nails, teeth, skin, everything — is getting ready to run away.
Some parts have already gone, but not yet everything.
All that's left are a few house sitters.
They're looking after the house, but they're no good.
The eyes are no good; the teeth are no good; the ears are no good.
This body's no good because the good things have already run away.
They keep running away, one after another.
You have to understand that this is no place for human beings to stay.
It's just a shelter where you can rest a bit, and then you have to move on.
So don't let yourself be worried about so many things.
You've come to live in the world, so you should contemplate the world to see that that's the way it is: Everything's getting ready to run away.
Look at your body.
Is there anything there that's like what it used to be?
Is the skin like it used to be?
Is your hair like it used to be?
Are your eyes like they used to be?
Are your ears like they used to be?
Are your teeth like they used to be?
No, they're not.
They've run off to who knows where.
This is what their nature is like.
Once they've served their time, they have to go.
Why do they have to go?
Because that's their duty.
That's their truth.
This isn't a place where anything can stay permanently.
And while they're staying here, they're a turmoil: sometimes pleasant, sometimes painful, with no respite or peace.
It's like a person who's traveling back home but hasn't yet arrived.
He's still on the way, sometimes going forward, sometimes going back: a person with no place to stay.
As long as he hasn't reached home, he's not at his ease: no ease while he's sitting, no ease while he's lying down, no ease while he's walking, no ease while he's riding in a car.
Why?
Because he hasn't yet reached home.
When we reach our home, we're at our ease because we understand that this is our home.
It's the same here.
The affairs of the world are never peaceful.
Even if we're rich, they're not peaceful.
If we're poor, they're not peaceful.
If we're adults they're not peaceful.
If we're children they're not peaceful.
If we lack education, they're not peaceful.
If we're educated, they're not peaceful.
All these affairs are not peaceful: That's just the way they are.
That's why poor people suffer, rich people suffer, children suffer, adults suffer.
Old people suffer the sufferings of old people.
The sufferings of children, the sufferings of rich people, the suffering of poor people: They're all suffering.
Every part in your body is running away, one thing after another.
When you contemplate this, you'll see aniccam: They're inconstant.
Dukkham: They're stressful.
Why is that?
Anatta: They're not-self.
This body you're living in, this body sitting and lying here sick, along with the mind that knows pleasure and pain, that knows that the body is sick: Both of these things are called Dhamma.
The mental things with no shape, that can think and feel, are called nama.
They're nama-dhamma.
The things that have physical shape, that can hurt, that can grow and shrink, back and forth: That's called rupa-dhamma.
Mental things are dhamma.
Physical things are dhamma.
That's why we say we live with the Dhamma.
There's nothing there that's really us.
It's just Dhamma.
Dhamma conditions arise and then pass away.
They arise and then pass away.
That's how conditions are.
They arise and then pass away.
We arise and pass away with every moment.
This is how conditions are.
This is why, when we think of the Buddha, we can see that he's really worth respecting, really worth bowing down to, for he spoke the truth.
He spoke in line with the truth.
Once we see that that's the way it is, we see the Dhamma.
Some people practice the Dhamma but don't see the Dhamma.
Some people study the Dhamma, practice the Dhamma, but don't see the Dhamma.
They still don't have any place to stay.
So you have to understand that everybody, all the way down to ants and termites and all the other little animals, is trying to run away.
There's no one who can stay here.
Living things stay for a while and then they all go: rich people, poor people, children, old people, even animals.
They all keep changing.
So when you sense that the world is like this, you see that it's disenchanting.
There's nothing that's really you or yours.
You're disenchanted — nibbida.
Disenchantment isn't disgust, you know.
It's just the heart sobering up.
The heart has seen the truth of the way things are: There's no way you can fix them.
They're just the way they are.
You let them go.
You let go without gladness.
You let go without sadness.
You just let things go as fabrications, seeing with your own discernment that that's the way fabrications are.
This is called, anicca vata sankhara: Fabrications are inconstant.
They change back and forth.
That's inconstancy.
To put it in simple terms: Inconstancy is the Buddha.
When we really see that these things are inconstant, that's the Buddha.
When we look clearly into inconstancy, we'll see that it's constant.
How is it constant?
It's constant in being that way.
It doesn't change into any other way.
Human beings and animals, once they're born, are all that way.
They're constant in that way — in that they're inconstant.
They keep changing, changing from children to young people to old people: That's how they're inconstant.
But the fact that everyone is that way: That's constant.
That doesn't change.
Things keep changing in that way.
When you see this, your heart can be at peace, for it's not just you.
It's everyone.
When you think in this way, it's disenchanting.
Nibbida arises.
It cures you of your lust and desire for sensuality, for the world, for the baits of the world.
If you have a lot of them, you abandon a lot.
If you have a little, you abandon a little.
Look at everyone.
Have you seen any of these things since you were born?
Have you seen poor people?
Have you seen rich people?
Have you seen people who die young?
Have you seen people who die old?
We've all seen these things.
They're no big deal.
The important point is that the Buddha has us build a home for ourselves, to build a home in the way I've described to you.
Build a home so you can let go, so that you can leave things be.
Let them go and then leave them be.
Let the mind reach peace.
Peace is something that doesn't move forward, doesn't move back, doesn't stay in place.
That's why its peace.
It's peace in that it's free from going forward, free from moving back, free from staying in place.
Pleasure isn't a place for you to stay.
Pain isn't a place for you to stay.
Pain wears away.
Pleasure wears away.
Our foremost Teacher said that all fabrications are inconstant.
So when we reach this last stage in life, he tells us to let go and leave things be.
We can't take them with us.
We'll have to let them go anyhow, so wouldn't it be better to let them go beforehand?
If we carry them around, they weigh us down.
When we sense that they weigh us down, we won't carry them around.
Wouldn't it be better to let them go beforehand?
So why carry them around?
Why be attached to them?
Let your children and grandchildren look after you, while you can rest at your ease.
Those who look after the sick should be virtuous.
Those who are sick should give others the opportunity to look after them.
Don't give them difficulties.
Wherever there's pain, learn how to keep your mind in good shape.
Those who look after their parents should have their virtues, too.
You have to be patient and tolerant.
Don't feel disgust.
This is the only time you can really repay your parents.
In the beginning you were children, and your parents were adults.
It was in dependence on them that you've been able to grow up.
The fact that you're all sitting here is because your parents looked after you in every way.
You owe them a huge debt of gratitude.
So now you should understand that your mother is a child.
Before, you were her children, but now she's your child.
Why is that?
As people get older, they turn into children.
They can't remember things; their eyes can't see things; their ears can't hear things; they make mistakes when they speak, just like children.
So you should understand and let go.
Don't take offense at what the sick person says and does.
Let her have her way, in the same way you'd let a child have its way when it won't listen to its parents.
Don't make it cry.
Don't make it frustrated.
It's the same with your mother.
When people are old, their perceptions get all skewed.
They want to call one child, but they say another one's name.
They ask for a bowl when they want a plate.
They ask for a glass when they want something else.
This is the normal way things are, so I ask you to contemplate it for yourself.
At the same time, the sick person should think of those looking after her.
Have the virtue of patience and endurance in the face of pain.
Make an effort in your heart so that it isn't a turmoil.
Don't place too many difficulties on the people looking after you.
As for those looking after the sick person, have the virtue of not feeling disgust over mucus and saliva, urine and excrement.
Try to do the best you can.
All of the children should help in looking after her.
She's now the only mother you have.
You've depended on her ever since you were born: to be your teacher, your nurse, your doctor — she was everything for you.
This is the benefaction she gave in raising you.
She gave you knowledge; she provided for your needs and gave you wealth.
Everything you have — the fact that you have children and grandchildren, nice homes, nice occupations, the fact that you can send your children to get an education — the fact that you even have yourself: What does that come from?
It comes from the benefaction of your parents who gave you an inheritance so that your family line is the way it is.
The Buddha thus taught benefaction and gratitude.
These two qualities complement each other.
Benefaction is doing good for others.
When we've received that goodness, received that help: Whoever has raised us, whoever has made it possible for us to live, whether it's a man or a woman, a relative or not, that person is our benefactor.
Gratitude is our response.
When we've received help and support from benefactors, we appreciate that benefaction.
That's gratitude.
Whatever they need, whatever difficulty they're in, we should be willing to make sacrifices for them, to take on the duty of helping them.
This is because benefaction and gratitude are two qualities that undergird the world so that your family doesn't scatter, so that it's at peace, so that it's as solid and stable as it is.
Today I've brought you some Dhamma as a gift in your time of illness.
I don't have any other gift to give.
There's no need to bring you any material gift, for you have plenty of material things in your house, and over time they just cause you difficulties.
So I've brought you some Dhamma, something of substance that will never run out.
Now that you've heard this Dhamma, you can pass it on to any number of other people, and it'll never run out.
It'll never stop.
It's the truth of the Dhamma, a truth that always stays as it is.
I'm happy that I've been able to give you this gift of Dhamma so that you'll have the strength of heart to contend with all the things you face.
I compiled the Uposatha Sila when I still held the rank of Maha.
At that time the manuscript had some errors, but now these have been corrected.
This text will be used in the curriculum of “Nak Dhamm Tri” for the men and women who will be taking the examinations, though for the laity the subject of lay discipline replaces that of monastic discipline in the exams.
The tests will be held every year starting in BE.
I hope that this translation of the Uposatha Sutta along with its commentary will be of benefit to English-speaking Buddhists who are intent on practice.
The original Thai text was compiled by His Eminence Somdet Phra Buddhaghosacaraya of Wat Thepsirintaravas in BE, and due to the depth and comprehensiveness of H.E.'s understanding this text has proved useful down to the present.
This text contains many technical Pali terms, some of which have been difficult to translate accurately.
For example, some Pali terms dealing with Vinaya are still used today but the true meanings have long been lost or misused.
It is auspicious that this translation will be finished in time to commemorate Her Majesty Queen Sirikit's fifth cycle or sixtieth birthday anniversary, which will be celebrated on August,.
May Her Majesty Queen Sirikit reap the merits and benefits of this printing of the Uposatha Sila.
By the power of the Triple Gem may she develop in the four dhammas of long life, beauty, happiness and strength, for ages to come.
In the past ten years computers have played an increasingly important part in the spread of Buddhism to the West.
New computer programs have made 'Dhamma publishing' increasingly convenient, facilitating the printing of previously difficult-to-reproduce diacriticals which are necessary to accurately render technical Pali terms.
The English language has been affected as well, gradually incorporating a number of words of Pali origin.
This sometimes causes problems for authors and translators who are confronted with the decision of how to present these terms to their readers in English.
This translation was first printed to commemorate Her Majesty Queen Sirikit's fifth cycle or sixtieth birthday anniversary, which was celebrated on August,.
Now a second revised edition has been prepared, and it is auspicious that it will be printed in time to commemorate His Holiness Somdet Phra Nyanasamvara the Supreme Patriarch's eightieth birthday anniversary on October,.
I would like to thank Bhikkhu Nirodho for his helpful suggestions and corrections, making the reprinting of this text possible.
Evamme sutam ekam samayam bhagava savatthiyam viharati jetavane anathapindikassa arame tatra kho bhagava bhikkhu amantesi bhikkhavoti bhadanteti te bhikkhu bhagavato paccassosum bhagava etadavoca atthamggasamaññagato bhikkhave uposatho upavuttho mahapphalo hoti mahanisamso mahajutiko mahavippharoti…
Thus have I heard:
At one time the Blessed One was residing in Jetavana, the monastery of Anathapindika, near Savatthi.
At that time the Blessed One, having called all the bhikkhus together, addressed them thus: “Bhikkhus!” The bhikkhus answered in assent: “Lord!” The Blessed One then gave the following teaching on Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Uposatha is comprised of eight factors which the Ariyan disciple observes, the observation of which brings glorious and radiant fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus.
What is the Uposatha which, observed by the Ariyan disciples, brings glorious and radiant fruit and benefit?
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up the intentional taking of life.
The club and sword have been laid down.
They have shame and are compassionate towards all beings.'
“All of you have given up the intentional taking of life, have put down all weapons, are possessed of shame and are compassionate towards all beings.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the first factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up taking what has not been given.
They take only what is given, are intent on taking only what is given.
They are not thieves.
Their behavior is spotless.'
“All of you have given up the taking of what has not been given, are ones who do not take what is not given, are intent on taking only what is given, are not thieves.
Your behavior is spotless.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the second factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up that which is an obstacle to the Brahma-faring.
Their practice is like that of a Brahma.
They are far from sexual intercourse, which is a practice of lay people.'
“All of you have given up that which is an obstacle to the Brahma-faring and behave like a Brahma.
Your behavior is far from sexual intercourse.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the third factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up the telling of lies.They utter only the truth and are intent on the truth.
Their speech is firm and is composed of reason.
Their speech does not waver from that which is a mainstay for the world.'
“All of you have given up the telling of lies.
You speak only the truth and are intent only on that which is true.
Your speech is firm and with reason.
Your speech does not waver from that which is a mainstay for the world.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the fourth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up the taking of liquors and intoxicants, of that which intoxicates, causing carelessness.
They are far from intoxicants.'
“All of you have given up the taking of liquors and intoxicants.
You abstain from drink which causes carelessness.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the fifth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, eat at one time only and do not partake of food in the evening.
They abstain from food at the 'wrong time'.'
“All of you eat at one time only and do not partake of food in the evening.
You abstain from food at the 'wrong time.' For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the sixth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up singing and dancing, the playing of musical instruments and the watching of entertainments, which are stumbling blocks to that which is wholesome.
Nor do they bedeck themselves with ornaments, flowers or perfume.'
“All of you have given up singing and dancing, the playing of musical instruments and the watching of entertainments, which are stumbling blocks to that which is wholesome.
You do not bedeck yourselves with ornaments, flowers or perfume.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the seventh factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up lying on large or high beds.
They are content with low beds or bedding made of grass.'
“All of you have given up lying on large or high beds.
You are content with low beds or beds made of grass.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the eighth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
The Uposatha is comprised of these eight factors which the Ariyan disciple observes, and it is of great and glorious fruit and benefit.
Thus the Blessed One spoke on the Uposatha.
The bhikkhus were delighted and rejoiced at his words.
In all of the eight, if one breaks a precept, then it is done bodily.
If one orders another to do so, then the precept is broken through speech.
This must be accompanied by intention before the precept is broken, but this is true for the first and second precepts only; for the third to the eighth precept, even if one asks another to do so, one does not break the precept.
Breaking a precept through one's own effort is known as sahatthikapayoga.
The ordering of another to behave in a way that breaks a precept is called anattikapayoga.
Thus one who is careful and does not stray from the precepts is known as a virtuous person.
The wise say that sila, or keeping precepts, is an instrument by which body and speech can be purified.
It is a way to vanquish the coarse defilements which appear through body and speech.
Whether people observe the precepts or not, when they do something that goes against any of the first five precepts it is known as lokavajja.
It will be a personal loss and will be something the world condemns.
As for the last three precepts, if they are broken it is called paññativajja.
This occurs when one intends to break the rule.
If there is no intention to break the rule then no fault results.
The breaking of any of the first five precepts brings about peril for the breaker.
That is to say, the fruit of such actions will follow one, resulting in, for example, a short life.
In the breaking of any of the last three precepts, there is no peril.
The time from dawn to midday is called purebhatta-kala.
From midday to dusk is called pacchabhatta-kala.
One may eat as many times as necessary in the first period.
From dusk to the next dawn is called ratti, and meals may not be taken at this time.
This is the reason for the passage with the words to the effect that one refrains from eating at night.
The undertaking of precepts one after another is called pacceka-samadana.
For example, the undertaking of each individual precept, starting with panatipata veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami and ending with uccasayana mahasayana veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami, is called pacceka-samadana.
The undertaking of all eight precepts with one utterance is called ekajjha-samadana.
This is done by determining all the precepts at the one time and uttering the following: Buddhapaññattam Uposatham adhitthami — I determine the Uposatha laid down by the Buddha.
This method is called ekajjha-samadana.
Those who use either of the two methods mentioned above should begin by venerating the Triple Gem, reciting namo tassa bhagavato arahato samma-sambuddhassa.
Then they take the Three Refuges before undertaking the precepts.
Those who do not know Pali may undertake the precepts in their own language.
The method of requesting and observing the copala-uposatha is correct according to the Dhamma-Vinaya, as we see in the example of today's upasakas and upasikas.
But after they request the Uposatha, they indulge in low speech.
There is talk of villages, towns, mountains, trees, fields, gardens, buying and selling, grandchildren, here and there, this and that person, etc.
Such talk is not conducive to wholesomeness and does not lead one to reap the benefits of happiness and faith in the Uposatha that one has observed.
The Atthakatha Acariyas have thus compared such people to hired cowhands.
In the morning the hired hands herd the cattle in search of food.
In the evening they herd the cattle back to the owner.
After they are paid a fair amount of money, they think: “Tomorrow we will feed the cattle here, and the next day we will feed them over there.
Grass and water are abundant here but not so over there.” Again and again this is what takes place.
The hired hands never partake of the products of the cow, such as fresh milk and butter.
Such observance is called copala-uposatha.
From the time that the ariya-uposatha is undertaken, if it is the right time and place, then samatha and vipassana should be practiced in accordance with one's preference and skill.
If one's practice of kammatthana leads to a stilling of the unwholesome states through such practices as tadan-gapahana, then one should continue with this effort.
If the mind becomes unsettled, or it is not the time or place for meditation practice, and if there is faith-inspiring Dhamma talk taking place, then one should join in such conversation.
This is useful in that it leads to knowledge and can correct any misunderstandings we may have.
One should not participate in such talk with a sense of competition, winning, losing, etc.
If such Dhamma talk does not lead to the benefits mentioned above, and if there is a Dhammadesana, then one should go and listen so as to fortify one's saddha, hiri, ottappa, suta, viriya, sati, and pañña, causing them to develop.
We also listen to the Dhamma in order to cause samvega to arise.
If, for whatever reason, problems arise, so that listening to Dhamma does not lead to benefits as mentioned above, then one should practice a kammatthana that is suitable.
The Atthakatha Acariyas have pointed out six objects for kammatthana practice which are suitable for the ariya-uposatha.
They are:
Therefore, in the ariya-uposatha, samatha and vipassana should also be practiced, thus not making it difficult for those who are samatha-yanika and vipassana-yanika.
In brief, this means that one is benefiting oneself at the time of observing by practicing kammatthana.
This is called ariya-uposatha.
The times for keeping the pati-jagara-uposatha are the five days of the waxing moon, i.e., the th, th, th, th, and the th, and the six days of the waning moon: the st, th, th, th, th, and th or th.
That makes eleven days in a month for the observance of this type of Uposatha.
The four months of the rainy season, or vasso, starting on the first night of the waning moon of the seventh month and ending in the middle of the eleventh month, is the period for observing the pati-harika-pakkha-uposatha.
The commentary to the Raja Sutta explains that the pati-harika-pakkha-uposatha is the Uposatha that is observed continuously throughout the three months of the rains.
If one cannot keep the observance for the full three months of the rains, then it should be kept for one month, from the first day of the waning moon of the tenth month to the eleventh month.
If one is not able to keep the observance for one full month, then it should be kept for a half month, from the first day of the waning moon of the tenth month to the end of that month.
Any period of this observance is called pati-harika-pakkha-uposatha.
Some texts define as the five months from the seventh month up to the eleventh month.
Some Acariyas say the three months are the seventh, eleventh and third months.
Yet other sources explain that the four days, i.e., the th, th, th and th, both waxing and waning, are the only days for the observance of the pati-harika-pakkha-uposatha.
For those who desire merit, the Uposatha should be kept on the days shown here.
Days other than these mentioned are for the observance of the Five Precepts and not the Uposatha.
mayam bhante tisaranena saha attangasamaññagatam uposatham yacama.
namo tassa bhagavato arahato samma-sambuddhassa.
Homage to the Exalted One, the Arahant, the Buddha perfected by himself.

The Uposatha which was laid down by the Buddha and consists of the eight sila has been determined by me — I will keep it well for one full day and night.
The assembed lay people answer: “ama bhante.
This is the end of requesting the precepts.
The laity should pay respect to the bhikkhu by bowing.
This book contains two sets of newly revised Dhamma talks.
The edition of Amata Dhamma has been completely revised and has new additions, including its new title, To the Last Breath.
Directions for Insight — the second part of this book — was only slightly revised, although it now has its proper title back, which somehow had become lost in the first printing.

As Acharn Panyavaddho explained in the introduction he wrote for the Amata Dhamma: “ of these talks were given for the benefit of Mrs.
Pow-panga Vathanakul, who had been staying in Wat Pa Bahn Tahd, Udorn-thani, Thailand, since the beginning of November.
The other talk, The Middle Way, was actually given to the assembly of bhikkhus at the Wat in, and was one which Mrs.
Pow-panga found useful… She stayed at Wat Pa Bahn Tahd for almost four months and Ven.
Acharn Maha Boowa gave about talks during that period.
The second part of this collection, Directions for Insight, seems to fit in well with the general approach of To the Last Breath.
It is made up of six Dhamma Talks by Acharn Kor Khao-suan-luang.
Khun Phoon Phongphanit, a lay disciple of Acharn Kor, suggested a joint translation of these six Dhamma talks, originally printed under the title Na Naew Mong Darn Ny.
They form one booklet of a series printed over the years by Upasika Kee Nanayon, who used the pen name Kor Khao-suan-luang.
Khun Phoon Phongphanit should receive special thanks for all his work in seeing that translation into print.
The first translation of To the Last Breath was mainly the work of Ven.
Bhikkhu A-j-.
The present editor, who also assisted at that time, has now completely revised the whole translation and so must bear responsibility for the errors.
Any merit arising from my work on this book, may it be dedicated to my mother.
May she find peace and happiness.
Anyone who has visited the forest monasteries of Thailand will need no introduction.
They will have seen Acharns who teach in a spontaneous and direct way, and who live as they teach.
This is Forest Dhamma, vigorous but without pretension, inspiring one to live and practice the Way rather than reading about it.
Yet here is a book — and a translation of a book at that — that can only attempt to offer a partial view of certain aspects of that Teaching.
This is especially so with the first part of this collection of Dhamma talks, To the Last Breath.
For these were given under quite special circumstances: A person, quite knowledgeable about Buddhism, is dying of cancer.
The emphasis is therefore very much on dealing with pain, suffering and, finally, death.
And pointing towards that which is beyond suffering and death.
These circumstances mean that the beginning fundamentals of Dhamma practice are generally assumed to be already understood.
For those new to Dhamma, however, it is important to remember the special context and to take into account the other Dhamma qualities that make an essential foundation that will need to be cultivated.
The Lord Buddha gave an important example of this when he would begin his Dhamma Teaching with the Progressive or Graduated Sermon:
“Then the Lord delivered a graduated discourse to 'Kutadanta,' on generosity, on morality and on heaven, showing the danger, degradation and corruption of sense-desires, and the profit of renunciation.
And when the Lord knew that Kutadanta's mind was ready, pliable, free from the hindrances, joyful and calm, then he preached a sermon on Dhamma in brief: on suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path…” 
It is this 'joyful, calm, pliable, ready mind' — already settled firmly upon foundations of generosity and morality — that is receptive to the powerful Truths about pain, suffering and death.
It is at this point that the emphasis changes to energetic striving, to overcoming the obstacles that prevent insight and pin us blindly to the wheel of birth and death.
“Then the Lord said to the monks: 'Now, monks, I declare to you: all conditioned things are of a nature to decay — strive on untiringly.' These were the Tathagata's last words.” 
In this book you will find both these aspects.
There are constant references to 'gradually'… 'steadily'… 'step by step'… 'level by level'.
These lead into a growing emphasis on earnestness and diligence in practice.
Any translation is the impossible search for just the right word.
The expression that conveys both the sense and accuracy in a pleasing way; and that also brings with it the spirit of the original.
This translation is much more of a blind groping.
First, there is the wide language and cultural gap between Thai and English.
Then there is the change of medium from the living word to the printed page, which must always lose the dynamism of the original experience.
Finally, and perhaps the most important point, there is the great profundity of Dhamma, which is really beyond the translators' level of understanding.
The reader will therefore need to make due allowance for the deficiencies in this translation effort.
The only way truly to understand is to translate it back into your own life, your own experience and practice.
Even with its errors and inadequacies this book is the result of a great effort by many people.
It will have all been worth while if a single person finds some truth in it that can help him or her face up to their situation, their illness and pain.
Insight into that suffering may they go beyond a mere book's description to true liberation.
Kee Nanayon was born in in the provincial town of Rajburi, about kilometres west of Bangkok.
When she was young, she liked to visit the nearby Buddhist monastery, especially on the weekly Observance Day when she listened to Dhamma from the monks and kept the Eight Precepts.
Sometimes she would rest from her work around the house by developing tranquillity meditation in any suitably quiet corner.
Khao-suan-luang is the name of a secluded, picturesque hill about kilometres from Rajburi, near where her uncle and aunt lived.
Whenever she visited them, she always felt comfortable there and eventually in persuaded her relatives to move their house over to the hill.
This was the beginning — the first three members — of the community that was later to develop there.
Upasika Kee attracted Dhamma students, and residents included both female lay devotees and white-robed nuns.
She taught her disciples to develop meditation, to chant at least every morning and evening, and to avoid stimulants like coffee, cigarettes and meat.
They could listen to her talks and try to follow the example of her simple way of living.
She made herself comfortable on the barest necessities and never indulged in luxuries, either in food or material things.
Strictly keeping the Eight Precepts and constantly trying to guard the sense doors were basic to her practice.
In later years she developed corneal ulcers and eventually became blind.
She passed away in but her community still continues with about thirty residents.
These Dhamma talks were given mainly to the women who stayed at her center to practice meditation.
After listening with calmed, centered minds, they would all sit in meditation together.
Some nuns or lay devotees would take on the special practice and go into retreat alone in a separate meditation hut.
It was known as 'guarding the sense doors', and could last for one or two weeks.
Dhamma talks given to those practicing at Khao-suan-luang on the weekly Observance Day have regularly been printed, and this book continues the series.
They aim to encourage and support Dhamma practice following the Way of the Lord Buddha and his Noble Disciples whose brilliance dispels the darkness of every age and time.
Devotion to practice always brings great benefit in leading to the end of suffering.
I wish to acknowledge the generosity of all those who have joined together to make merit by printing this book to be given away freely as a pure gift of Dhamma to anyone interested in practice.
Other books in this series have already been widely distributed to various monasteries and libraries, and as opportunity allows we hope to continue this service.
As you steadily develop your self-inspection, carefully note where it is heading so that any lapse or imprudence in your daily life can be corrected.
Failing to uphold a high standard will cause a continuous deterioration in the mind due to selfishness.
You must persevere with the self-inspection because any lapse will cause this disease of selfishness to spread its infection everywhere.
Whenever you become neglectful, make sure that you then purge any selfishness that has arisen.
This is especially necessary when it flares up in force, but even when it manifests more subtly, it still needs to be thoroughly searched out.
If you do not eradicate this virulent disease, your practice cannot be considered to accord with the Lord Buddha's Teaching.
It's therefore imperative that your self-inspection becomes comprehensive, and that it is based and develops out of the Five or Eight Precepts.
Generally, the precepts can reduce selfishness at one level and then our mind-development can come in and remove it at a medium level.
This is something you should all understand quite well.
Finally, however, mindfulness and wisdom will need to become engaged in eradicating the selfishness that results from overlooking the truth about impermanence, suffering, and not- self.
With repeated attention, your concern will deepen and the defilements — craving and clinging — and self, in its various manifestations, can be disposed of.
It's not seeing the impermanence and deception of things that permits desire to grasp hold and cherish them.
This disease is made even more difficult to treat by our predilection in examining other people before ourselves.
To be able to turn within and apprehend self with its machinations concealed deep in one's nature, does indeed require potent mindfulness and wisdom.
Yet also actually to get rid of them isn't so simple, and one really only manages to view self's deceptions and desires.
These multifarious schemes of greed are worthy of great attention and need to be carefully examined.
Any shortcoming will force the practice to veer off course and may end by actually facilitating and increasing one's sense of self.
In the beginning, we should be content with what we already have so as not to feed and inflate this sense of self.
Greed for anything — however coarse or refined, no matter how attractive — must be put aside.
This is something each one of us must see and understand for ourselves; but because it can be all so misleading and deceptive, that isn't so easy.
The predicament is compounded because 'self' is always looking out for distractions to involve us in.
Should we enquire what it is grasping for, what it is in turmoil over — it just pretends not to have heard.
It is only interested in wanting more and more, without end.
A basic feature of human beings is the enterprise they apply when acquiring things.
The defilements possess a certain cleverness in procuring, but not in giving up or forgoing.
If only this could be transposed so that instead we became creative in bestowing and giving away.
The benefit would be great because the grasping at things would stop and gradually, with intensive contemplation, the basic attachment would be destroyed.
Blocking the defilements from taking their fill by cutting off their nutriment is following the Way of the Noble Disciple.
But the other way, the way of deception and sponsoring self, makes one a firm follower of Maara, the Evil One, who personifies the defilements.
Instead of dispensing things one then endlessly acquires and consumes them.
There are, therefore, two possible ways to go.
You have to discern in yourself the existence of the acute disease of selfishness, with its 'getting-cleverness'.
Yet, if you aren't sharp enough, you'll be fooled by self's duplicity: “The more the merrier,” as Maara would say.
Ask yourself, “Am I really following the way to enlightenment or is it the way of Maara and selfishness?
On which path does my proficiency really lie?” This is something to always question.
The household stores in this area have been donated for the use of those who come here to practice Dhamma.
Be careful never to appropriate such communal property to yourself and always ask about such things first.
Grabbing this and that to make yourself as comfortable as possible, even if it may have been done unthinkingly, is still the same as theft.
These communal household utensils should therefore not be requisitioned as your own; even those things donated specifically for your use should, on occasion, be brought out and shared.
In that case there is no attachment and one does not plan just for one's own convenience.
Otherwise, the instinct of 'self' — which needs to appropriate things to itself — is too manipulative and cunning, and its villainy is so difficult to see.
One then mistakenly endorses the dictum, the more I can get the better, and such selfishness puts one under the domination of Mara.
Now that we have become disciples of the Lord Buddha, how can we possibly be like that?
If we should see that the greed arisen in ourselves becomes particularly grasping, then the only way out is to give up the thing.
Let go of it!
Under no circumstances should you quietly appropriate it on the side.
Absolutely not!
I will tell you plainly, anyone living in a religious community who behaves in such a way will only go from bad to worse, because there is no sense of shame or fear of doing evil.
Without these two fundamental principles as a foundation, how can Dhamma possibly be built up?
Though one might be knowledgeable and skilled in reciting the scriptures, one can't even put right such an underlying character defect.
A personality that knows no bounds to its greed really seems disgusting, or rather the disease that infects that mind does.
What can we do to cleanse such a mind?
Anyway, to associate with extremely selfish people will inflame the disease still more and its infection will penetrate deep into the mind.
All this remains a hidden subject which people don't wish to speak about.
It's not pleasant talk for it disturbs and disconcerts with its sinister implications.
It's only through mindfulness and wisdom examining within yourself that you'll be able to know the deceit of the defilements and greed.
How can they all be eradicated?
This is not a matter about which you can be halfhearted.
You'll have to disavow and give away as much as possible.
Anything that is involved in upholding such selfishness must be relinquished.
Don't agree amongst yourselves that everyone may grab as much as they can, but rather encourage one another to give as much as possible.
Failure to do this will cause the mind to fall into anguish, because you twist round and infect yourself with the dirt and disease of selfishness.
Who else can possibly come and treat you?
When you decide to examine this malignant disease, you'll have to recall all this for yourself, because nobody else will want to discuss it with you.
Even though they too are saturated with the same infection, they prefer to talk of other matters.
The occasional giving away of various things is relatively easy, but to relinquish self is both recondite and extremely difficult.
Nevertheless, the effort is worthwhile because this self is the sole source of all suffering.
Should this root not be destroyed it will continue to sprout and flourish, so we must turn and apprehend this self.
The Lord Buddha has laid down the Recollections of the Four Requisites, which, for the monks, are: robe material, alms food, shelter, and medicine.
He said that if they weren't considered merely as material exigencies, as elements, free of all ideas of self, then the yellow robe, the lump of rice, the hut and medicines would all burst into flame.
Even though we may not be monks and only beginners in Dhamma practice, if we really have the determination to be rid of the defilements and self, then there's no loss in trying to follow a similar basic rule.
If we don't, imagine how the defilements, craving, clinging, and self will relentlessly proliferate.
So we have to make our choice: simply to follow the old way, or to strive towards the ending of self.
Each one of you should take this to heart.
Turning to examine internally is difficult, but even modest application will result in great benefit.
Actually catching the deceit of self in the act of plunging one still deeper into suffering, and being able, there and then, to wipe it out — this is truly a reward beyond price.
The failure to implement this eradication, this giving up of self, lays the basis for the intensification of suffering.
For, by not bringing it in for examination, it is able to grow freely.
You may be able to quote and recite the scriptures — and even skillfully teach others — yet the mind remains impure and confused.
By clearly seeing this you will feel revulsion for everything involved with this craving and desire.
You will start to give generously and to make sacrifices, no matter how difficult it seems, and thereby suffering can no longer secure a hold.
Each small renunciation builds its own reward in the mind until there is complete victory.
Anyone having a strong tendency towards stinginess — which is a particular defilement — seems unable to give anything up.
They are reluctant to examine themselves or admit that they can possibly harbor a disease as severe as selfishness.
If they would frequently make an inspection, that sort of defilement wouldn't dare to show its face.
But by being negligent the defilement grows strong and bold, and is capable of the most selfish and despicable acts.
Such people will then be able to appropriate the property of a community, such as we have here, for their own selfish purposes.
By turning to a constant probing of your mind, you'll be able to succeed in the giving up of unworthy attachments.
Whatever you do will then become Dhamma, and will be of assistance to our companions in birth, sickness, old age and death.
The getting rid of selfishness will also allow you to come to the aid of others, without caring about the hardships involved.
Without self we are truly on the noble way.
The practice of Dhamma needs orderliness in daily life.
Any slackness is inappropriate.
Another point here is that any shortcomings in behavior allow defilements a chance to come forth more easily.
Orderliness helps to arouse mindfulness, which may in its turn forestall the defilements.
Disregard for rules and regulations brings nothing, whereas conscientiously abiding by them can bring benefit.
They give one a sense of how properly to respond to any situation, and this is necessary because we still can't completely understand by ourselves.
The Lord Buddha knew the situation from every side, whereas we are surrounded by darkness and ignorance.
This means we can't be sure of ourselves — either externally or internally — and so must depend on Dhamma and the Way it points out to us.
The decision — to follow Dhamma or to wander away — remains with each one of you.
Anyone who wishes to be rid of their defilements and suffering, will need vigilance as an asset of mind and must then be diligent and persevere.
Forever encountering the scorching fire of suffering, they will finally have to stop, turn and set themselves the task of struggling to be free.
Without a clear and thorough understanding about oneself, the defilements will thrive and spread their virulent infection, which can only bring more and more suffering.
We must therefore reinforce our mindfulness and wisdom, for no other instrument can fight and destroy the defilements.
The persistent quest to train the mind needs mindfulness and wisdom to point the way.
Halfheartedness merely wastes time and one remains the same unmitigated fool.
When you come to realize this the benefits from the resulting effort are immense.
Eventually, you will be able to destroy the defilements, relinquish all attachment and the mind will transcend suffering.
But any failure to achieve this will see you swept away by the power of craving and defilements.
Negligence and carelessness will allow them to lead you away by the nose; they'll pull you here and drag you there.
This is why the Lord Buddha emphasized, in so many ways, the necessity of letting go, sacrificing and disentangling yourself.
This is the way to excise the cancer from the mind.
This kind of malignant disease is very insidious and though it may reveal a few symptoms, it's usually not enough to alert one to the situation.
Eventually, it will usually triumph and sometimes you may even submit to its terms with alacrity.
Your examination therefore must be circumspect and alert, otherwise it's like plugging one hole in a leaking boat only to find it's leaking elsewhere.
There are six holes or apertures — the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind — and if you have no control over them, they are left open to follow after emotional objects.
And this causes great suffering.
You must use mindfulness and wisdom to seek out and review the true situation present within yourself, and this must become the most important activity throughout the day.
Our life is for working on the elimination of the defilements, not for anything else.
Yet the defilements and suffering continue to hover about, and if we aren't equal to their threat we'll surely get burnt.
We need to pull ourselves around and question how to deal with this, for then we'll be heading for great success.
While we still have breath and our body isn't yet rotting in its coffin, we must take counsel and search for a way to eradicate the root infection of this terrible disease, the germ of defilements and craving.
This cancer, which has gnawed deeply into the mind, can only be remedied with Dhamma.
The Lord Buddha prescribed his Dhamma medicines with their various properties.
Each one of us must carefully select from them and blend what is correct and most suitable, and then use it to destroy the root infection.
All this necessitates great circumspection.
Should your self-inspection remain insufficient to destroy the defilements, they will grow stronger and burn like an unseen fire inside the mind.
Introspection is the extinguisher to use, so that when you notice greed arising for an object, you can snuff it out and let go of it.
Now, look at the mind, is it free or entangled in turmoil?
If you don't persevere, it can only end in your getting burnt.
No matter how smart you think you are, you always seem to succumb to greed.
Greed seizes the commander's position and you make no attempt to dislodge it — and even go out to receive it in with compliments.
The mind is then the oppressed slave of desire, and has fallen into delusion, with the grasping of this and that.
There's no obvious way out of such wretched entanglement; we just don't know how to escape the dilemma that viciously encircles our mind.
We are trapped by our lack of true resolve and finally, when we are at our wit's end, we become slaves to the defilements just as before.
The more often we submit to them the more their power grows.
The only true way to overthrow them is strenuously to bring mindfulness and wisdom to bear.
We can then examine, from all angles, the suffering they bring until the mind refuses to stay a slave any longer.
It's no use just making an external show of it, because the greater the fuss the more stubborn the defilements become.
Yet, we also can't be halfhearted about it.
You must have the appropriate response for whatever the situation brings.
You can't rush in with massive good intention to wipe them out, but must first carefully focus and enhance mindfulness and wisdom.
This will all require great circumspection, and all these points will need to be remembered.
To genuinely understand, the mind will have to investigate in every posture, with every breath.
It will then be equal to the task of stopping those moods and tendencies that continually fabricate notions, without reason or value, under the compulsion of delusion.
Without true determination, practice becomes halfhearted.
This leads to distraction and a waste of valuable time, with it all being nothing more than delusion.
We must turn our vision within and persevere until we see clearly.
Once we are adept, it's actually more enjoyable to look inside than out.
Externally there is just the dissolution of things seen — why be so engrossed in that?
But the inner eye can penetrate to the clear light and then to the Truth of Dhamma.
By seeing the nature of the dissolution of all determinations, new insight will arise as to that nature that doesn't deteriorate, a nature that can't be altered but just is.
If your all-round mindfulness and wisdom remain insufficient and weak, the defilements will be overwhelming.
However, if you can persistently build up mindfulness and wisdom, the strength of the defilements will proportionally decline.
You'll notice that though the mind was previously confused, it has now become resolute.
It's able to see the impermanence of things more clearly, so that they can be let go of.
This insight into impermanence empowers mindfulness and wisdom to move towards an even deeper discernment.
Yet this penetration must be truly focused, otherwise the slightest inattention will be disruptive.
If it doesn't wander off target, even for a moment, then this is truly the way to control the defilements.
Negligence, however, means that they can never be threatened and they'll regroup stronger than ever.
Mindfulness and clear comprehension must be developed in every posture, with every breath.
We must make the effort so that the mind is attentive and doesn't drift away following various emotional objects, or lose itself in the confusion of concocting thoughts.
You should be forewarned here about the tendency to think, “I know!”, when you don't really know at all.
Until the mind penetrates to true insight there must always be doubt and uncertainty; but when you begin truly to see, such doubts fall away and speculation is no longer necessary.
One truly knows.
How can you be certain that you have true insight?
When the mind truly comprehends, the defilements and suffering are really eliminated.
However, if one just thinks that one sees — whilst having no real insight — then one can't possibly destroy the defilements and suffering.
This insight penetrates into the mind, for this is where the desire for things is activated and that which blocks out Dhamma resides.
When this concocting stops, one sees through to the nature of mind that is without the fire and anguish of desire.
This can be seen anytime when one focuses properly and with determination.
One can see other things, why not this?
Just truly look and you will certainly see!
But you must look correctly to be able to penetrate, otherwise you won't see anything.
If you grasp at things — which goes against the basic principles of true knowledge — and then try to go straight on to the truth, it's probable that you'll get all twisted and an element of pride, or something similar, will insinuate itself.
The only way is to see the arising and ceasing of things, merely seeing and understanding without grasping.
See!
This is the way to freedom from attachment.
It has been said, “See the world as if it were empty,” and we must similarly see our moods, as they arise and cease, as empty.
When the mind truly realizes the transience of things, the deceit of the world and our moods, it doesn't grasp at them any more.
This is the free mind.
There are many levels to this but even a temporary experience is still of benefit; just don't go and grasp after anything!
The free mind that is called vimokkha — attaining to true and final release — we find described in one of the scriptures we chant: “vimokkha is not subject to change.” Those levels of freed mind that change are not true vimokkha, so we must continue to examine each level and press for the fruit, which is always freedom from attachment.
It doesn't matter how many levels one has to work through until it finally doesn't change, which is when it is without any aim or attachment for anything.
This is the true way to penetrative insight.
May all of you who practice Dhamma, work tirelessly to see and know this truth.
We all have suffering, and the most important task of our life is to let go and be rid of it.
The mind is besieged by defilements and is left helpless owing to its deficient study of Dhamma.
It is continually scorched with suffering and unless we turn to Dhamma it will be consumed throughout this life and on into the next.
Only Dhamma practice can extinguish and release us from suffering.
This practice of Dhamma is precisely a constant self- examination, because body and mind are the basis of our existence.
The condition of changing, which they naturally exhibit, needs to be correctly examined.
Otherwise you will follow the unthinking 'normal' course, understanding nothing and grasping after things which only go to compound your suffering.
This, however, is difficult to see and will require your full attention and concern.
In examining the unrest and anxiety of the mind, you'll find it emerges from the disease of greed, hatred and delusion.
The desire for things can only bring turmoil to the mind and it's like a virulent infection has taken hold.
It's normal to be afraid of bodily disease, but the affliction of the defilements, which disturb and depress the mind, doesn't concern us at all.
We choose not to recognize the seriousness of this infection and sometimes, in our ignorance, even to aggravate matters.
To actually get down to eliminating the defilements is therefore difficult and unattractive, especially with the myriad outside distractions that stir up desire.
The indifferent, common person just spins with their desires, leaving the mind dizzy and unbalanced all the time.
This is plainly suffering and torment, yet if we don't concern ourselves with this affliction, don't struggle to overcome the tendency to follow our desires, then we must abjectly submit to it.
It's our ignorance concerning the defilement's successful infiltration and infection of the mind that makes this disease so difficult to see.
You must turn your attention away from external things and set it on your own body and mind.
Whether mind or body, it's all subject to impermanence and change.
Yet this is difficult for the ordinary person to comprehend.
It's like what we think of as the growth of people; from their mother's womb onwards there is continual change and transformation so that this growth really refers to change.
Nothing remains immutable in this world.
The decline and decay of either the body or material things shouldn't be so difficult to notice, and yet it still somehow escapes our attention.
The mind and mental states are constantly changing but instead of seeing this we grasp at the sight or sound of any object experienced, and this drops us into even more suffering.
If we could penetrate to the actual experience of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tangibles and mind objects, we would find a continual change, a constant arising and passing away.
How does the old emotional object pass away, how does a new one arise?
How is it that the mind is overpowered by the defilements into conceivings and imaginings that proliferate out of hand?
But we pay no interest to such matters and are consequently overwhelmed by suffering, which extends into actions and speech full of intense greed, hatred and delusion.
This incessant torment of the defilements — hotter than the hottest fire — can only be relieved through the practice of Dhamma.
Yet the ordinary worldling, though being roasted alive, behaves as if she is immune to the fire and pays it no attention.
She even smiles and thinks herself content in habitually grasping at transient things as 'me' and 'mine'.
She doesn't realize that whatever she reaches out to, and falls in love with, is forever out of reach, edging towards dissolution.
This all needs the deepest examination, so as to see the truth and not fall into attachment and delusion.
People learn from the scriptures of such diseases as the fetters or underlying tendencies, but they don't turn to check them out in themselves.
One takes up words and translates their definitions, yet one doesn't see that the wrong view of holding to personality is the direct source of all one's suffering and torment.
One not only fails to comprehend this plain truth, but then one turns and unthinkingly submits to upholding such wrong view.
This is why the mind is in such a state of profound ignorance.
It is normal for people to have knowledge about many things, sometimes to the extent that they can't relax and must be forever researching new matters.
They know what's good, what's right — they know it all!
Whatever the subject, they manage to concoct an answer, finally spiralling out into wild conceptualizations.
They simply know too much!
This style of knowledge is that of the defilements and craving; its antidote is the knowledge arising from mindfulness and wisdom that penetrates to the truth of the mind.
If we should give free rein to this obsession with wild imaginings, the mind will exhaust itself and we will eventually suffer a nervous breakdown.
If we allow ourselves to get into such a state then we'll end up insane.
Some cases may stay deluded until their death and, on being reborn, they will return to that same delusion.
This transpires from a lack of critical examination and from not trusting in the application of Dhamma.
Tranquilizers and similar drugs for the mentally ill merely relieve the external symptoms but do not get to the root cause.
A radical cure depends on the control of one's own mind, using mindfulness and wisdom to brake and critically check, enabling the mind to free itself from its delusions.
This is the complete cure of Dhamma.
That Dhamma practice should be able to cure every kind of illness should merit some thought.
Each stage in your understanding of Dhamma will depend on mindfulness and wisdom.
Those who show no interest in Dhamma — no matter how great their knowledge of worldly matters — will fall under the domination of the defilements and become subject to birth, old age, sickness and death.
Once you come to understand Dhamma, following the Lord Buddha, the mind will become bright, calm and pure.
This knowledge is of far more value than that which you have acquired for your livelihood's sake, or that which you obtained by being pleasurably — but temporarily!
— engrossed in various entertainments.
When you come around to constantly examining your mind, you'll see that when anxiety arises the mind is not free and will not accept the truth of the Lord Buddha's words: “Go out from desire in happiness.” Being burned alive in the maw of desire through indulging in the five sense strands — sight, sound, smell, taste, touch — is hardly 'going out from desire with happiness'.
But if you correctly see that the penalty of desire is suffering, it will cease to gratify and the mind will be freed from desire.
At that moment, when the mind is unattached to sense objects and is free of desire, you can penetrate to more profound levels and truly know whether it is really happiness.
The free mind will know of itself that happiness is not being overwhelmed by suffering or aroused to passion.
The mind without passion will immediately incline solely towards freedom.
Is this what you want, or are you satisfied with lust and insatiable desire?
Consider carefully and make your choice.
Inclining the mind towards freedom and release from the entanglements of passion and lust brings a natural state of purity and calm.
Surely, compared to this freedom and happiness, the turmoil of sense desires will seem loathsome and repellent.
If you don't reflect upon this you'll become absorbed and lost in never-ending desires and passions, caught and confined in the cage of craving.
Held in the grip of this disease so difficult to cure, isn't it high time you turned to radically curing it by destroying its root infection?
When the mind fixes on a desired object, you must reflect and see the harm and suffering that arise and compare it with the happiness of the mind freed from desire.
You must constantly examine this suffering and the freedom from suffering in your own mind, attending to it with every in- and out-breath.
The principle is set down in the scriptures in the Foundations of Mindfulness, which describes many different ways to examine and reflect.
But if you don't actually apply them in your practice, no matter how many of the texts you read, it will be of no benefit.
You will continue merely groping along in the dark without understanding anything.
To detect this insidious disease requires mindfulness and wisdom, and these must be nurtured and applied so that they become well established.
If you only do this sporadically and irresolutely, you will always end in laxity and make no progress in Dhamma practice.
It is just this progress that leads to a lessening of suffering and a decline in desire — as you will see for yourself.
You'll realize that the most direct way of practice is constant reflection and examination, and will see how best this can be applied in your daily life.
Those of us here who devote our lives to Dhamma through following the training rule of chastity must especially consider this carefully.
This way of Dhamma practice needs an earnest application of mindfulness and wisdom, persevering with them until true knowledge arises.
But initially, how should one investigate so that new understanding may arise where previously there was ignorance?
When the mind is possessed by ignorance and delusion, you can't relax or be indifferent but must concern yourself energetically with escaping from that which brings harm and suffering.
You must discern what it is that brings brightness and clarity to the mind.
If this isn't done, the mind will tend to be seduced by surrounding sense objects and you are left with just scholarly knowledge and talk.
In fact, your mind truly doesn't know what is what, and any scrap of insight that does genuinely arise will not be followed up.
You'll relax, become preoccupied with things, and neglect the practice.
It is therefore important to be very careful about this and bring mindfulness and wisdom to bear so that they can be steadily trained and perfected.
When you can penetrate to the truth of impermanence, suffering and not-self, even if just for a moment, you'll see that this is truly the perfect way to extinguish all suffering.
Whatever remains undiscerned must be earnestly investigated and related to what one already knows.
This leads to disattachment from self and others, from 'mine' and 'theirs'.
Just a momentary insight gives value to your life, otherwise you'll remain in the continual darkness of ignorance and ceaseless imaginings.
The mind being caught in constant turmoil is truly a wretched state of affairs.
Meditation must therefore be steadfastly developed.
You must build it up as an asset of the mind and not be concerned only with eating, sleeping and other bad habits.
You must watch over the mind so that it stays under the direction of mindfulness and wisdom, always pulling it back and never leading it out to other concerns that are a waste of time.
A first step in the practice is the code of conduct, necessary because otherwise things only slide into distraction and confusion.
You must therefore place yourself under precepts and discipline, for it's this that can bring great benefit.
You'll then come to see that this life is meant only for training yourself towards the elimination of defilements and suffering; and doing it before the body itself is laid out in its coffin.
Without this concern for practice and for finding a suitably quiet place, the mind will tend to overextend itself with notions of conceit.
Therefore you must all decide on the way to go, blocking the wandering of the mind after sense objects and moods, and bringing it back to investigate within yourself so as to steadily develop calm and tranquillity.
The Lord Buddha rightly set down various methods for developing meditation, including mindfulness of breathing.
If we don't take up one of these methods as a basis for practice, even though it may still be possible to gain results they will be unsteady and fleeting.
But with a basis of practice to aid one, the mind can be brought under the control of mindfulness and clear comprehension, without fading into distraction.
How should each of us go about this to obtain the desired results?
In your daily life, how can you improve your practice?
These questions warrant great concern and consideration.
Don't be careless and forgetful.
Whatever you do in your practice — including the guarding of the sense doors — must be followed through steadfastly without vacillation or distraction.
Otherwise time flies by, your life ebbs away, and you achieve nothing.
Inattentive and halfhearted, how can you expect to escape from suffering?
What a waste — be earnest!
Such concern, when it arises authentically, enables you to correct and right yourself.
It steadily wears away at your distraction.
Your investigation should center on impermanence, the suffering involved in such change, and the lack of self in all of it.
You then must focus on the central point of 'knowing' and penetrate through to clearly understand impermanence, suffering, and not-self in both body and mind.
When you succeed in clearly realizing this, you can truly be called wise, awakened and happy through Dhamma.
If it is genuine insight you'll no longer feel any attachment or involvement with anything.
You will be free of feelings of 'me' and 'mine'.
Does this sound appealing?
I'm not talking about trivial matters.
This is serious — I tell you plainly — and you must concern yourselves seriously.
Halfhearted listening to what I say is no use, you must really try to gain insight within yourself.
This brings such great rewards that it deserves your special attention.
Above all things concentrate your attention on this.
May Dhamma be the guiding light in your life.
Concern for Dhamma practice is of the greatest value because it leads on to wisdom.
Its steady development will allow you to ' read yourself,' by using a careful examination of suffering and the harm caused by the defilements.
Occasionally, you'll be able clearly to discern the situation and resolve to get free.
The mind is then calm and serene, without those agitating thoughts that, through one's negligence, had previously been allowed a free rein.
The principle of self-examination is a tool of vital importance and requires regular and specific development.
It brings the mind to stability by securing it with mindfulness is essential.
Otherwise, the mind will waver and vacillate following contact with various objects, which will eventually lead to proliferating imaginings and turmoil.
By controlling the six sense doors — which means having mindfulness constantly in attendance — one lays a deep, immovable foundation.
This can be compared to driving piles into firm ground rather than mud, where they would sway under any external force.
Mindfulness is therefore necessary for controlling the mind, so that it is stable and can withstand contact with objects, neither craving them nor being repelled by them.
This firm mindfulness must be maintained in each posture and with every breath, and this will effectively check the mind's wild chasing after sense objects.
Otherwise, the mind will be like a rudderless ship, battered by wind and waves and drifting helplessly.
Mindfulness is therefore essential in securing the mind, allowing it to stabilize and investigate for insight.
Initially, in order to establish a foundation of mindfulness, you'll have to concentrate on centering and balancing the mind in impartiality.
At this stage, there's no need to speculate or be concerned about any matter.
If you can fortify and hold this centeredness, it will become the base and standard for your investigation.
But this impartiality needs careful checking to make sure that it's not just a state of indifference and inertia, or absent-minded preoccupation.
You must be neither scattered nor engrossed in things.
Sitting straight-backed in meditation; maintaining mindfulness and centeredness is all that is required.
There's no need to think of anything.
The mind is firm, unswayed by whatever may arise, be it pleasant or painful feelings.
One's attention is locked onto the stability of mind, and excludes all feelings and it's this that leads to equanimity.
Guard against any inclination towards either absent-mindedness or infatuation with some object.
So that if you're sitting in meditation, after thirty minutes of the hour's session the mind is established and continues to be so for the remaining time.
When changing posture to standing, walking or lying down, notice that though the body has shifted, the mind is still centered and unshaken.
Mindfulness, which must be sustained with every breath, is the kingpin in this, forestalling the imaginings and concoctions of mind.
Then, with the mind centered and neutral, the intense concentration on the in- and out-breath can be relaxed to a suitably moderate level.
In the hour's session, the mind will then be without worries and distracting thoughts.
Afterwards, you'll start to notice that in whatever you do or say, the mind has a natural 'poise with knowingness'.
When the mind is thus stationed, it will have all-round protection so that contact with external objects will not affect its stability.
Even if it should be drawn out for a moment, it will quickly and without coercion return to maintaining its base.
What had previously stimulated attraction or repulsion, a pull to this or that side, is rendered ineffectual because the mind is now centered and neutral.
Any wandering or distraction can be countered by a critical examination of the virtues and attributes of the centered, stable mind.
The foundation of mindfulness must be deeply laid within every posture and constantly developed in every action.
Once the base is set, the mind becomes compliant, calm and free of imaginings and turmoil.
It steadily grows more refined and is able to penetrate and examine, knowing both its stability and its disinterestedness in those brief external contacts.
Any craving can thus be disposed with.
When changing your position — perhaps in response to painful bodily feeling — the mind will neither fix on the pain, nor on the new pleasant feeling, but will be intent in itself.
This stability permits you comfortably to avoid the cravings involved with feelings.
The ordinary untrained mind on the other hand will be irritated into pursuing pleasant feelings.
With repeated practice, the foundation's piles are driven deeper and deeper, so that there is no swaying under the impact of sense objects and moods.
No longer are you restlessly drawn out after sights, sounds, smells, tastes and tangibles; no longer indulging in meaningless thought fabrications because of your lack of mindfulness.
This stability of mind needs constant attention and strengthening.
Then the examination of impermanence and not- self, which usually deceive the mind, can be set up.
The mind, like a mischievous monkey, tends to wander away.
Yet even monkeys can be caught and trained, and so it is with the mind.
It must be first caught and tied with mindfulness, then tamed and disciplined.
The training of the mind can neither be excessively forced nor abandoned to complacency.
Everyone must find out for themselves exactly what brings results.
If you are only casually mindful, the mind will lack a foundation and be easily distracted by sense objects and moods.
It will then be impossible to brake, to calm down and free yourself.
The firm establishing of mindfulness in every posture — standing, walking, sitting or lying down — becomes essential so that the monkey is tethered and can only circle its post, without being able to get into mischief.
Once the mind is trained, it will be calm and capable of self-examination.
However, any obsessive imaginings show up a deficiency and you'll have to train yourself further, because it's precisely this lack of firmness that underlies all your turmoil.
Why should the mind be so wild and disobedient?
Practice — so that it calms down and rests in stability.
At this stage, the mind is stabilized and supported by mindfulness in all postures.
Any distraction occurs for only a moment and without attachment.
You'll now have to perfect this so that all distractive imaginings and moods, arising from contact with external objects, are subdued and completely cease.
This training isn't so very difficult.
The vital point is being aware of the mind's centeredness in whichever of the various meditation subjects you choose to use.
If attention wanders, always bring it back to the established mind, and the foundation will continue to be laid.
Such mindfulness is then always available for investigation, because the firmly settled mind is also able to see clearly.
It can discern the truth and falseness within oneself, whereas the unsettled mind can only swing around to haunt and jumble everything up to fool you.
The established mind can therefore get rid of the defilements and suffering from every side.
This way of practice depends very much on diligence and perseverance in establishing the mind.
Then, just as a firmly anchored post isn't shaken in a storm, so the various defilements with their resulting anguish and distress can no longer afflict the mind.
When this is realized, you'll no longer go out with fondness for this thing or aversion for that.
Such equanimity can then become a basis for investigation and insight.
But initially, in stabilizing the mind to a deeper level, there's no need to involve yourself with any thinking processes.
Preoccupations and absent-mindedness must both be guarded against, for it's at this point that delusion and the machinations of craving takes over.
The firmly settled mind might waver a little but it will quickly correct itself so that the basis of mindfulness can be used for examining impermanence, suffering and not-self.
In the beginning stages, though not absolutely essential, it's better to concentrate on stabilizing the mind.
If you try to focus the mind without such stability it's liable to fly off into uncontrolled imaginings.
Therefore, settle your mind, steadily focusing it so that it develops to the profound level imbued with freedom.
The torment of the defilements with their domination of the sense-doors will then be overthrown.
This is because with such firm control over the mind, the eyes and ears, the nose, tongue and touch will also be guarded.
Without a firm foundation of mindfulness there is no restraint of the senses, for the eyes want to look, the ears want to hear and come into contact with the myriad sense objects.
With the mind centered, it's already protected and so there's no need to guard the actual senses themselves.
Then, whatever you say, the mind is settled without harking after notions of: “That's good — I like it; That's bad — I dislike it; That's pretty… That's ugly…” The mind is no longer fixed on externals, but keeps to the principle of being centered and uninvolved.
Every experience is now received with impartiality because five of the six sense doors have been closed, and the mind is centered and steady.
When sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or tangibles arise, the mind isn't attracted but remains centered, controlling all.
Just like that.
Try it.
It is now the end of the Rainy Season.
During this week, you should all make an extra special effort to establish the heart with mindfulness.
In the Lord Buddha's time, it was during this period — when the lotus and water lily bloom — that a meeting was arranged between the Lord Buddha and his senior disciples.
They had just finished training newly ordained monks and novices during the Rains.
As in other years, I want to stress this again to encourage you to make the mind steadfast.
When this is achieved the mind will bloom, unwithered by the defilements, heat and myriad afflictions.
So you should all try for this during the coming seven days.
Watch over the firmly centered mind so that it receives constant support.
Except, that is, for when you're asleep and even then the mind should be centered right up to the last wakeful moment.
Try it, and you'll find on Awakening that the mind has remained centered.
It will be free of craving and all the suffering this involves.
Then you'll be able to see for yourself how the mind gently blooms.
With the mind established it is naturally cooled and soothed without effort.
You can be assured that this mind will neither be scorched by the defilements nor led into self-inflicted craving and torment.
The fires of lust, hatred and delusion can't touch it.
But please understand that this can only be achieved with genuine exertion and constant mindfulness.
Playing about and being irresolute will only hand you over to the torments of the defilements.
Dhamma practice is one of restraint and steadfastness, clear of any mischievous pursuits after sense distractions.
Whatever you do, whether eating or excreting, make sure the mind is established within.
When you realize this state, the mind will be unshaken by turmoil and free of weakness.
It will be established in a freedom beyond harm from those things that had burnt it.
It is free for through introspection it no longer grasps and embraces such things, and is therefore constantly protected.
In such a state there are no thoughts of self, there's just the stabilized mind.
Sustain it for seven days and you will know the results for yourself.
So please persevere!
Each day keep a check and record of your progress.
Don't become lax and erratic.
Keep the mind steady and don't weaken in your resolve — really try to make an end of suffering!
If you are irresolute, you will fall for the provocations of wanting things and doing things, and thereby you'll enslave yourself and suffer.
Your daily life should give good opportunity for self- examination.
Enter the battlefield.
Firmly center yourself.
The uprising feelings and moods should be seen as neutral without involvement in notions of good or bad.
Everything is halted in centeredness because without intention there is no good or bad or self.
Sustain this centeredness and freedom from self, and know exactly how the lotus blooms.
If it doesn't bud and flower, know that it's withering and rotting in the heat of the defilements and your inattention.
Please apply yourselves to establishing the mind, and do your best to bring the lotus to bloom.
Make sure it doesn't become scorched in the fire of the defilements.
We are meeting here again today and some of you have already spoken to me of your practice.
I would like further to emphasize that your development of mindfulness and self- inspection requires a suitable basis in effort and perseverance.
We have all heard about the mind being enshrouded in defilements, and we can only falter and slip back by not pressing on with practice.
If the mind lacks energy, it's time to increase and maintain the pressure of practice, thereby enabling us to break through with insight.
Such insight isn't merely a matter of 'thinking it out', for it's an examination based in the concentrated mind, which is calm and stabilized to a sufficient degree.
This calm, centered mind, without imaginings or thought fabrications, without positive or negative reactions to emotional objects, requires a careful and subtle investigation into its various conditions without disturbing its balance.
A cursory understanding is hardly true knowledge, for one knows merely the external calm or those characteristics of mind that still sway under the defilements, without any lucid insight.
Make the effort to analyze and examine within, searching for the understanding to help you along and constantly sharpening your investigation.
If you aren't at this investigative stage, true knowledge won't arise because your knowledge and mindfulness are still at a relatively superficial level.
Taking the physical body up for examination, you can analyze it as either made up of the various elements — earth, water, fire, air — or inspect aspects of its loathsomeness.
This will lead to an understanding about the body, which can be advanced in each posture so that your thoughts never wander off course.
Your work is meticulously to focus on and destroy the defilements in whatever guise they appear.
The qualities of heedfulness and non-distraction will advance your practice along smoothly.
It's as if one becomes experienced and proficient in treating and eradicating the subtle disease within the mind — which is the malady of nescience and delusion.
Normally, we can't comprehend even the grosser aspects of this condition, but when it's been stilled by firmly establishing the mind we'll be able to penetrate through to the deeper levels and discern the deceit and cunning of the defilements.
With this seeing and understanding you'll be ready to renounce them as they swerve away to find a sight or sound, a delicious taste or smell.
Whether it's aimed at the relishing of bodily contact or pleasant mental contact, you must be wise to it all.
But this is difficult to perceive because we still have so many desires for pleasure at a very coarse level, involving pleasant feeling together with perception, thought and awareness.
Thus we are infatuated by their guiles, fall into negligence, and end up understanding nothing.
